6881
Cecilia_Beaux
 awards         Cecilia Beaux (May 1, 1855  September 7, 1942) was an American society portraitist, in the manner of Singer Sargent. She was a near contemporary of better-known American artist Cassatt and also received her training in Philadelphia and France. Her sympathetic renderings of American ruling class made her one of the most successful portrait painters of her era.BiographyEarly lifeCecilia Beaux was born in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, the youngest daughter of French silk manufacturer Jean Adolphe Beaux and teacher Cecilia Kent Leavitt, daughter of prominent businessman Wheeler Leavitt of York City and his wife Cecilia Kent of Connecticut.() Cecilia Kent Leavitt died from fever 12 days after giving birth at age 33.(Tappert, page 1.) Cecilia Leilie Beaux and her sister Etta were subsequently raised by their maternal grandmother and aunts, primarily in Philadelphia.()() Her father, unable to bear the grief of his loss, and feeling adrift in a foreign country, returned to his native France for 16 years, with only one visit back to Philadelphia.(Alice A. Carter, Cecilia Beaux, Rizzoli, New York, 2005, p. 11, ISBN 0-8478-2708-9) He returned when Cecilia was two, but left four years later after his business failed. As she confessed later, We didnt love Papa very much, he was so foreign.  We thought him peculiar. Her father did have a natural aptitude for drawing and the sisters were charmed by his whimsical sketches of animals. Later, Beaux would discover that her French heritage would serve her well during her pilgrimage and training in France.(Carter, p. 15)File:Cecilia Beaux self-portrait.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Self-portrait by Beaux, 1894In Philadelphia, Beauxs aunt Emily married mining engineer William Foster Biddle, whom Beaux would later describe as after my grandmother, the strongest and most beneficent influence in my life. For fifty years, he cared for his nieces-in-law with consistent attention and occasional financial support.(Carter, p. 18) Her grandmother, on the other hand, provided day-to-day supervision and kindly discipline. Whether with housework, handiwork, or academics, Grandma Leavitt offered a pragmatic framework, stressing that everything undertaken must be completed, conquered. The Civil War years were particularly challenging, but the extended family survived despite little emotional or financial support from Beauxs father.(Carter, p. 19)After the war, Beaux began to spend some time in the household of Willie and Emily, both proficient musicians. Beaux learned to play the piano but preferred singing. The musical atmosphere later proved an advantage for her artistic ambitions. Beaux recalled, They understood perfectly the spirit and necessities of an artists life.(Carter, p. 20) In her early teens, she had her first major exposure to art during visits with Willie to the nearby Academy of the Fine Arts, one of Americas foremost art schools and museums. Though fascinated by the narrative elements of some of the pictures, particularly the Biblical themes of the massive paintings of West, at this point Beaux had no aspirations of becoming an artist.(Carter, p. 25)Her childhood was a sheltered though generally happy one. As a teen she already manifested the traits, as she described, of both a realist and a perfectionist, pursued by an uncompromising passion for carrying through.(Carter, p. 29) She attended the Misses Lyman School and was just an average student, though she did well in French and Natural History. However, she was unable to afford the extra fee for art lessons.(Carter, p. 31) At age 16, Beaux began art lessons with a relative, Catharine Ann Drinker, an accomplished artist who had her own studio and a going clientele. Drinker became Beauxs role model, and she continued lessons with Drinker for a year. She then studied for two years with the painter Francis Adolf Van der Wielen, who offered lessons in perspective and drawing from casts during the time that the new Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts was under construction. Given the bias of the Victorian age, female students were denied direct study in anatomy and could not attend drawing classes with live models (who were often prostitutes) until a decade later.(Carter, p. 37)File:New England Woman Cecilia Beaux.jpg|thumb|right|200px|New England Woman. Portrait of Mrs. Jedidiah H. Richards (Beauxs cousin Julia Leavitt), 1895. Academy of Fine ArtsAt 18, Beaux was appointed drawing teacher at Miss Sanfords School, taking over Drinkers post. She also gave private art lessons, and produced decorative art and small portraits. Her own studies were mostly self-directed. Beaux received her first introduction to lithography doing copy work for Philadelphia printer Thomas Sinclair and she published her first work in St. Nicholas magazine in December 1873.(Carter, p. 45) Beaux demonstrated accuracy and patience as a scientific illustrator, creating drawings of fossils for Drinker Cope, for a multi-volume report sponsored by the U.S. Geological Survey. However, she did not find technical illustration suitable for a career (the extreme exactitude required gave her pains in the solar plexus). At this stage, she did not yet consider herself an artist.(Beaux, pp. 77-80)(Carter, pp. 48-49)Beaux began attending the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts in 1876, then under the dynamic influence of Eakins, whose great work Gross Clinic had horrified Philadelphia Exhibition-goers as a gory spectacle at the Exhibition of 1876.(Carter, p. 54) She steered clear of the controversial Eakins, though she much admired his work. His progressive teaching philosophy, focused on anatomy and live study (and allowed the female students to partake in segregated studios), eventually led to his firing as director of the Academy. She did not ally herself with Eakins ardent student supporters, and later wrote, A curious instinct of self-preservation kept me outside the magic circle.(Carter, p. 59) Instead, she attended costume and portrait painting classes for three years taught by the ailing director Schussele.(Carter, p. 55)After leaving the Academy, the 24-year-old Beaux decided to try her hand at porcelain painting and she enrolled in a course at the National Art Training School. She was well suited to the precise work but later wrote, this was the lowest depth I ever reached in commercial art, and although it was a period when youth and romance were in their first attendance on me, I remember it with gloom and record it with shame.(Carter, p. 63) She studied privately with Sartain, a friend of Eakins and a New York artist invited to Philadelphia to teach a group of art students, starting in 1881. Though Beaux admired Eakins more and thought his painting skill superior to Sartains, she preferred the latters gentle teaching style which promoted no particular aesthetic approach.(Carter, p. 65) Unlike Eakins, however, Sartain believed in phrenology and Beaux adopted a lifelong belief that physical characteristics correlated with behaviors and traits.(Beaux attended Sartains classes for two years, then rented her own studio and shared it with a group of women artists who hired a live model and continued without an instructor. After the group disbanded, Beaux set in earnest to prove her artistic abilities. She painted a large canvas in 1884, Les Derniers Jours denfance, a portrait of her sister and nephew whose composition and style revealed a debt to McNeill Whistler and whose subject matter was akin to Cassatts mother-and-child paintings.(Carter, p. 67) It was awarded a prize for the best painting by a female artist at the Academy, and further exhibited in Philadelphia and New York.  Following that seminal painting, she painted over 50 portraits in the next three years with the zeal of a committed professional artist. Her invitation to serve as a juror on the hanging committee of the Academy confirmed her acceptance amongst her peers.(Carter, p. 69) In the mid-1880s, she was receiving commissions from notable Philadelphians and earning $500 per portrait, comparable to what Eakins commanded.(Carter, p. 70) When her friend Margaret Bush-Brown insisted that Les Derniers was good enough to be exhibited at the famed Salon, Beaux relented and sent the painting abroad in the care of her friend, who managed to get the painting into the exhibition.(File:Clemenceau Beaux 1920.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Clemenceau by Cecilia Beaux (1920)ParisAt 32, despite her clear success in Philadelphia, Beaux decided that she still needed to advance her skills. She left for Paris with cousin May Whitlock, forsaking several suitors and overcoming the objections of her family. There she trained at the Julian, the largest art school in Paris, and at the Colarossi, receiving weekly critiques from established masters like Robert-Fleury and Bouguereau.(Carter, p. 77) She wrote, Fleury is much less benign than Bouguereau and dont temper his severitieshe hinted of possibilities before me and as he rose said the nicest thing of all, we will do all we can to help youI want these mento know me and recognize that I can do something.(Carter, p. 82) Though advised regularly of Beauxs progress abroad and to not be worried about any indiscretions of ours, her Aunt Eliza repeatedly reminded her niece to avoid the temptations of Paris, Remember you are first of all a Christian  then a woman and last of all an Artist.(Carter, p. 84)When Beaux arrived in Paris, the Impressionists, a group of artists who had begun their own series of independent exhibitions from the official Salon in 1874, were beginning to lose their solidarity. Also known as the Independents or Intransigents, the group which at times included Degas, Monet, Sisley, Caillebotte, Pissarro, Renoir, and Morisot, had been receiving the wrath of the critics for several years. Their art, though varying in style and technique, was the antithesis of the type of Academic art that Beaux was trained in and of which her teacher William-Adolphe Bouguereau was a leading master. In the summer of 1888, with classes in summer recess, Beaux worked in the fishing village of Concarneau with the American painters Alexander Harrison and Charles Lasar. She tried applying the plein-air painting techniques used by the Impressionists to her own landscapes and portraiture, with little success.(Carter, p. 87) Unlike her predecessor Cassatt, who had arrived near the beginning of the Impressionist movement 15 years earlier and who had absorbed it, Beauxs artistic temperament, precise and true to observation, would not align with Impressionism and she remained a realist painter for the rest of her career, even as Czanne, Matisse, Gauguin, and Picasso were beginning to take art into new directions.(Carter, p. 91) Beaux mostly admired classic artists like Titian and Rembrandt. Her European training did influence her palette, however, and she adopted more white and paler coloration in her oil painting, particularly in depicting female subjects, an approach favored by Sargent as well.(.)Return to PhiladelphiaFile:SarahAlliboneLeavitt.jpg|thumb|230px|Sita and Sarita (Jeune Fille au Chat). Portrait of Sarah Allibone Leavitt, 1893&ndash;1894. Collection of the dOrsay, ParisBack in America in 1889, Beaux proceeded to paint portraits in the manner, taking as her subjects members of her sisters family as well as the elite of Philadelphia. In making her decision to devote herself to art, she also thought it was best not to marry, and in choosing male company she selected men who would not threaten to sidetrack her career.(Carter, p. 105) She resumed life with her family, and they supported her fully, acknowledging her chosen path and demanding of her little in the way of household responsibilities, I was never once asked to do an errand in town, some bit of shoppingso well did they understand.(Carter, p. 106) She developed a structured, professional routine, arriving promptly at her studio, and expected the same from her models.The five years that followed were highly productive, resulting in over forty portraits.(Carter, p. 107) In 1890 she exhibited at the Paris Exposition, obtained in 1893 the gold medal of the Art Club, and also the Dodge prize at the New York Academy of Design.(Carter, p. 108) Her portrait of The Reverend Matthew Blackburne Grier was particularly well-received, as was Sita and Sarita, a portrait of her cousin Charles W. Leavitts wife Sarah (Allibone) Leavitt in white, with a small black cat perched on her shoulder, both gazing out mysteriously. The mesmerizing effect prompted one critic to point out the witch-like weirdness of the black kitten and for many years, the painting solicited questions by the press. But the result was not pre-planned, as Beauxs sister later explained, Please make no mystery about itit was only an idea to put the black kitten on her cousins shoulder. Nothing deeper.(Carter, p. 114) Sita and Sarita eventually was donated by the artist to the collection of the dOrsay.(Tappert, p. 32) Another highly regarded portrait from that period is New England Woman (1895), a nearly all-white oil painting which was purchased by the Academy of the Fine Arts.In 1895 Beaux became the first woman to have a regular teaching position at the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts, where she instructed in portrait drawing and painting for the next twenty years.(Goodyear, p. 12) That rare type of achievement by a woman prompted one local newspaper to state, It is a legitimate source of pride to Philadelphia that one of its most cherished institutions has made this innovation. She was a popular instructor.( In 1896, Beaux returned to France to see a group of her paintings presented at the Salon. Influential French critic M. Henri Rochefort commented, I am compelled to admit, not without some chagrin, that not one of our female artistsis strong enough to compete with the lady who has given us this year the portrait of Dr. Grier.  Composition, flesh, texture, sound drawingeverything is there without affectation, and without seeking for effect.(Carter, p. 120)File:Lady George Darwin by Cecilia Beaux 1889.jpeg|thumb|right|220px|Lady George Darwin, Beauxs pastel portrait of the former Martha du Puy of Philadelphia, who married Sir Darwin. 1889New YorkBy 1900 the demand for Beauxs work brought clients from D.C. to Boston, prompting the artist to move to New York City; it was there she spent the winters, while summering at Green Alley, the home and studio she had built in Massachusetts.() Beauxs friendship with Richard Gilder, editor-in-chief of the literary magazine The Century, helped promote her career and he introduced her to the elite of society.(Carter, p. 123) Among her portraits which followed from that association are those of Clemenceau; First Lady Roosevelt and her daughter; and Admiral Sir David Beatty. She also sketched President Roosevelt during her House visits in 1902, during which He sat for two hours, talking most of the time, reciting Kipling, and reading scraps of Browning.(Carter, p. 134) Her portraits Fanny Travis Cochran, Dorothea and Francesca, and Ernesta and her Little Brother, are fine examples of her skill in painting children; Ernesta with Nurse, one of a series of essays in luminous white, was a highly original composition, seemingly without precedent.(Goodyear, p. 78) She won the Medal of the arts at the Institute of Chicago, and became a member of the National Academy in 1902.Green AlleyFile:Cecilia Beaux painting Cardinal Mercier.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Cecilia Beaux painting Mercier (ca. 1919)By 1906, Beaux began to live year-round at Green Alley, in a comfortable colony of cottages belonging to her wealthy friends and neighbors. All three aunts had died and she needed an emotional break from Philadelphia and New York. She managed to find new subjects for portraiture, working in the mornings and enjoying a leisurely life the rest of the time. She carefully regulated her energy and her activities to maintain a productive output, and considered that a key to her success. On why so few women succeeded in art as she did, she stated, Strength is the stumbling block. They (women) are sometimes unable to stand the hard work of it day in and day out.  They become tired and cannot reenergize themselves.(Carter, p. 149)While Beaux stuck to her portraits of the elite, American art was advancing into urban and social subject matter, led by artists such as Henri who espoused a totally different aesthetic, Work with great speed..Have your energies alert, up and active. Do it all in one sitting if you can.  In one minute if you can.  There is no use delayingStop studying water pitchers and bananas and paint everyday life. He advised his students, among them Hopper and Kent, to live with the common man and paint the common man, in total opposition to Cecilia Beauxs artistic methods and subjects.(Carter, p. 153) The clash of Henri and Merritt Chase (representing Beaux and the traditional art establishment) resulted in 1907 in the independent exhibition by the urban realists known as The Eight or the School. Beaux and her art friends defended the old order, and many thought (and hoped) the new movement to be a passing fad, but it turned out to be a revolutionary turn in American art.File:Howell.jpg|thumb|200px|Painting of Henry Howell (1919)In 1910, her beloved Uncle Willie died. Though devastated by the loss, at fifty-five years of age, Beaux remained highly productive. In the next five years she painted almost 25 percent of her lifetime output and received a steady stream of honors.(Carter, p. 162) She had a major exhibition of 35 paintings at the Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C. in 1912. Despite her continuing production and accolades, however, Beaux was working against the current of tastes and trends in art. The famed Armory Show of 1913 in New York City was a landmark presentation of 1,200 paintings showcasing Modernism. Beaux believed that the public, initially of mixed opinion about the new art, would ultimately reject it and return its favor to the Pre-Impressionists. But she was wrong; the art the traditionalists deemed not only incompetent, but grotesque came to dominate the 20th century.(Carter, p. 163)Beaux was crippled after breaking her hip while walking in Paris in 1924.  With her health impaired, her work output dwindled for the remainder of her life.( That same year Beaux was asked to produce a self-portrait for the Medici collection in the Uffizi Gallery in Florence.(Self Portrait, Cecilia Beaux, installation at the Uffizi Gallery, Florence, Italy, Smithsonian Archives of American Art) In 1930 she published an autobiography, Background with Figures.( Her later life was filled with honors. In 1930 she was elected a member of the Institute of Arts and Letters; in 1933 came membership in the Academy of Arts and Letters, which two years later organized the first major retrospective of her work. Also in 1933 Roosevelt honored Beaux as the American woman who had made the greatest contribution to the culture of the world.(Tappert, p. 5) In 1942 The National Institute of Arts and Letters awarded her a gold medal for lifetime achievement.Death and critical regardCecilia Beaux died at Green Alley at the age of eighty-seven, and was buried in Cynwyd, Pennsylvania. In her will she devised that a Phyfe rosewood secretaire made for her father go to her cherished nephew Cecil Kent Drinker, a Harvard physician, whom she had painted as a young boy.(Winter Antiques Show Bows in for 51st Year, R. Scudder Smith, Antiques and the Arts Online)(Cecilia Beaux at Pennsylvania Academy, Broad Street Review, April 26, 2008)Though Beaux was an individualist, comparisons to Sargent would prove inevitable, and often favorable. Her strong technique, her perceptive reading of her subjects, and her ability to flatter without falsifying, were traits similar to his. The critics are very enthusiastic. (Bernard) Berenson, Mrs. Coates tells me, stood in front of the portraits &ndash; Miss Beauxs three  and wagged his head. Ah, yes, I see! Some Sargents. The ordinary ones are signed John Sargent, the best are signed Cecilia Beaux, which is, of course, nonsense in more ways than one, but it is part of the generous chorus of praise.(Goodyear, p. 17) Though overshadowed by Cassatt and relatively unknown to museum-goers today, Beauxs craftsmanship and extraordinary output were highly regarded in her time. While presenting the Carnegie Institutes Gold Medal to Beaux in 1899, Merritt Chase stated Miss Beaux is not only the greatest living woman painter, but the best that has ever lived. Miss Beaux has done away entirely with sex gender in art.(Carter, p. 127)During her long productive life as an artist, she maintained her personal aesthetic and high standards against all distractions and countervailing forces. She constantly struggled for perfection, A perfect technique in anything, she stated in an interview, means that there has been no break in continuity between the conception and the act of performance. She summed up her driving work ethic, I can say this: When I attempt anything, I have a passionate determination to overcome every obstacleAnd I do my own work with a refusal to accept defeat that might almost be called painful.(Carter, p. 173)NotesReferences*Beaux, Cecilia. Background with Figures: Autobiography of Cecilia Beaux. Boston and New York: Houghton Mifflin, 1930.*Goodyear, Jr., Frank H., and others., Cecilia Beaux: Portrait of an Artist. Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts, 1974. Library of Congress Catalog No. 74-84248*Tappert, Tara Leigh, Cecilia Beaux and the Art of Portraiture. Smithsonian Institution, 1995. ISBN 1-56098-658-1*External links*Cecilia Beaux from Online Encyclopedia*Cecilia Beaux from Smithsonian American Art Museum*Cecilia Beaux Papers from the Smithsonians Archives of American Art*Portrait of Mrs. John Wheeler Leavitt, 1885, grandmother of Cecilia Beaux, Westmoreland Museum of American Art, Greensburg, Pa., ExplorePAHistory.com*Aimee Ernesta and Eliza Cecilia: Two Sisters, Two Choices, Tara Leigh Tappert, The Pennsylvania Magazine of History and Biography, July 2000, pp. 249&ndash;291*Cecilia Beaux, American Figure Painter, Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts, February 2 - April 13, 2008*Cecilia Beaux Letters, Special Collections, Boston Athenaeum*Cecilia Beauxs Contemporaries Judged Her to Be the Cats Meow; History Sees a Bit of a Chameleon, The Washington Post, March 9, 2008, washingtonpost.com*Cecilia Beaux, Americans in Paris: 1860&ndash;1900, Americans in Paris, The Metropolitan Museum*BeauxBeauxBeauxBeaux
6888
Colon_classification
Colon classification (CC) is a system of classification developed by R. Ranganathan. It was the first ever faceted (or analytico-synthetic) classification. The first edition was published in 1933. Since then six more editions have been published. It is especially used in libraries in India.Its name Colon classification comes from the use of colons to separate facets in class numbers. However, many other classification schemes, some of which are completely unrelated, also use colons and other punctuation in various functions. They should not be confused with Colon classification.As an example, the subject research in the cure of tuberculosis of lungs by x-ray conducted in India in 1950 results in a call number:L,45;421:6;253:f.44N5The components of this call number represent:Medicine,Lungs;Tuberculosis:Treatment;X-ray:Research.India1950 Organization The Colon Classification uses 42 main classes that are combined with other letters, numbers and marks in a manner resembling the of Congress Classification to sort a publication. Facets CC uses five primary categories, or facets, to further specify the sorting of a publication.  Collectively, they are called PMEST::, Personality:; Matter or property:: Energy:. Space: Time Classes The following are the main classes of CC, with some subclasses, the main method used to sort the subclass using the PMEST scheme and examples showing application of PMEST.:z Generalia :1 Universe of Knowledge:2 Science:3 Book science:4 Journalism:B Mathematics::B1 Arithmetic:::B13 of numbers::B2 Algebra:::B23 equations:::B25 Higher Algebra::B3 Analysis:::B33 Equations equation , degree , order : problem::::B331,1,2:1 Numerical solutions (:1) of ordered (331) linear (,1) second order (,2) differential equations:::B37 Real Variables:::B38 Complex Variables::B4 Other Methods::B6 Geometry::B7 Mechanics::B8 Physico-Mathematics::B9 Astronomical Mathematics:C Physics::C1 Fundamentals of Physics::C2 Properties of Matter::C3 Sound::C4 Heat::C5 Light and Radiation::C6 Electricity::C7 Magnetism::C8 Cosmic Hypothesis:D Engineering:E Chemistry:: facets:: :1 General Chemistry:: :2 Physical Chemistry:: :3 Analytical Chemistry::: :33 Qualitative Chemistry::: :34 Quantitative Chemistry::: :35 Volumetric Chemistry:: :4 Synthetic Chemistry:: :5 Extraction Chemistry:: E1 Inorganic Chemistry:: E10 Group 0:: E11 Group 1:: E110 Hydrogen:: E1109 Lithium:: E111 Sodium:: E2 Hydroxl (Base):: E3 Acid:: E4 Salt:: E5 Organic Substance:F Technology:G Biology:H Geology::H1 Mineralogy::H2 Petrology::H3 Structural Geology::H4 Dynamic Geology::H5 Stratigraphy::H6 Paleontology::H7 Geology::H8 Cosmic Hypothesis::HX Mining:I Botany:J Agriculture:: facets:: :1 Soil:: :3 Propagation:: :4 Disease:: :5 Development:: :6 Breeding:: :7 Harvest:: :91 Nomenclature:: :92 Morphology:: :93 Physiology:: :95 Ecology:: material facets:: ,2 Bulb:: ,3 Root:: ,4 Stem:: ,5 Leaf:: ,6 Flower:: ,7 Fruit:: ,8 Seed:: ,97 Whole Plant::J1 Horticulture::J2 Feed::J3 Food::J4 Stimulant::J5 Oil::J6 Drug::J7 Fabric::J8 Dye:K Zoology (same facet schedule as I Botany)::KZ Animal Husbandry (same facet schedule as I Botany):L Medicine organ:problem,cause:handling::LZ3 Pharmacology substance.action,organ::LZ5 Pharmacopoeia:M arts::M7 Textiles material:work: Spiritual experience and mysticism religion,entity:problem:N arts::NA Architecture style , utility , part : technique::ND Sculpture style , figure ; material : technique::NN Engraving::NQ Painting style , figure ; material : technique::NR Music style , music ; instrument : technique:O Literature:P Linguistics:Q Religion:R Philosophy:S Psychology:T Education:U Geography:V History:W science:X Economics:Y Sociology:Z Law Example The most commonly cited example of the Colon Classification is the classification for:* Research in the cure of the tuberculosis of lungs by x-ray conducted in India in 1950s:* Main classification is Medicine** (Medicine)* Within Medicine, the Lungs are the main concern** (Medicine,Lungs)* The property of the Lungs is that they are afflicted with Tuberculosis ** (Medicine,Lungs;Tuberculosis)* The Tuberculosis is being performed (:) on, that is the intent is to cure (Treatment)** (Medicine,Lungs;Tuberculosis:Treatment)* The matter that we are treating the Tuberculosis with are X-Rays** (Medicine,Lungs;Tuberculosis:Treatment;X-ray)* And this discussion of treatment is regarding the Research phase** (Medicine,Lungs;Tuberculosis:Treatment;X-ray:Research)* This Research is performed within a geographical space (.) namely India** (Medicine,Lungs;Tuberculosis:Treatment;X-ray:Research.India)* During the time () of 1950** (Medicine,Lungs;Tuberculosis:Treatment;X-ray:Research.India1950)* And translating into the codes listed for each subject and facet the classification becomes** L,45;421:6;253:f.44N5 Publication informationColon Classification (6th Edition) by Dr. S.R. Ranganathan, published by Ess Ess Publications, Delhi, India,See also*bibliographic classification*Decimal Classification References * Chan, Lois Mai. Cataloging and Classification: An Introduction. 2nd ed. New York: McGraw-Hill, c1994. ISBN 0070105065.External links* More Detail about the Colon Classification at ISKO Italiatdnde:Colon-KlassifikationcolonadaColon ja:dwukropkowa
6968
Customer_relationship_management
Customer relationship management (CRM) is a widely implemented strategy for managing a companys interactions with customers, clients and sales prospects. It involves using technology to organize, automate, and synchronize business processesprincipally sales activities, but also those for marketing, service, and support.(Shaw, Robert, Computer Aided Marketing & Selling (1991) Butterworth Heinemann ISBN 9780750617079) The overall goals are to find, attract, and win new clients, nurture and retain those the company already has, entice former clients back into the fold, and reduce the costs of marketing and client service.(Gartner, Inc. (6 June 2009) Whats Hot in CRM Applications in 2009) Customer relationship management describes a company-wide business strategy including customer-interface departments as well as other departments.(DestinationCRM.com (2002) What Is CRM?) Measuring and valuing customer relationships is critical to implementing this strategy.(Shaw, Robert, Measuring and Valuing Customer Relationships (2000) Business Intelligence ISBN 9781898085331)Benefits of CRMA CRM system may be chosen because it is thought to provide the following advantages: *Quality and efficiency*Decrease in overall costs*Decision support*Enterprise agility*Customer AttentionChallengesSuccessful development, implementation, use and support of customer relationship management systems can provide a significant advantage to the user, but often, there are obstacles that obstruct the user from using the system to its full potential. Instances of a CRM attempting to contain a large, complex group of data can become cumbersome and difficult to understand for an ill-trained user.Additionally, an interface that is difficult to navigate or understand can hinder the CRMs effectiveness, causing users to pick and choose which areas of the system to be used, while others may be pushed aside. This fragmented implementation can cause inherent challenges, as only certain parts are used and the system is not fully functional. The increased use of customer relationship management software has also led to an industry-wide shift in evaluating the role of the developer in designing and maintaining its software. Companies are urged to consider the overall impact of a viable CRM software suite and the potential for good or harm in its use.ComplexityTools and workflows can be complex, especially for large businesses. Previously these tools were generally limited to simple CRM solutions which focused on monitoring and recording interactions and communications. Software solutions then expanded to embrace deal tracking, territories, opportunities, and the sales pipeline itself. Next came the advent of tools for other client-interface business functions, as described below. These tools have been, and still are, offered as on-premises software that companies purchase and run on their own IT infrastructure.Poor usabilityOne of the largest challenges that customer relationship management systems face is poor usability. With a difficult interface for a user to navigate, implementation can be fragmented or not entirely complete.The importance of usability in a system has developed over time.(Desbarats, Gus. 1995. Usability: form that says function. Industrial Management & Data Systems 95, no. 5:3-6.) Customers are likely not as patient to work through malfunctions or gaps in user safety,( and there is an expectation that the usability of systems should be somewhat intuitive: it helps make the machine an extension of the way I think &mdash; not how it wants me to think.An intuitive design can prove most effective in developing the content and layout of a customer relationship management system.(Hart-Davidson, William, Grace Bernhardt, Michael McLeod, Martine Rife, and Jeffrey T. Grabill. 2008. Coming to Content Management: Inventing Infrastructure for Organizational Knowledge Work. Technical Communication Quarterly 17, no. 1: 10-34) Two 2008 case studies show that the layout of a system provides a strong correlation to the ease of use for a system and that it proved more beneficial for the design to focus on presenting information in a way that reflected the most important goals and tasks of the user, rather than the structure of the organization.( This ease of service is paramount for developing a system that is usable.(Desbarats, Gus. 1995. Usability: form that says function. Industrial Management & Data Systems 95, no. 5:3-6.)In many cases, the growth of capabilities and complexities of systems has hampered the usability of a customer relationship management system. An overly complex computer system can result in an equally complex and non-friendly user interface, thus not allowing the system to work as fully intended.( This bloated software can appear sluggish and/or overwhelming to the user, keeping the system from full use and potential. A series of 1998 research indicates that each item added to an information display can significantly affect the overall experience of the user.(Kostelnick, Charles. Conflicting Standards for Designing Data Displays: Following, Flouting, and Reconciling Them. Technical Communication 45, no. 4 (November 1998): 473)FragmentationOften, poor usability can lead to implementations that are fragmented &mdash; isolated initiatives by individual departments to address their own needs. Systems that start disunited usually stay that way: thinking and decision processes frequently lead to separate and incompatible systems, and dysfunctional processes.A fragmented implementation can negate any financial benefit associated with a customer relationship management system, as companies choose not to use all the associated features factored when justifying the investment.(Pennington, Lori L. 2007. Surviving the Design and Implementation of a Content-Management System. Journal of Business & Technical Communication 21, no. 1:62-73.) Instead, it is important that support for the CRM system is companywide.( The challenge of fragmented implementations may be mitigated with improvements in late-generation CRM systems.(Joachim, David. CRM tools improve access, usability. (cover story). B to B 87, no. 3 (March 11, 2002): 1.)Business reputationBuilding and maintaining a strong business reputation has become increasingly challenging. The outcome of internal fragmentation that is observed and commented upon by customers is now visible to the rest of the world in the era of the social customer; in the past, only employees or partners were aware of it. Addressing the fragmentation requires a shift in philosophy and mindset in an organization so that everyone considers the impact to the customer of policy, decisions and actions. Human response at all levels of the organization can affect the customer experience for good or ill. Even one unhappy customer can deliver a body blow to a business.(Mei Lin Fung, You can learn from Dell Hell, Dell did customerthink.com)Some developments and shifts have made companies more conscious of the life-cycle of a customer relationship management system.( Companies now consider the possibility of brand loyalty and persistence of its users to purchase updates, upgrades and future editions of software.(Additionally, CRM systems face the challenge of producing viable financial profits, with a 2002 study suggesting that less than half of CRM projects are expected to provide a significant return on investment.(Goldberg, Harold. 10 ways to avoid CRM pitfalls. B to B 86, no. 17 (September 17, 2001): 11.) Poor usability and low usage rates lead many companies to indicate that it was difficult to justify investment in the software without the potential for more tangible gains.(Security concernsA large challenge faced by developers and users is found in striking a balance between ease of use in the CRM interface and suitable and acceptable security measures and features. Corporations investing in CRM software do so expecting a relative ease of use while also requiring that customer and other sensitive data remain secure. This balance can be difficult, as many believe that improvements in security come at the expense of system usability.(Ka-Ping, Yee. User Interaction Design for Secure Systems. Information and Communication Security 2513, no. (2002): 278-290.)Research and study show the importance of designing and developing technology that balances a positive user interface with security features that meet industry and corporate standards.(Cieslak, David, and Bob Gaby. Programs Provide Extensive Tools For Adaptability And Customization. CPA Technology Advisor 16, no. 8 (December 2006): 38.) A 2002 study shows, however, that security and usability can coexist harmoniously.( In many ways, a secure CRM system can become more usable.Researchers have argued that, in most cases, security breaches are the result of user-error (such as unintentionally downloading and executing a computer virus). In these events, the computer system acted as it should in identifying a file and then, following the users orders to execute the file, exposed the computer and network to a harmful virus. Researchers argue that a more usable system creates less confusion and lessens the amount of potentially harmful errors, in turn creating a more secure and stable CRM system.(writers can play a large role in developing customer relationship management systems that are secure and easy to use. A series of 2008 research shows that CRM systems, among others, need to be more open to flexibility of technical writers, allowing these professionals to become content builders.(Whittemore, Stewart. Metadata and Memory: Lessons from the Canon of Memoria for the Design of Content Management Systems. Technical Communication Quarterly 17, no. 1 (Winter 2008): 88-109.) These professionals can then gather information and use it at their preference, developing a system that allows users to easily access desired information and is secure and trusted by its users.Types/variationsSales force automationforce automation (SFA) involves using software to streamline all phases of the sales process, minimizing the time that sales representatives need to spend on each phase. This allows a business to use fewer sales representatives to manage their clients. At the heart of SFA is a management system for tracking and recording every stage in the sales process for each prospective client, from initial contact to final disposition. Many SFA applications also include insights into opportunities, territories, sales forecasts and workflow automation, quote generation, and product knowledge. Modules for Web 2.0 e-commerce and pricing are new, emerging interests in SFA.(MarketingCRM systems for marketing help the enterprise identify and target potential clients and generate leads for the sales team. A key marketing capability is tracking and measuring multichannel campaigns, including email, search, social media, telephone and direct mail. Metrics monitored include clicks, responses, leads, deals, and revenue. Alternatively, Prospect Relationship Management (PRM) solutions offer to track customer behaviour and nurture them from first contact to sale, often cutting out the active sales process altogether.In a web-focused marketing CRM solution, organizations create and track specific web activities that help develop the client relationship. These activities may include such activities as free downloads, online video content, and online web presentations.Customer service and supportRecognizing that service is an important factor in attracting and retaining customers, organizations are increasingly turning to technology to help them improve their clients experience while aiming to increase efficiency and minimize costs.(SAP Insider (15 November 2007) Still Struggling to Reduce Call Center Costs Without Losing Customers?) Even so, a 2009 study revealed that only 39% of corporate executives believe their employees have the right tools and authority to solve client problems.(Strativity Group, Inc. (2009) Global Customer Experience Management Benchmark Study)AppointmentCreating and scheduling appointments with customers is a central activity of most customer oriented businesses.  Sales, customer support, and service personnel regularly spend a portion of their time getting in touch with customers and prospects through a variety of means to agree on a time and place for meeting for a sales conversation or to deliver customer service.  Appointment CRM is a relatively new CRM platform category in which an automated system is used to offer a suite of suitable appointment times to a customer via e-mail or through a web site.  An automated process is used to schedule and confirm the appointment, and place it on the appropriate persons calendar.  Appointment CRM systems can be an origination point for a sales lead and are generally integrated with sales and marketing CRM systems to capture and store the interaction.AnalyticsRelevant analytics capabilities are often interwoven into applications for sales, marketing, and service. These features can be complemented and augmented with links to separate, purpose-built applications for analytics and business intelligence. Sales analytics let companies monitor and understand client actions and preferences, through sales forecasting and data quality.Marketing applications generally come with analytics to improve segmentation and targeting, and features for measuring the effectiveness of online, offline, and search marketing campaigns. Web analytics have evolved significantly from their starting point of merely tracking mouse clicks on Web sites. By evaluating buy signals, marketers can see which prospects are most likely to transact and also identify those who are bogged down in a sales process and need assistance. Marketing and finance personnel also use analytics to assess the value of multi-faceted programs as a whole.These types of analytics are increasing in popularity as companies demand greater visibility into the performance of call centers and other service and support channels,( in order to correct problems before they affect satisfaction levels. Support-focused applications typically include dashboards similar to those for sales, plus capabilities to measure and analyze response times, service quality, agent performance, and the frequency of various issues.Integrated/collaborativeDepartments within enterprises  especially large enterprises  tend to function with little collaboration.(InsideCRM (2007) Get It Together with Collaborative CRM) More recently, the development and adoption of these tools and services have fostered greater fluidity and cooperation among sales, service, and marketing. This finds expression in the concept of collaborative systems that use technology to build bridges between departments. For example, feedback from a support center can enlighten marketers about specific services and product features clients are asking for. Reps, in their turn, want to be able to pursue these opportunities without the burden of re-entering records and contact data into a separate SFA system.Small businessFor business, basic client service can be accomplished by a contact manager system: an integrated solution that lets organizations and individuals efficiently track and record interactions, including emails, documents, jobs, faxes, scheduling, and more. These tools usually focus on accounts rather than on individual contacts. They also generally include opportunity insight for tracking sales pipelines plus added functionality for marketing and service. As with larger enterprises, small businesses are finding value in online solutions, especially for mobile and telecommuting workers.Social mediamedia sites like Twitter, LinkedIn and Facebook are amplifying the voice of people in the marketplace and are having profound and far-reaching effects on the ways in which people buy. Customers can now research companies online and then ask for recommendations through social media channels, making their buying decision without contacting the company.People also use social media to share opinions and experiences on companies, products and services. As social media is not as widely moderated or censored as mainstream media, individuals can say anything they want about a company or brand, positive or negative.Increasingly, companies are looking to gain access to these conversations and take part in the dialogue. More than a few systems are now integrating to social networking sites. Social media promoters cite a number of business advantages, such as using online communities as a source of high-quality leads and a vehicle for sourcing solutions to client-support problems. Companies can also leverage client stated habits and preferences to hyper-target their sales and marketing communications.(DestinationCRM.com (2009) Who Owns the Social Customer?)Some analysts take the view that business-to-business marketers should proceed cautiously when weaving social media into their business processes. These observers recommend careful market research to determine if and where the phenomenon can provide measurable benefits for client interactions, sales and support.(Clara Shih, DestinationCRM.com (2009) Sales and Social Media: No Ones social (Yet)) It is stated that people feel their interactions are peer-to-peer between them and their contacts, and resent company involvement, sometimes responding with negatives about that company.Non-profit and membership-basedSystems for non-profit and membership-based organizations help track constituents and their involvement in the organization. Capabilities typically include tracking the following: fund-raising, demographics, membership levels, membership directories, volunteering and communications with individuals.Many include tools for identifying potential donors based on previous donations and participation. In light of the growth of social networking tools, there may be some overlap between social/community driven tools and non-profit/membership tools.Custom CRMCustom CRM software is developed specifically for one client. The advantage of Custom CRM software is that it will have all required functionality, exactly as a client needs it to be. With Custom CRM software, modifications will not be needed. Pre-written software sometimes has missing functionality, causing companies to use multiple software systems.StrategyFor larger-scale enterprises, a complete and detailed plan is required to obtain the funding, resources, and company-wide support that can make the initiative of choosing and implementing a system successfully. Benefits must be defined, risks assessed, and cost quantified in three general areas:*Processes: Though these systems have many technological components, business processes lie at its core. It can be seen as a more client-centric way of doing business, enabled by technology that consolidates and intelligently distributes pertinent information about clients, sales, marketing effectiveness, responsiveness, and market trends. Therefore, a company must analyze its business workflows and processes before choosing a technology platform; some will likely need re-engineering to better serve the overall goal of winning and satisfying clients. Moreover, planners need to determine the types of client information that are most relevant, and how best to employ them.(*People: For an initiative to be effective, an organization must convince its staff that the new technology and workflows will benefit employees as well as clients. Senior executives need to be strong and visible advocates who can clearly state and support the case for change. Collaboration, teamwork, and two-way communication should be encouraged across hierarchical boundaries, especially with respect to process improvement.(TechTarget (2009) Strategy Checklist: Planning for CRM and Customer Service Success)*Technology: In evaluating technology, key factors include alignment with the companys business process strategy and goals, including the ability to deliver the right data to the right employees and sufficient ease of adoption and use. Platform selection is best undertaken by a carefully chosen group of executives who understand the business processes to be automated as well as the software issues. Depending upon the size of the company and the breadth of data, choosing an application can take anywhere from a few weeks to a year or more.(ImplementationImplementation issuesIncreases in revenue, higher rates of client satisfaction, and significant savings in operating costs are some of the benefits to an enterprise. Proponents emphasize that technology should be implemented only in the context of careful strategic and operational planning.() Implementations almost invariably fall short when one or more facets of this prescription are ignored:* Poor planning: Initiatives can easily fail when efforts are limited to choosing and deploying software, without an accompanying rationale, context, and support for the workforce.() In other instances, enterprises simply automate flawed client-facing processes rather than redesign them according to best practices.* Poor integration: For many companies, integrations are piecemeal initiatives that address a glaring need: improving a particular client-facing process or two or automating a favored sales or client support channel.(SAP white paper (2003) CRM Without Compromise) Such point solutions offer little or no integration or alignment with a companys overall strategy. They offer a less than complete client view and often lead to unsatisfactory user experiences.* Toward a solution: overcoming siloed thinking. Experts advise organizations to recognize the immense value of integrating their client-facing operations. In this view, internally-focused, department-centric views should be discarded in favor of reorienting processes toward information-sharing across marketing, sales, and service. For example, sales representatives need to know about current issues and relevant marketing promotions before attempting to cross-sell to a specific client. Marketing staff should be able to leverage client information from sales and service to better target campaigns and offers. And support agents require quick and complete access to a clients sales and service history.(Adoption issuesHistorically, the landscape is littered with instances of low adoption rates. Many of the challenges listed above offer a glimpse into some of the obstacles that corporations implementing a CRM suite face; in many cases time, resources and staffing do not allow for the troubleshooting necessary to tackle an issue and the system is shelved or sidestepped instead.Why is it so difficult sometimes to get employees up to date on rapidly developing new technology? Essentially, your employees need to understand how the system works, as well as understand the clients and their needs. No doubt this process is time consuming, but it is well worth the time and effort, as you will be better able to understand and meet the needs of your clients. CRM training needs to cover two types of information: relational knowledge and technological knowledge.StatisticsIn 2003, a Gartner report estimated that more than $1 billion had been spent on software that was not being used. More recent research indicates that the problem, while perhaps less severe, is a long way from being solved. According to CSO Insights, less than 40 percent of 1,275 participating companies had end-user adoption rates above 90 percent.(Jim Dickie, CSO Insights (2006) Demystifying CRM Adoption Rates) Additionally, many corporations only use CRM systems on a partial or fragmented basis, thus missing opportunities for effective marketing and efficiency.(Joachim, David. CRM tools improve access, usability. (cover story). B to B 87, no. 3 (March 11, 2002): 1)In a 2007 survey from the U.K., four-fifths of senior executives reported that their biggest challenge is getting their staff to use the systems they had installed. Further, 43 percent of respondents said they use less than half the functionality of their existing system; 72 percent indicated they would trade functionality for ease of use; 51 percent cited data synchronization as a major issue; and 67 percent said that finding time to evaluate systems was a major problem.(David Sims, TMC.net (2007) CRM Adoption Biggest Problem in 83 Percent of Cases) With expenditures expected to exceed $11 billion in 2010,( enterprises need to address and overcome persistent adoption challenges.The amount of time needed for the development and implementation of a customer relationship management system can prove costly to the implementation as well. Research indicates that implementation timelines that are greater than 90 days in length run an increased risk in the CRM system failing to yield successful results.(Increasing usage and adoption ratesSpecialists offer these recommendations( for boosting adoptions rates and coaxing users to blend these tools into their daily workflow:Additionally, researchers found the following themes were common in systems that users evaluated favorably. These positive evaluations led to the increased use and more thorough implementation of the CRM system. Further recommendations include(Cappel, James J., and Huang Zhenyu. A Usability Analysis of Company Websites. Journal of Computer Information Systems 48, no. 1 (Fall2007 2007): 117-123.)* Breadcrumb Trail: This offers the user a path, usually at the top of a web or CRM page, to return to the starting point of navigation. This can prove useful for users who might find themselves lost or unsure how they got to the current screen in the CRM.* Readily available search engine boxes: Research shows that users are quick to seek immediate results through the use of a search engine box. A CRM that uses a search box will keep assistance and immediate results quickly within the reach of a user.* Option Menu: An outlet for quick assistance or frequently asked questions can provide users with a lifeline that makes the customer relationship management software easier to use. Researchers suggest making this resource a large component of the CRM during the development stage.A larger theme is found in that the responsiveness, intuitive design and overall usability of a system can influence the users opinions and preferences of systems.(Gefen, David, and Catherine M. Ridings. Implementation Team Responsiveness and User Evaluation of Customer Relationship Management: A Quasi-Experimental Design Study of Social Exchange Theory. Journal of Management Information Systems 19, no. 1 (Summer 2002): 47-69.)Researchers noted a strong correlation between the design and layout of a user interface and the perceived level of trust from the user.(Roy, Marie Christine; Dewit, Olivier; Aubert, Benoit A. 2001. The impact of interface usability on trust in Web retailers. Internet Research 11, no. 5:388-398.) The researchers found that users felt more comfortable on a system evaluated as usable and applied that comfort and trust into increased use and adoption.Help menusOne of the largest issues surrounding the implementation and adoption of a CRM comes in the perceived lack of technical and user support in using the system. Individual users &mdash; and large corporations &mdash; find themselves equally stymied by a system that is not easily understood. Technical support in the form of a qualified and comprehensive help menu can provide significant improvement in implementation when providing focused, context-specific information.(Grayling, Trevor. Fear and loathing of the help menu: A usability test of online help. Technical Communication 45, no. 2 (May 1998): 168.)Data show that CRM users are oftentimes unwilling to consult a help menu if it is not easily accessible and immediate in providing assistance.( A 1998 case study found that users would consult the help menu for an average of two or three screens, abandoning the assistance if desired results werent found by that time.(Researchers believe that help menus can provide assistance to users through introducing additional screenshots and other visual and interactive aids.(Gellevij, Mark, and Hans Van Der Meij. Empirical Proof for Presenting Screen Captures in Software Documentation. Technical Communication 51, no. 2 (May 2004): 224-238.) A 2004 case study concluded that the proper use of screenshots can significantly support a users developing a mental model of the program and help in identifying and locating window elements and objects.( This research concluded that screen shots allowed users to learn more, make fewer mistakes, and learn in a shorter time frame, which can certainly assist in increasing the time frame for full implementation of a CRM system with limited technical or human support.(Experts have identified five characteristics to make a help menu effective:(Grayling, Trevor. If We Build It, Will They Come? A Usability Test of Two Browser-based Embedded Help Systems. Technical Communication 49, no. 2 (May 2002): 193.)* context-specific &mdash; the help menu contains only the information relevant to the topic that is being discussed or sought* useful &mdash; in conjunction with being context-specific, the help menu must be comprehensive in including all of the information that the user seeks* obvious to invoke &mdash; the user must have no trouble in locating the help menu or how to gain access to its contents* non-intrusive &mdash; the help menu must not interfere with the users primary path of work and must maintain a distance that allows for its use only when requested* easily available &mdash; the information of the help menu must be accessible with little or few steps requiredDevelopmentThoughtful and thorough development can avoid many of the challenges and obstacles faced in using and implementing a customer relationship management system. With shifts in competition and the increasing reliance by corporations to use a CRM system, development of software has become more important than ever.(Desbarats, Gus. 1995. Usability: form that says function. Industrial Management & Data Systems 95, no. 5:3-6) Technical communicators can play a significant role in developing software that is usable and easy to navigate.(Whittemore, Stewart. Metadata and Memory: Lessons from the Canon of Memoria for the Design of Content Management Systems. Technical Communication Quarterly 17, no. 1 (Winter2008 2008): 88-109)ClarityOne of the largest issues in developing a usable customer relationship management system comes in the form of clear and concise presentation. Developers are urged to consider the importance of creating software that is easy to understand and without unnecessary confusion, thus allowing a user to navigate the system with ease and confidence.Strong writing skills can prove extremely beneficial for software development and creation. A 1998 case study showed that software engineering majors who successfully completed a technical writing course created capstone experience projects that were more mindful of end user design than the projects completed by their peers.(Mirel, Barbara, and Leslie A. Olsen. Social and cognitive effects of professional communication on software usability. Technical Communication Quarterly 7, no. 2 (Spring98 1998): 197) The case study yielded significant results:* Students who completed the technical writing course submitted capstone projects that contained more vivid and explicit detail in writing than their peers who did not complete the course. Researchers note that the students appeared to weigh multiple implications on the potential user, and explained their decisions more thoroughly than their peers.* Those participating in the writing course sought out test users more frequently to add a perspective outside their own as developer. Students appeared sensitive of the users ability to understand the developed software.* The faculty member overseeing the capstone submissions felt that students who did not enroll in the technical writing class were at a significant disadvantage when compared to their peers who did register for the course.In the case study, researchers argue for the inclusion of technical writers in the development process of software systems. These professionals can offer insight into usability in communication for software projects.( Technical writing can help build a unified resource for successful documentation, training and execution of customer relationship management systems.(Pennington, Lori L. 2007. Surviving the Design and Implementation of a Content-Management System. Journal of Business & Technical Communication 21, no. 1:62-73)Test usersIn many circumstances, test users play a significant role in developing software. These users offer software developers an outside perspective of the project, oftentimes helping developers gain insight into potential areas of trouble that might have been overlooked or passed over because of familiarity with the system. Test users can also provide feedback from a targeted audience: a software development team creating a customer relationship management software system for higher education can have a user with a similar profile explore the technology, offering opportunities to cater the further development of the system. Test users help developers discover which areas of the software perform well, and which areas require further attention.(Hegh, Rune Thaarup, and Janne Jul Jensen. A case study of three software projects: can software developers anticipate the usability problems in their software?. Behaviour & Information Technology 27, no. 4 (July 2008): 307-312.)Research notes that test users can prove to be most effective in providing developers a structured overview of the software creation.( These users can provide a fresh perspective that can reflect on the state of the CRM development without the typically narrow or invested focus of a software developer.A 2007 study suggests some important steps are needed in creating a quality and effective test environment for software development.(Hegh, R. Th. Case study: integrating usability activities in a software development process. Behaviour & Information Technology 27, no. 4 (July 2008): 301-306.) In this case study, researchers observed a Danish software company in the midst of new creating new software with usability in mind. The study found these four observations most appropriate:* The developers must make a conscious effort and commitment to the test user. Researchers note that the company had dedicated specific research space and staff focused exclusively on usability.* Usability efforts must carry equal concern in the eyes of developers as other technology-related concerns in the creation stage. The study found that test users became discouraged when items flagged as needing attention were marked as lower priority by the software developers.* Realistic expectations from both test users and software developers help maintain a productive environment. Researchers note that developers began to limit seeking input from test users after the test users suggested remedies the developers felt were improbable, leading the developers to believe consulting the test users would only prove to be more work.* Developers must make themselves available to test users and colleagues alike throughout the creation process of a software system.The researchers note that some of the best instances of usability adjustments can be made through casual conversation, and that oftentimes usability is bypassed by developers because these individuals never think to consult test users.Allowing users to test developing products can have its limits in effectiveness, as the culture of the industry and desired outcomes can affect the effect on CRM creation,(Iivari, N. Representing the User in software developmenta cultural analysis of usability work in the product development context. Interacting with Computers 18, no. 4 (July 2006): 635-664) as a 2008 case study suggests that the responsiveness of test users can vary dramatically depending on the industry and field of the user.Research suggests that test users can rate the importance or severity of potential software issues in a significantly different fashion than software developers.( Similarly so, researchers note the potential for costly delay if developers spend too much time attempting to coerce hesitant test users from participating.(Additionally, involving too many test users can prove cumbersome and delay the development of a CRM system.(  Additional research notes that test users may be able to identify an area that proves challenging in a software system, but might have difficulty explaining the outcome. A related 2007 case study noted that test users were able to describe roughly a third of the usability problems.( Further, the language used by test users in many circumstances proves to be quite general and lacking the specific nature needed by developers to enact real change. Privacy and data security systemOne of the primary functions of these tools is to collect information about clients, thus a company must consider the desire for privacy and security, as well as the legislative and cultural norms. Some clients prefer assurances that their data will not be shared with third parties without their prior consent and that safeguards are in place to prevent illegal access by third parties.Market structuresThis market grew by 12.5 percent in 2008, from revenue of $8.13 billion in 2007 to $9.15 billion in 2008.(DestinationCRM.com (2009) CRM Market Grows for Fifth Straight Year) The following table lists the top vendors in 2006-2008 (figures in millions of US dollars) published in Gartner studies.()()Related trendsMany CRM vendors offer Web-based tools (computing) and as a service (SaaS), which are accessed via a secure Internet connection and displayed in a Web browser. These applications are sold as subscriptions, with customers not needing to invest in purchasing and maintaining IT hardware, and subscription fees are a fraction of the cost of purchasing software outright.The era of the social customer(Greenberg, Paul, CRM at the Speed of Light, McGraw Hill 4th Edition, page 7) refers to the use of social media (Twitter, Facebook, LinkedIn, Yelp, customer reviews in Amazon etc.) by customers in ways that allow other potential customers to glimpse real world experience of current customers with the sellers products and services. This shift increases the power of customers to make purchase decisions that are informed by other parties sometimes outside of the control of the seller or sellers network. In response, CRM philosophy and strategy has shifted to encompass social networks and user communities, podcasting, and personalization in addition to internally generated marketing, advertising and webpage design. With the spread of self-initiated customer reviews, the user experience of a product or service requires increased attention to design and simplicity, as customer expectations have risen. CRM as a philosophy and strategy is growing to encompass these broader components of the customer relationship, so that businesses may anticipate and innovate to better serve customers, referred to as CRM.Another related development is relationship management, or VRM, which is the customer-side counterpart of CRM: tools and services that equip customers to be both independent of vendors and better able to engage with them. VRM development has grown out of efforts by ProjectVRM at Harvards Center for Internet & Society and Commons Internet Identity Workshops, as well as by a growing number of startups and established companies. VRM was the subject of a cover story in the May 2010 issue of CRM Magazine.(Destinationcrm.com CRM Magazine: May, 2010)In a 2001 research note, META Group (now Gartner) analyst Doug Laney first proposed, defined and coined the term Extended Relationship Management (XRM).(xRM.com xRM Defined). He defined XRM as the principle and practice of applying CRM disciplines and technologies to other core enterprise constituents, primarily partners, employees and suppliers... as well as other secondary allies including government, press, and industry consortia. Microsoft markets its Dynamics CRM as xRM for its extensibility for potential XRM-ish uses beyond customer data.See also* online assistant* intelligence* relationship management* of CRM systems* relationship system* experience* experience transformation* intelligence* service  contains ISO standards* management* marketing* mining* marketing* E-crm* experience management (EEM)* feedback management (EFM)* File* desk* shopping* relationship management (PRM)* analytics* services automation software (PSA)* relations* force management system* intelligence* process engineering* automation* relationship management* International Customer Service Institute - contains service standards* relationship management or VRMNotes vztah se zkaznkyda:CRMde:Customer-Relationship-Managementrelationship management  de la relation clientgl:CRM    hubungan pelangganrelationship management lo:attiecbu vadbalt:CRMhu:CRM     mn:CRMrelationship managementja:no:Kunderelasjonshndteringuz:CRMrelacjami z klientamirelationship managementro:CRM   vzahov so zkaznkmiodnosov s strankamifi:Asiakkuudenhallintarelationship management   l quan h khch hngyi:CRMzh-yue:zh:
7000
List_of_companies_of_Canada
This is a list of companies of Canada, businesses operating out of Canada, incorporated in Canada, or multinational companies with divisions located in Canada. This list excludes companies doing business in or with Canada which do not have articles of incorporation for a branch or division within Canada. This list does include past or defunct businesses. CompaniesA*Solutions (software development, consulting)*AbitibiBowater*Elle (womens clothing)*Communications*Credit Union (banking)*Resources Canada (uranium)*Canada (airline)*Power*Angoss Software Corporation (software)*Aritzia (clothing)*technologies (semiconductors)B*Power Systems*Lodging Co*of Montreal*West*Gold*Ventures Company*Hydro*Research Inc*Machine (vending machine manufacture)*Silicon (silicon manufacture)*Canada Enterprises*Bellstar*Environmental*Beckers*Moss Jewellers*Bellstar (hotel operator)*& Parr (law firm)*Blue Bubble (software firm)*BigPark (software firm)*Biovail*BioWare (video games)*Transport Inc. (Transportation)*Diamond Cheese Limited*Photo Corporation*Cassels & Graydon (law firm)*Radio*Art Industries (special effects)*Coffee*Water Studios (recording studio)*Inc.*Recreational Products spun off as an independent company in 2003*Canada*Pizza*City (Canada)*Brothers*Group Income Fund (Service)*Bre-X*Asset Management (assorted activities)*Bank*Technologies (display technology)*Solutions*Buck or Two Extreme Retail, Inc. (retail)*Buckleys*Industries Inc. (Manufacturing)*Power (Low carbon domestic & business electricity supplier)*Brewing Company*Power*(pharmacy)*Bluenotes*Energy (oil field services)*Barn (food retail) C *Fairview (property)*CAE (flight simulators and training)*Air (airline)*Cameco (uranium)*Deposit Insurance Corporation (Government-owned bank account insurance company)*Bank Note Company (money and passport printing)*Broadcasting Corporation (CBC) (Government-owned Canadian TV and Radio broadcaster)*Hydro Developers (power generation)*Canadian Light Source, Inc. (research)*National Railway (railway)*Natural Resources Ltd. (oil/gas)*Pacific Railway Limited (railway)*Oil Sands Trust (oil)*Salt Company*Steamship Lines (cargo shipping)*Tire (retail)*Tire Financial Services (credit card company)*Western Bank (banking)*Wheat Board (Agri-business)*Hotels Hotel Chain in Western Canada*Corp. (Biotech)*CanJet (Airline)*Canpotex potash export*Canwest (broadcast)*Operations (food services)*Ltd.*Frres*Cascades*Celestica*Gas Manitoba Inc. (Utility)*Heat Distribution (district heating Vancouver)*Mountain Air (airline)*Group (IT consulting)*Chapters*Limited (broadcast)*CIBC (banking)*Entertainment*du Soleil*Bank of Canada (banking)*Monaco*Insurance Company*Time (coffee shops)*Cognos (software)*Canada (Military equipments and Defence contractor)*Financial (financial services)*Credit Union (financial services)*& Associates (engineering)*Distilleries (alcohol)*Capital Inc. (Investment Management)*Corel (software)*Entertainment - a Canadian entertainment company*Books (publisher)*Cott*Style (coffee shops)*Communication Group*Ships*Coach*Group (standards/testing lab)*Television NetworkD*Canada*Farmers of Manitoba (Agri-business)*Dalsa*Flipcards Inc.*Hotels*Deloitte*Energy (well service company)*Extremes (video games, e.g., co-producer of Unreal Tournament)*Online Studios Canada (video game software developer)*Dofasco (Now owned by Luxembourgs Arcelor)*Dollarama (retail)*Domtar (pulp and paper company)*Games (video games, e.g., Painkiller, Crystal Key, Cold War)*EVE*Electrohome*Emera*EnCana*Enbridge*Lifting Systems & Equipment Inc*Enwave District heating/cooling in TorontoF*Hotels and Resorts*Ltd.*of North America*Fairweather*Eddies*Co-operatives*Insurance Company of Canada (Insurance)*Air*Nations Bank of Canada*Flickr (a popular photo sharing website - bought by Yahoo!)*Music (Media Company)*Group (sports retail)*Motor Company of Canada, Limited*Inc.*Seasons Hotel*Garry Brewery*FreshBooks*Shop*High SchoolG*Kney*Ganz*(store)*Motors Canada*General Dynamics Canada (defence technology)*Weston Limited (Foods)*Tiger (discount store)*Globe and Mail*GlobeScan*Goldcorp (gold)*Great-West Life Assurance Company*Living Soap Nuts (detergent manufacture)*Western Brewing Company*Biotechnologies*GuestLogix (POS terminal used in-flight by airlines)H*Enterprises Ltd*Rosen Inc. (retail)*Stores*Harveys*Ltd*Exploration Limited (uranium)*Hroux-Devtek*Valley Highlands*Canadian Industries*Hardware (retail)*Canada*Honeywell ASCa Inc. (Defence aerospace)*Bank Canada*Boatworks*Bay Company*Bay Mining and Smelting Co. Ltd. (Mining)*Energy*Hydro-QubecI*IDA (drug store)*Knowledge Services*Financial Inc. (Finance)*Therapeutics - bio-tech*Corporation*Group*Oil (Esso)*Books and Music*Research Group (IT research and consulting organization)*Services Corporation of Saskatchewan*Place Research Park (research parks)*Insurance Company of Prince Edward Island*Creatures (visual effects post-production company)*Pipeline Fund*Road Dynamics (traffic management systems)*Intrawest*Canada (financial software)*Saskatchewan*Group*Media*OilJ*Richardson & Sons, Limited (Conglomerate)*Jazz Air LP (airlines operates as Air Canada Jazz)*Jean Coutu (pharmacies)*Aviation Services*Pattison GroupK*Group*Tire*Flightcraft Ltd.**Flightcraft Air Charter*Gold*Kinova*Craft of Canada Ltd. (Manufacturing)*Inc.L*de Cravan (publishing)*Maison Simons (retail)*Brewing Company (now owned by Belgian brewer InBev)*MD*Lassonde Industries*Bank of Canada*Marketing (polls and market research)*Valley Tools (retail)*Leons*Linamar*Gate Entertainment*Control Board of Ontario*World (retail)*Watier*Loblaws*Drugs*Life Insurance Company*Communications*Lululemon (retail)*Longos (grocery store)M*Milk*Dettwiler*Genius Software*International (auto parts)*Hydro*Lotteries Corp. (Entertainment)*Liquor Control Commission (Specialty Retailing)*Manitoba Public Insurance Corp. (Insurance Services)*Telecom Services (MTS)*Financial*Leaf Sports & Entertainment (owner of Toronto Maple Leafs, Raptors)*Leaf Foods (food products)*Browns*Matrox*Life*Work Wearhouse*International big macKs weiners*Memotec*Mercedes-Benz Canada (cars)*Inc*Foods (worlds largest manufacturer of French fries)*and Stewart, book publishers*Canada*Inc.*Telecommunications (Owner of Fido digital wireless services)*Mitel*Molson*Moosehead*Coach Industries (Manufacturing)*Messaging*MuchMusicN*Bank of Canada*Nexen (oil/gas)*Nelvana (entertainment)*Training Corp (Information Technology)*Flyer Industries (Bus manufacture)*York Fries (fast food)*Nexient (corporate training)*Nintendo of Canada*Networks (telecommunications)*West Company (retail)*NorandaFalconbridge (mining)*Chemicals*Scotia Power*Technologies (OCT/profilometry)*Novelis (aluminum)*Power (green power)O*Brewery*Corporation*Lottery and Gaming Corporation*Text Corporation (software)*Bay Sports and Entertainment*Mining (gold) P * & Western Bank of Canada* Coastal Airlines (airline)* Furniture Ltd. (Manufacturing)* American Silver Corporation* GlobalFoods Inc. (Agri-business)* Resources* Para-Ordnance* Parasuco* Canada (food products)* & Heimbecker (grains)* Prairie Gun Works Defence Technologies Inc. (Defence weapon systems)* Plant Systems (pharmaceuticals) * Communications* Petro-Canada (retail gasoline chain & refiner)* Nova* Pizza* Plant Systems* PMC-Sierra* Banknote Ltd. (Printing)* Airlines (airline)* Corporation of Saskatchewan* Corporation of Canada* & Whitney Canada (Aerospace)* Presagis (Defence software)* Drilling* Car (Bus Manufacturer Wholly Owned by Volvo AB)* Canadian Income Fund* Airways (airline)* Propt* Protecode* Courier (point to point package delivery)Q*QNX (software - operating systems)*Quebecor (printing / media)R* Back Mining (gold)* Maple Leaf Communications Inc. (Publication) * Express Lines Ltd. (Transportation)* In Motion (Wireless device company best known as the developer of the BlackBerry)* Inc. (Agri-business)* Canada* Bank of Canada (Banking)S*Stores (retail)*Hotels*Sandvine (networking equipment)*Saputo (dairy products)*Government Insurance (insurance)*Minerals (sodium sulphate)*SRC (research)*SaskPower (electricity)*SaskTel (Telecom)*Save-on-Foods*Savvica*Vacuum Technology Ltd (Schmalz Canada)*Scotiabank (Bank of Nova Scotia)*Paper Limited*Canada*Cup*Stelco*Cable*Canada*Drug Mart (drug store chain)*Tilbe Irwin + Partners*Transportation Group*Wireless*Canada - salt*Aviation Software*Breweries*Country Canada (mattresses)*smart Canada manufacturer of the smart fortwo, part of Mercedes-Benz Canada*SNC-Lavalin (engineering)*Sobeys*Softimage*Interactive*Energy (energy)*Life Assurance*Sun-Rype (food and beverage)*Aerospace Group Limited (model rockets and hobbies)*Syncrude*Corporation*ChaletT*TM4 Electrodymanic systems (Hydro-Qubec)*& T Supermarket*(mining company)*Energy*Developments Corporation*Mines Limited*Waterhouse Group*Evaluation Centers*Cominco*Canada*Telus (telecommunications)*Tembec*Gas (formerly BC Gas)*Bargain! Shop*Brick*North West Company Fund (Merchant)*Ocean Group*Wawanesa Mutual Insurance Co. (Insurance)*Hortons*World Coffee*Source by Circuit City*Corporation*Group*Aces Incorporated (Defence contractor)*Tolko (forestry)*Bank*Stock Exchange*Torstar*Corp.(pipelines) (Appointed by Joy DSouza)*Limited*Air*Tridel*Five GroupU* Ultramar - marketers and refiners of petroleum* Furniture WarehouseV*and Infectious Disease Organization (research)*Vancity (Vancouver City Savings Credit Union) (Banking)*Rail (government-owned passenger train service)*Nano (nanomaterials)W*Canada (retail)*Engineering Inc. (engineering services)*Waterloo Maple Inc. (mathematical software)*Fraser Timber (wood products)*Oil Sands (oil)*WestJet (airline)*Wind Aviation (airline and air services)*Wildcard Pictures (film festival organizer)*Ltd. (Manufacturing)*Airport Services (airlines ground handling)*WinnersX*Xandros (software)*Radio CanadaY*Gold Inc.*Belle Plaine (fertilizer)*FrzZ*Zarlink (semiconductor)*ZENN (motor company)*Environmental (water treatment)*Zellers See also *of Canadian electric utilities*of Canadian mobile phone companies*of mutual fund companies in Canada*of Canadian telephone companies References  dentreprises canadiennesperusahaan di Kanada 
7067
Cook_Islands
footnotes The Cook Islands  (Cook Islands Mori: Kki irani)(Cook Islands Maori dictionary by Jasper Buse & Raututi Taringa, Cook Islands Ministry of Education (1995) page 200) is a self-governing parliamentary democracy in free association with Zealand. The 15 small islands in this South Pacific Ocean country have a total land area of , but the Cook Islands Economic Zone (EEZ) covers  of ocean.(A View from the Cook Islands SOPAC)The main population centres are on the island of Rarotonga (14,153 as of 2006), where there is an international airport. There is also a much larger population of Cook Islanders in New Zealand, particularly the Island. In the 2006 census, 58,008 self-identified as being of ethnic Island Mori descent.()With over 90,000 visitors travelling to the islands in 2006, tourism is the countrys main industry, and the leading element of the economy, far ahead of offshore banking, pearls, and marine and fruit exports.Defence and foreign affairs are the responsibility of Zealand, in consultation with the Cook Islands. In recent times, the Cook Islands have adopted an increasingly independent foreign policy. Although Islanders are citizens of New Zealand, they have the status of Cook Islands nationals, which is not given to all New Zealand citizens.Geographyright|thumb|250px|Map of the Cook Islands.The Cook Islands are in the South Pacific Ocean, north-east of New Zealand, between Polynesia and Samoa. There are 15 major islands, spread over 2.2 million km of ocean, divided into two distinct groups: the Southern Cook Islands, and the Northern Cook Islands of coral atolls.(Cook Islands Travel Guide (with description), World Travel Guide, Nexus Media Communications, 2006. Webpage: WTGuide-Cook-Islands.)The islands were formed by volcanic activity; the northern group is older and consists of six atolls (sunken volcanoes topped by coral growth). The climate is moderate to tropical.The 15 islands and two reefs are grouped as follows:*Southern Cook Islands:**Nga-pu-Toru (Three Roots, the group name for the easternmost islands of Southern Group):***Atiu (Enua Manu or Island of Birds)***Mauke (Akatokamanava)***Mitiaro (Nukuroa)***Takutea**Remaining islands of the South:***Aitutaki (Araura Enua)***Mangaia (Auau Enua)***Rarotonga (Tumutevarovaro) and also with the capital, Avarua.***Island (Pamati) sometimes grouped with the Northern Group.***Manuae***Winslow Reef (submerged)*Northern Cook Islands:**Manihiki (Te Fuinga o Niva)**Nassau (Te Nuku o Ngalewu )**Island (Tongareva or Mangarongaro)**Pukapuka (Te Ulu o te Watu)**Rakahanga (Tapuahua)**Suwarrow also called Suvorov**Reef (submerged)HistoryImage:rarotonga beach.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Beach on Rarotonga.The Cook Islands were first settled in the 6th century CE by people who migrated from nearby Tahiti, to the southeast.(Cook Islands Samoa2007.com)Spanish ships visited the islands in the 16th century; the first written record of contact with the Islands came with the sighting of Pukapuka by Spanish sailor de Mendaa de Neira in 1595 who called it San Bernardo (Saint Bernard). Portuguese-Spaniard Fernndez de Quirs, made the first recorded European landing in the islands when he set foot on Rakahanga in 1606, calling it Gente Hermosa (Beautiful People).(European discovery of the Cook Islands by Brian Hooker)British navigator Captain Cook arrived in 1773 and 1777(Cook : the extraordinary voyages of Captain James Cook, 2003, by Nicholas Thomas, page 310-311.) and named the islands the Hervey Islands; the name Cook Islands, in honour of Cook, appeared on a Russian naval chart published in the 1820s.(Cook Islands Government website)In 1813, John Williams, a missionary on the Endeavour (not the same ship as that of Cook), made the first official sighting of the island of Rarotonga.(Ten Decades: The Australasian Centenary History of the London Missionary Society, Rev. Joseph King (Word document)) The first recorded landing on Rarotonga by Europeans was in 1814 by the Cumberland; trouble broke out between the sailors and the Islanders and many were killed on both sides.(History of the Cook Islands) The islands saw no more Europeans until missionaries arrived from England in 1821. Christianity quickly took hold in the culture and many islanders continue to be Christian believers today.The Cook Islands became a British protectorate in 1888, due largely to community fears that France might occupy the territory as it had Tahiti. In 1901, the New Zealand Government decided to annex the country despite opposition from the countrys traditional chiefs. As many of the islands were independent and ruled by local chiefs, the Cook Islands had no federal statutory law to decide the constitutional constraints regarding whether to agree to the countrys annexation by the New Zealand Government. Nonetheless, the country remained a New Zealand protectorate until 1965, when the New Zealand Government decided to offer self governing status to its former colony. In that year, Henry of the Islands Party was elected as the first Minister. Sir Albert Henry led the country until he was accused of vote-rigging. He was succeeded in 1978 by Tom Davis of the Democratic Party.  Today, the Cook Islands are essentially independent, self-governing in free association with New Zealand. Politics and Foreign Relationsright|250px|thumb|The parliament building of the Cook Islands, formerly a hotel.The Cook Islands is a democracy with a system in an state relationship with New Zealand. power is exercised by the government with the Chief Minister as of government. power is vested in both the government and the of the Cook Islands. There is a pluriform multi-party system. The Judiciary is independent of the executive and the legislature. The of State is the Queen of New Zealand, who is represented in the Cook Islands by the Representative.The islands are self-governing in free association with Zealand.  New Zealand retains primary responsibility for external affairs, with consultation with the Cook Islands government.  Cook Islands nationals are citizens of New Zealand and can avail of New Zealand government services, but the reverse is not true; New Zealand citizens are not Cook Island nationals. Despite this, as of 2005, the Cook Islands had diplomatic relations in its own name with 18 other countries.  The Cook Islands is not a Nations full member, but does participate in WHO and UNESCO, and is an associate member of the Economic and Social Commission for Asia and the Pacific (UNESCAP).On 11 June 1980, the States signed a treaty with the Cook Islands specifying the maritime border between the Cook Islands and Samoa and also relinquishing its claim to the islands of Penrhyn, Pukapuka, Manihiki, and Rakahanga.() In 1990 the Cook Islands signed a treaty with France which delimited the boundary between the Cook Islands and Polynesia.()Administrative subdivisionsThere are island councils on all of the inhabited outer islands (Outer Islands Local Government Act 1987, with amendments up to 2004 and Palmerston Island Local Government Act 1993) except Nassau, which is governed by Pukapuka (Suwarrow, with only one caretaker living on the island, also governed by Pukapuka, is not counted with the inhabited islands in this context). Each council is headed by a mayor.;The ten Outer Islands councils are:The three vaka councils of main island Rarotonga established in 1997 (Rarotonga Local Government Act 1997), that were also headed by mayors,(http://www.transparency.org.au/documents/cookislands.pdf) were abolished in February 2008, despite much controversy(RAROTONGA LOCAL GOVERNMENT (REPEAL) BILL TO BE TABLED, Cook Islands Government and HERALD WEEKLY ISSUE 393 :09 February 2008);The three Vaka councils on the main island Rarotonga were:On the lowest level, there are village committees. Nassau, which is governed by Pukapuka, has an island committee (Nassau Island Committee), which advises the Pukapuka Island Council on matters concerning its own island.EconomyThe Economy of the Cook Islands is strongly affected by the Cook Islands geography. It is isolated from foreign markets, and has inadequate infrastructure. Furthermore, it lacks major natural resources and suffers greatly from natural disasters. Agriculture provides the economic base and manufacturing is limited.The economy is supported by foreign aid, largely from New Zealand. The Peoples Republic of China has also contributed foreign aid which has resulted, among other projects, in the Police Headquarters building. The Cook Islands is expanding its tourism, banking, mining and fishing sectors, with varying success.Culturethumb|300px|Float parade during the annual Maeva Nui celebrations.LanguageThe languages of the Cook Islands include English, Islands Mori, or Rarotongan, and Pukapukan. Dialects of Cook Islands Maori include Penrhyn; Rakahanga-Manihiki; the Ngaputoru dialect of Atiu, Mitiaro, and Mauke; the Aitutaki dialect; and the Mangaian dialect. Cook Islands Maori and its dialectic variants are closely related to both Tahitian and to Zealand Mori. Pukapukan, by contrast, is considered closely related to the language. English and Cook Islands Maori are considered languages of the Cook Islands.MusicMusic in the Cook Islands is varied, with Christian songs being quite popular, but traditional dancing and songs in Polynesian languages remain popular.Public holidaysArtCarvingFile:Cook Islands carved wood figure, British Museum.jpg|thumb|right|180px|Wood carved figure, escaped being emasculated, despite its missionary collectors; only one other comparable example is known, Museum.Woodcarving is a common art form in the Cook Islands. Sculpture in stone is much rarer although there are some excellent carvings in basalt by Mike Tavioni. The proximity of islands in the southern group helped produce a homogeneous style of carving but which had special developments in each island. Rarotonga is known for its fishermans gods and staff-gods, Atiu for its wooden seats, Mitiaro, Mauke and Atiu for mace and slab gods and Mangaia for its ceremonial adzes. Most of the original wood carvings were either spirited away by early European collectors or were burned in large numbers by missionary zealots. Today, carving is no longer the major art form with the same spiritual and cultural emphasis given to it by the Maori in New Zealand. However, there are continual efforts to interest young people in their heritage and some good work is being turned out under the guidance of older carvers. Atiu, in particular, has a strong tradition of crafts both in carving and local fibre arts such as tapa. Mangaia is the source of many fine adzes carved in a distinctive, idiosyncratic style with the so-called double-k design. Mangaia also produces food pounders carved from the heavy calcite found in its extensive limestone caves.WeavingThe outer islands produce traditional weaving of mats, basketware and hats. Particularly fine examples of rito hats are worn by women to church. They are made from the uncurled immature fibre of the coconut palm and are of very high quality. The Polynesian equivalent of Panama hats, they are highly valued and are keenly sought by Polynesian visitors from Tahiti. Often, they are decorated with hatbands made of minuscule pupu shells which are painted and stitched on by hand. Although pupu are found on other islands the collection and use of them in decorative work has become a speciality of Mangaia. The weaving of rito is a speciality of the northern island of Penrhyn.TivaevaeA major art form in the Cook Islands is tivaevae. This is, in essence, the art of handmade Island scenery patchwork quilts. Introduced by the wives of missionaries in the 19th century, the craft grew into a communal activity and is probably one of the main reasons for its popularity.Contemporary ArtThe Cook Islands has produced internationally recognised contemporary artists, especially in the main island of Rarotonga. Artists include painter (and photographer) Mahiriki Tangaroa, sculptors Eruera (Ted) Nia (originally a film maker) and master carver Mike Tavioni, painter (and Polynesian tattoo enthusiast) Upokoina Ian George, Aitutakian-born painter Tim Manavaroa Buchanan, Loretta Reynolds, Judith Kunzl, Joan Rolls Gragg, Kay George (who is also known for her fabric designs), Apii Rongo, and multi-media, installation and community-project artist Ani ONeil, all of whom currently live on the main island of Rarotonga. Atiuan-based Andrea Eimke is an artist who works in the medium of tapa and other textiles, and also co-authored the book Tivaivai - The Social Fabric of the Cook Islands with British academic Susanne Kuechler. Many of these artists have studied at university art schools in New Zealand and continue to enjoy close links with the New Zealand art scene.New Zealand-based Cook Islander artists include Michel Tuffrey, print-maker David Teata, Richard Shortland Cooper, Sylvia Marsters, and Jim Vivieaere.On Rarotonga, the main commercial galleries are Beachcomber Contemporary Art (Taputapuatea, Avarua) run by Ben Bergman, and The Art Gallery (Arorangi). The Cook Islands National Museum also exhibits art.Wildlife*The national flower of the Cook Islands is the Tiare mori or Tiale moli (Penrhyn, Nassau, Pukapuka).()*The Cook Islands are infested with Kiore toka (rat).(Cook Islands Biodiversity: Rattus rattus - Ship Rat) and rat(cookislands.bishopmuseum.org Cook Islands Biodiversity: Rattus exulans - Pacific Rat) The infestation has devastated the bird population on the islands.(Cook Islands Biodiversity: The Status of Cook Islands Birds - 1996)*In April 2007 27 Lorikeet were re-introduced to Atiu from Rimatara. Fossil and oral traditions indicate that the species was formerly on at least five islands of the southern group. Excessive exploitation for its red feathers is the most likely reason for the speciess extinction in the Cook Islands.(BirdLife International: Rimatara Lorikeet (Vini kuhlii) at birdlife.org)Sportunion is the most popular sport in the Cook Islands.() football (soccer) and rugby league are also popular.See also*of the Cook IslandsReferencesFurther reading*Gilson, Richard. The Cook Islands 1820-1950. Wellington, New Zealand: Victoria University Press, 1980. ISBN 0705507351External links* Cook Islands Government*Chief of State and Cabinet Members***Cook Islands from UCB Libraries GovPubs*list1  Cookaf:Cookeilandeang:CcegaCookCookadalarKn-tbo:ostrvaCook()CookostrovyCookda:Cookernede:CookinselnkupysaaredCookeo:KukinsulojCookUharteakIslandsCookCookCookOtojeio:Cook-InsuliCookis:Cooks-eyjarCookCookIslandsCookbya Kukevya CookCookCookSalasSalosCookhu:Cook-szigetekAiraniCooknl:Cookeilandenja:no:Cookyenenn:CookyaneCookCookaCookCookCookIslandsostrovyotokiOstrvafi:Cookinsaaretsv:Cookarnath:AdalarTaqim AralliriCooko CooksaarqCookKookIslandszh:
7072
Economy_of_the_Cook_Islands
The Economy of the Islands, as in many other South Pacific island nations, is hindered by the isolation of the country from foreign markets, lack of natural resources, periodic devastation from natural disasters, and inadequate infrastructure.Agriculture provides the economic base with major exports made up of copra and citrus fruit. Manufacturing activities are limited to fruit-processing, clothing, and handicrafts.Trade deficits are made up for by remittances from emigrants and by foreign aid, overwhelmingly from Zealand. Efforts to exploit tourism potential, encourage offshore banking, and expand the mining and fishing industries have been partially successful in stimulating investment and growth. Banking & finance The Islands has Home Rule with respect to banking, similar to Guernsey, Jersey and the of Man. This Home Rule banking confuses New Zealanders on vacation in the Cooks. Cook teller machines often fail to fully disclose the fact that the Cooks are not part of the New Zealand banking system, thus legally requiring banks to charge the same fees for withdrawing or transferring money as if the person was in Australia or the EU. The New Zealand Dollar is the official currency of the Cook Islands, adding to the confusion. Cook Islanders are NZ citizens.The banking and incorporation laws of the Cook Islands make it an important centre for setting up companies that are involved in global trade. Economic statistics ; GDP:: Purchasing power parity - $183.2 million (2005 est.); GDP - real growth rate: 0.1% (2005 estimate); GDP - per capita: $9 100 (2005 estimate); GDP - composition by sector::* Agriculture: 15.1%:* Industry: 9.6%:* Services: 75.3% (2000); Population below poverty line:: NA%; Household income or consumption by percentage share::* Lowest 10%: NA%:* Highest 10%: NA%; Inflation rate (consumer prices):: 2.1% (2005 est.); Labor force:: 6,820 (2001); Labor force - by occupation:: Agriculture 29%, industry 15%, services 56% (1995); Unemployment rate: 13.1% (2005); Budget::* Revenues:  $70.95 million:* Expenditures:  $69.05 million; including capital expenditures of $5.744 million (FY00/01 est.); Industries:: Fruit processing, tourism, fishing, clothing, handicrafts; Industrial production growth rate:: 1% (2002); Electricity - production:: 28 GWh (2003); Electricity - production by source::* Fossil fuel: 100%:* Hydro: 0%:* Nuclear: 0%:* Other: 0% (2001); Electricity - consumption:: 34.46 GWh (2005 est); Electricity - exports:: 0 kWh (2003); Electricity - imports:: 0 kWh (2003); Oil consumption::  (2003); Agriculture - products:: Copra, citrus, pineapples, tomatoes, beans, pawpaws, bananas, yams, taro, coffee, pigs, poultry; Exports:: $5.222 million (2005); Exports - commodities:: Copra, papayas, fresh and canned citrus fruit, coffee; fish; pearls and pearl shells; clothing; Exports - partners:: Australia 34%, Japan 27%, New Zealand 25%, US 8% (2004); Imports:: $81.04 million (2005); Imports - commodities:: Foodstuffs, textiles, fuels, timber, capital goods; Imports - partners:: New Zealand 61%, Fiji 19%, US 9%, Australia 6%, Japan 2% (2004); Debt - external:: $141 million (1996 est.); Economic aid - recipient:: $13.1 million (1995); note - New Zealand furnishes the greater part; Currency:: 1 New Zealand dollar (NZ$)  100 cents; Exchange rates:: New Zealand dollars (NZ$) per US$1 - 1.4203 (2005), 1.9451 (January 2000), 1.8886 (1999), 1.8632 (1998), 1.5083 (1997), 1.4543 (1996), 1.5235 (1995); Fiscal year:: 1 April&ndash;31 March Telecommunications Cook Islands Ltd (TCI) is the sole provider of telecommunications in the Cook Islands. TCI is a private company owned by New Zealand (TNZ) Ltd (60%) and the Cook Islands Government (40%). In operation since July 1991, TCI provides local, national and international telecommunications as well as internet access on all islands except Suwarrow. Communications to Suwarrow is via radio. References *CIA World Factbook, 2006* Cook Islands banking explained from TVNZ program Fair Go http://blip.tv/file/1356006/.* International calling info http://international-calling.info/call/cook-islands/des les Cookdi Cook-Insuli
7222
Choctaw
Muscogee (Creek), and later SeminoleThe Choctaw (alternatively spelled Chahta, Chactas, Chato, Tchakta, Chocktaw, and Chactaw) are a Native American people originally from the United States (Mississippi, Florida, Alabama, and Louisiana). The language belongs to the Muskogean linguistic group. Noted 20th century anthropologist Swanton suggested that the name was derived from a Choctaw leader.() Henry Halbert, a historian, suggests that their name is derived from the Choctaw phrase Hacha hatak (river people).()The Choctaw are descendants of the culture and Hopewellian people, who lived throughout the east of the River valley and its tributaries. The early Spanish explorers of the 16th century encountered their ancestors.() In the 19th century, the Choctaw were known as one of the Civilized Tribes because they adopted and integrated numerous cultural and technological practices of their American colonial neighbors. The Nation of Oklahoma and the Band of Choctaw Indians are the two primary Choctaw associations today, although smaller Choctaw groups are located in Alabama, Louisiana, and Texas.During the Revolution, most Choctaw supported the Colonies bid for independence from the British Crown. The Choctaw and the United States agreed to nine treaties. The last three treaties (Treaty of Doaks Stand, Washington City, and Dancing Rabbit) were designed to deracinate most Choctaw west of the River.U.S. President Andrew Jackson made the Choctaw exile a model of removal making them the first Native Americans to travel on the of Tears. The Choctaw were exiled (to the area now called Oklahoma) because the U.S. desired to expand territory available for settlement to European Americans,() wanted to save them from extinction,() and wanted to acquire their natural resources.()With ratification in 1831 of the of Dancing Rabbit Creek, those Choctaws who chose to stay in the newly formed state of Mississippi were the first major non-European ethnic group to become U.S. citizens.()()()() Article 22 sought to put a Choctaw representative in the U.S. House of Representatives.() The Choctaw began to seek political representation in the Congress of the United States in 1830.() During the Great Irish Famine (1845&ndash;1849) nearly twenty years prior to the founding of the Cross, the Choctaw were noted for their generosity in providing humanitarian relief for the people of Ireland.() During the Civil War, the Choctaw in both Oklahoma and Mississippi mostly sided with the States of America.After the Civil War, the Mississippi Choctaw fell into obscurity. The Choctaw in Oklahoma struggled to maintain a nation. In War I, they served in the U.S. military as the first Native American codetalkers, using the language as a natural code.HistoryNew World antiquityMany thousands of years ago groups known as Paleo-Indians lived in what today is referred to as the American South.() These groups were hunter-gatherers who hunted a wide range of animals, including the megafauna, which became extinct following the end of the Pleistocene age.( 19th-century historian Cushman noted that Choctaw accounts suggested their ancestors had known of mammoths in the River area; this suggests that the Choctaw ancestors had been in the Mississippi area for at least 4,000&ndash;8,000 years.() Cushman wrote: the ancient Choctaw through their tradition (said) they saw the mighty beasts of the forests, whose tread shook the earth.( Scholars believe that Paleo-Indians were specialized, highly mobile foragers who hunted late Pleistocene fauna such as bison, mastodons, caribou, and mammoths. Direct evidence in the Southeast is meager, but archaeological discoveries in related areas support this hypothesis.(Descent from the moundbuildersImage:Chromesun kincaid site 01.jpg|left|265px|thumb|Painting by Herb Roe depicting the Mississippian-culture Site in Illinois, c.1300 CE.Contemporary historian Patricia Galloway argues from fragmentary archaeological and cartographic evidence that the Choctaw did not exist as a unified people before the 17th century. Only then did various southeastern peoples, remnants of Moundville, Plaquemine, and other cultures, coalesce to form a self-consciously Choctaw people.() The homeland of the Choctaw, or of the peoples from whom the Choctaw nation arose, included the area of Waiya, an earthwork mound in present-day County, Mississippi, which they considered ground. Based on dating of surface artifacts, the mound was likely constructed and first occupied by peoples about 0-300 CE, in the Woodland period. The original site was bounded on three sides by an earthwork circular enclosure, about ten feet high and encompassing a square mile. Occupation of Nanih Waiya and several smaller nearby mounds likely continued through 700 CE, the Late Period. The smaller mounds may also have been built by later cultures. As they have been lost to cultivation since the late 19th century and the area has not been excavated, theories have been speculation.(Ken Carleton, Nanih Waiya: Mother Mound of the Choctaw, The Delta Endangered, Spring 1996, Vol.1 (1), NPS Archeology Program, accessed 16 November 2009)While the mound continued to be a ceremonial center and object of veneration, scholars do not believe it was occupied during the culture period. From the 17th century on, the Choctaw revered this site as the center of their origin stories, which also included stories of migration to this site from west of the great river (believed to refer to the Mississippi River.)(Ken Carleton, Nanih Waiya: Mother Mound of the Choctaw, The Delta Endangered, Spring 1996, Vol.1 (1), NPS Archeology Program, Common Ground, accessed 16 November 2009)In Histoire de La Louisiane (Paris, 1758), French explorer Le Page du Pratz recounted that ...when I asked them from whence the Chat-kas sic came, to express the suddenness of their appearance they replied that they had come out from under the earth. American scholars took this account as intended to explain the Choctaws immediate appearance, and not a literal creation account. It was perhaps the first European writing to contain the seed of the Choctaw origin story.()Romans- Natural History of East and West Florida()Early 19th century and contemporary Choctaw storytellers describe that the Choctaw people emerged from either Nanih Waiya or a cave nearby. A companion story describes their migration journey from the west, beyond the River, when they were directed by their leaders use of a sacred pole.Catlin- Smithsonian Report()Post-Columbian eraright|200px|thumb|A Mississippian era priest holding a ceremonial flint mace as envisioned by Herb Roe. 2004.The Choctaw ancestors were likely part of the culture in the Mississippi river valley. They were preceded by other moundbuilding cultures, of which people of one of the earliest built Nanih Waiya. Scholars believe the mound was contemporary with such earthworks as Igomar Mound in Mississippi and Mounds in Tennessee.(The Mississippian culture was a Native American culture that flourished in what is now the Midwestern, Eastern, and Southeastern United States from 800 to 1500 C.E. When the Spanish made their first forays inland in the 16th century from the shores of the Gulf of Mexico, they encountered some chiefdoms of the Mississippians, but others were already in decline, or had disappeared.() The culture is what the earliest Spanish explorers encountered, beginning on April 2, 1513, with Ponce de Lens Florida landing and the 1526 Vzquez de Aylln expedition in Carolina and Georgia region.()()Spanish Exploration (1540)After castaway Cabeza de Vaca of the ill-fated expedition returned to Spain, he described to the Court of de Soto that the New World was the richest country in the world. Hernando de Soto was a Spanish explorer and conquistador who led the first expedition into the interior of the North American continent. De Soto, convinced of the riches, wanted Cabeza de Vaca to accompany him on the expedition. Cabeza de Vaca declined because of a payment dispute of a ship.() From 1540&ndash;1543, Hernando de Soto travelled through Florida and Georgia, and then down into the Alabama and Mississippi area that would later be inhabited by the Choctaw.()De Soto had the best-equipped militia at the time. His well-known successes attracted people to his expedition in a quest for untold riches in the New World. As the brutalities of the de Soto expedition became known, ancestors to the Choctaw rose in defense. This battle, known as the Battle of Mabila, was a turning point for the de Soto venture. The battle broke the back of the campaign, and they never fully recovered.Bob Ferguson- Choctaw Chronology left|350px|thumb|Water color painting by Alexandre de Batz. Choctaw, holding scalps, are painted for war. Early 1700s.French Colonization (1682)In 1682 La Salle was the first French explorer to venture into the southeast along the Mississippi River.() His expedition did not meet with the Choctaw; it established a post along the River.( The post signaled to the English that the French were serious at colonization attempts in the American Deep South.( The Choctaw had to make allies with French colonists because the English had been taking Choctaws for the slave trade.(The first direct recorded contact between the Choctaw and the French was with Le Moyne dIberville in 1699; indirect contact had likely occurred between the Choctaw and British settlers through other tribes, including the Creek and Chickasaw. The Choctaw, along with other tribes, had formed a relationship with France, French Louisiana.() Illegal fur trading may have led to further unofficial contact. The archaeological record for this period between 1567 and 1699 is not complete or well-studied. It appears that some Mississippian settlements were abandoned well before the 17th century. Similarities in pottery coloring and burials suggest the following scenario for the emergence of the distinctive Choctaw society.The Choctaw region, generally located between the Natchez bluffs to the south and the Yazoo basin to the north, was slowly occupied by Burial Urn people from the Creek Indian Mounds area in the Alabama delta, along with remnants of the Moundville chiefdom that had collapsed some years before. Facing severe depopulation, they fled westward, where they combined with the Plaquemines and a group of prairie people living near the area. When this occurred is not clear. In the space of several generations, they created a new society which became known as Choctaw (albeit with a strong Mississippian background).United States relationsImage:Choctaw Village by Francois Bernard.jpg|375px|thumb|Choctaw Village near the Chefuncteby Bernard, 1869, Peabody Museum Harvard University, The women are preparing dye to color cane strips for making basketsDuring the Revolution, Choctaws divided over whether to support Britain or Spain. Chief Franchimastab led a Choctaw war party with British forces against American rebels in Natchez. The Americans had left by the time Franchimastab arrived, but the Choctaw occupied Natchez for weeks and convinced residents to remain loyal to Britain.() Other Choctaw companies joined Washingtons army during the war, and served the entire duration.( Bob Ferguson, a Southeastern Indian historian, noted, In 1775 the American Revolution began a period of new alignments for the Choctaws and other southern Indians. Choctaw scouts served under Washington, Morgan, Wayne and Sullivan.() Over a thousand Choctaw fought for Britain, largely against Spains campaigns along the Gulf Coast. At the same time, a significant number of Choctaw aided Spain.() After the Revolutionary War, the Choctaws were reluctant to ally themselves with countries hostile to the United States. R. Swanton wrote, the Choctaw were never at war with the Americans. A few were induced by Tecumseh (a Shawnee leader who sought support from various Native American tribes) to ally themselves with the hostile Creeks, but the Nation as a whole was kept out of anti-American alliances by the influence of Apushmataha, greatest of all Choctaw chiefs.() Ferguson also wrote that with the end of the Revolution,  Franchimastabe, Choctaw head chief, went to Georgia to secure American trade. In the next few years, some Choctaw scouts served in Ohio with U.S. Anthony Wayne in the Indian War.Washington (first U.S. President) and Knox (first U.S. Secretary of War) proposed the cultural transformation of Native Americans.() Washington believed that Native Americans were equals but that their society was inferior to that of the European Americans. He formulated a policy to encourage the civilizing process, and Jefferson continued it.() Historian Robert Remini wrote, They presumed that once the Indians adopted the practice of private property, built homes, farmed, educated their children, and embraced Christianity, these Native Americans would win acceptance from white Americans.()Washingtons six-point plan included impartial justice toward Indians; regulated buying of Indian lands; promotion of commerce; promotion of experiments to civilize or improve Indian society; presidential authority to give presents; and punishing those who violated Indian rights.() The government appointed agents, such as Hawkins, to live among the Indians and to teach them through example and instruction, how to live like whites.( The Choctaws accepted Washingtons policy as they established schools, adopted yeoman farming practices, converted to Christianity, and built houses like their colonial neighbors.George Washington, Proclamation Regarding Treaties, Regarding Treaties with the Cherokee, Choctaw and Chickasaw 1790.() Hopewell (1786)left|275px|thumb|Eagle Dance, 1835-37, Smithsonian American Art MuseumStarting in October 1785, Taboca, a Choctaw prophet/chief, led over 125 Choctaws to the Keowee, near Seneca Old Town, now known as Hopewell, South Carolina.() After two months of travel, they met with U.S. representatives Hawkins, Andrew Pickens, and Joseph Martin. In high Choctaw ceremonial symbolism, they named, adopted, smoked, and performed dances, revealing the complex and serious nature of Choctaw diplomacy.() One such dance was the eagle tail dance. The Choctaw explained that the Eagle, who has direct contact with the upper world of the sun, is a symbol of peace.() Choctaw women painted in white would adopt and name commissioners as kin.() Smoking sealed agreements between peoples and the shared pipes sanctified peace between the two nations.()After the rituals, the Choctaws asked John Woods to live with them to improve communication with the U.S. In exchange they allowed Taboca to visit the States Congress.( On January 3, 1786, the of Hopewell was signed.( Article 11 stated, The hatchet shall be forever buried, and the peace given by the United States of America, and friendship re-established between the said states on the one part, and all the Choctaw nation on the other part, shall be universal; and the contracting parties shall use their utmost endeavors to maintain the peace given as aforesaid, and friendship re-established.(Indian Affairs: Laws and Treaties (Text of the 1786 Choctaw Treaty).)The treaty required Choctaws to return escaped slaves to colonists, to turn over any Choctaws convicted of crimes by the U.S., establish borderlines between the U.S. and Choctaw Nation, and the return any property captured from colonists during the Revolutionary War.()President Thomas Jefferson, Brothers of the Choctaw Nation, December 17, 1803()War of 1812Early in 1811, Tecumseh attempted to recover lands from U.S. settlers. Tecumseh met the Choctaws to persuade them to join the alliance. Pushmataha, considered by historians to be the greatest Choctaw leader, countered Tecumsehs influence. As chief for the Six Towns district, Pushmataha strongly resisted such a plan, arguing that the Choctaw and their neighbors the Chickasaw had always lived in peace with European-Americans, had learned valuable skills and technologies, and had received honest treatment and fair trade.() The joint Choctaw-Chickasaw council then voted against alliance with Tecumseh. On Tecumsehs departure, Pushmataha accused him of tyranny over his own Shawnee tribe and other tribes. Pushmataha warned Tecumeseh that he would fight against those who fought the United States.()With the outbreak of war, Pushmataha led the Choctaws in alliance with the U.S., arguing in favor of opposing the Creeks alliance with Britain after the massacre at Mims.() Pushmataha arrived at Stephens, Alabama in mid-1813 with an offer of alliance and recruitment. He was escorted to Mobile to speak with General Flournoy, then commanding the district. Flournoy initially declined Pushmatahas offer, offending the chief. However, Flournoys staff quickly convinced him to reverse his decision. A courier with a message accepting the offer of alliance caught up with Pushmataha at St. Stephens.()Returning to Choctaw territory, Pushmataha raised a company of 125 Choctaw warriors with a rousing speech and was commissioned (as either a lieutenant colonel or a brigadier general) in the States Army at St. Stephens.() After observing that the officers and their wives would promenade along the River, Pushmataha summoned his own wife to St. Stephens.Pushmataha joined the U.S. Army under General Claiborne in mid-November, and some 125 Choctaw warriors took part in an attack on Creek forces at Kantachi (near present day Econochaca, Alabama) on 23 December 1813.(() With this victory, Choctaws began to volunteer in greater numbers from the other two districts of the tribe. By February 1814, a larger band of Choctaws under Pushmataha had joined General Jacksons force for the sweeping of the Creek territories near Florida. Many Choctaws departed from Jacksons main force after the final defeat of the Creek at the Battle of Horseshoe Bend. By the of New Orleans, only a few Choctaws remained with the army; however, they were the only Native American tribe represented in the battle.left|220px|thumb| Peter Pitchlynn was a mixed race Choctaw who is buried in the Congressional Cemetery in Washington, D.C., 1834, Smithsonian American Art MuseumDoaks Stand (1820)In October 1820, Andrew Jackson and Hinds were sent as commissioners representing the United States, to conduct a treaty that would require the Choctaw to surrender to the United States a portion of their country located in present day Mississippi. They met with chiefs, mingos (leaders), and headsmen such as Colonel Silas Dinsmore and Chief Pushmataha at Doaks Stand on the Trace.()The convention began on October 10 with a talk by Sharp Knife, the nickname of Jackson, to more than 500 Choctaws. Pushmataha accused Jackson of deceiving them about the quality of land west of the Mississippi. Pushmataha responded to Jacksons retort with I know the country well ... The grass is everywhere very short ... There are but few beavers, and the honey and fruit are rare things. Jackson resorted to threats, which pressured the Choctaws to sign the Doaks Stand treaty. Pushmataha would continue to argue with Jackson about the conditions of the treaty. Pushmataha assertively stated that no alteration shall be made in the boundaries of the portion of our territory that will remain, until the Choctaw people are sufficiently progressed in the arts of civilization to become citizens of the States, owning land and homes of their own, on an equal footing with the white people.() Jackson responded with That ... is a magnificent rangement and we consent to it, Citizenship, readily.( Historian Anna Lewis stated that Apuckshunubbee, a Choctaw district chief, was blackmailed by Jackson to sign the treaty.() On October 18, the of Doaks Stand was signed.()Article 4 of the Treaty of Doaks Stand prepared Choctaws to become U.S. citizens when he or she became civilized. This article would later influence Article 14 in the Treaty of Dancing Rabbit Creek.Delegation to Washington City (1824)Image:Mosholatubbee.jpg|left|210px|thumb|In 1830 Mosholatubbee sought to be elected to the Congress of the United States. 1834, Smithsonian American Art MuseumApuckshunubbee, Pushmataha, and Mosholatubbee, the principal leaders of the Choctaws, went to Washington City (the 19th century name for D.C.) to discuss European-Americans squatting on Choctaw lands. They sought either expulsion of the settlers or financial compensation for the loss of their lands.( The group also included Talking Warrior, Red Fort, Nittahkachee; Col. Robert Cole and David Folsom, both mixed-race Indians; Captain Daniel McCurtain, and Major John Pitchlynn, the U.S. interpreter, who also was mixed-race, with European ancestry.( )Pushmataha met with President Monroe and gave a speech to Secretary of War C. Calhoun, reminding him of the longstanding alliances between the United States and the Choctaws. He said, I can say and tell the truth that no Choctaw ever drew his bow against the United States ... My nation has given of their country until it is very small. We are in trouble.() On January 20, 1825, the of Washington City was signed, by which the Choctaw ceded even more territory to the United States.Apuckshunubbee died in Maysville, Kentucky; and Pushmataha died in Washington. Apuckshunubbee was reported to have died from a broken neck caused by a fall from a hotel balcony.(Cushman, p.274) Other historians said he fell from a cliff, an account carried in a local paper. Pushmataha died of croup, even though the disease usually only afflicts infants and young children. Pushmataha was given full U.S. Military burial honors in a ceremony of burial at the Cemetery in Washington, D.C. The deaths of these two leaders effectively crippled the Choctaw Nation. Within six years the Choctaw were forced to cede their last remaining territory in Mississippi to the United States.Cherokee Phoenix, and Indians Advocate, Vol. II, No. 37., 1829.()Treaty of Dancing Rabbit Creek (1830)At Andrew Jacksons request, the United States Congress opened what became a fierce debate on an Indian Removal Bill.() In the end, the bill passed, but the vote was very close. The Senate passed the measure 28 to 19, while in the House it narrowly passed, 102 to 97. Jackson signed the legislation into law June 30, 1830,( and turned his focus onto the Choctaw in Mississippi Territory.right|220px|thumb| Kutteeotubbee was a noted warrior. 1834, Smithsonian American Art MuseumOn August 25, 1830, the Choctaw were supposed to meet with Andrew Jackson in Tennessee, but Leflore, a district Choctaw chief, informed Secretary of War John H. Eaton that his warriors were fiercely opposed to attending.() President Jackson was angered. Journalist Len Green writes although angered by the Choctaw refusal to meet him in Tennessee, Jackson felt from LeFlores words that he might have a foot in the door and dispatched Secretary of War Eaton and John Coffee to meet with the Choctaws in their nation.() Jackson appointed Eaton and General John Coffee as commissioners to represent him to meet the Choctaws at the Dancing Rabbit Creek near present-day County, Mississippi.Andrew Jackson to the Choctaw & Chickasaw Nations, 1829.()The commissioners met with the chiefs and headmen on September 15, 1830, at Dancing Rabbit Creek.() In a carnival-like atmosphere, they tried to explain the policy of removal to an audience of 6,000 men, women, and children.( The Choctaws faced migration or submitting to U.S. law as citizens.( The treaty required the to cede their remaining traditional homeland to the United States; however, a provision in the treaty made removal more acceptable.On September 27, 1830, the of Dancing Rabbit Creek was signed. It represented one of the largest transfers of land that was signed between the U.S. Government and Native Americans without being instigated by warfare. By the treaty, the Choctaw signed away their remaining traditional homelands, opening them up for European-American settlement. Article 14 allowed for some Choctaw to stay in Mississippi, and nearly 1,300 Choctaws chose to do so.  They were the first major non-European ethnic group to become U.S. citizens.(((( Article 22 sought to put a Choctaw representative in the U.S. House of Representatives.( The Choctaw at this crucial time split into two distinct groups: the Nation of Oklahoma and the Band of Choctaw Indians. The nation retained its autonomy, but the tribe in Mississippi submitted to state and federal laws.(Kidwell (2007); Kidwell (1995))Removal eraright|275px|thumb|Choctaws were removed west of the Mississippi starting in 1831. Louisiana Indians Walking Along a Bayou by Alfred Boisseau was painted in 1846.After ceding nearly , the Choctaw emigrated in three stages: the first in the fall of 1831, the second in 1832 and the last in 1833.() Nearly 15,000 Choctaws made the move to what would be called Territory and then later Oklahoma.() About 2,500 died along the of Tears. The Treaty of Dancing Rabbit Creek was ratified by the U.S. Senate on February 25, 1831, and the President was anxious to make it a model of removal.( Principal Chief W. Harkins wrote a farewell letter to the American people before the removals began. It was widely published George W. Harkins, George W. Harkins to the American People()left|175px|thumb|In 1831 a young 22-year-old George W. Harkins wrote the Farewell Letter to the American People. This portrait was taken in the 1860s.de Tocqueville, noted French political thinker and historian, witnessed the Choctaw removals while in Tennessee in 1831:Alexis de Tocqueville, Democracy in America()Approximately 4,000&ndash;6,000 Choctaw remained in Mississippi in 1831 after the initial removal efforts.(() The U.S. agent William Ward, who was responsible for Choctaw registration in Mississippi under article XIV, strongly opposed their treaty rights. Although estimates suggested 5000 Choctaw remained in Mississippi, only 143 family heads (for a total of 276 adult persons) received lands under the provisions of Article 14.()() For the next ten years, the Choctaws in Mississippi were objects of increasing legal conflict, racism, harassment, and intimidation. The Choctaws described their situation in 1849:  we have had our habitations torn down and burned, our fences destroyed, cattle turned into our fields and we ourselves have been scourged, manacled, fettered and otherwise personally abused, until by such treatment some of our best men have died.( Joseph B. Cobb, who moved to Mississippi from Georgia, described the Choctaw as having no nobility or virtue at all, and in some respect he found blacks, especially native Africans, more interesting and admirable, the red mans superior in every way. The Choctaw and Chickasaw, the tribes he knew best, were beneath contempt, that is, even worse than black slaves.() Removal continued throughout the 19th and 20th centuries. In 1846 1,000 Choctaw removed, and in 1903, another 300 Mississippi Choctaw were persuaded to move to the Nation in Oklahoma.( By 1930 only 1,665 remained in Mississippi.()William Ward, 1831, Col. William Wards Register()Pre-Civil War (1840)Image:Malmaison.jpg|thumb|right|315px|Choctaw chief Greenwood LeFlores plantation home, Malmaison, was built in 1852 near Mississippi and was described as a palace in the wilderness.()In the 1840s, the Choctaw chief LeFlore stayed in Mississippi after the signing of Treaty of Dancing Rabbit Creek and became an American citizen, a successful businessman, and a state politician. He was elected as a Mississippi representative and senator, was a fixture of Mississippi high society, and a personal friend of Davis. He represented his county in the state house for two terms and served as a state senator for one term. Some of the elite used language, an indulgence used by some politicians. LeFlore, in defense of his heritage, spoke in the language and asked the Senate floor which was better understood, Latin or Choctaw.(Kidwell (1995))Midway through the Great Irish Famine (1845&ndash;1849), a group of Choctaw collected $710 (although many articles say the original amount was $170 after a misprint in Angi Debos The Rise and Fall of the Choctaw Nation) and sent it to help starving Irish men, women and children. It had been just 16 years since the Choctaw people had experienced the Trail of Tears, and they had faced starvation ... It was an amazing gesture. By todays standards, it might be a million dollars according to Judy Allen, editor of the Choctaw Nation of Oklahomas newspaper, Bishinik, based at the Oklahoma Choctaw tribal headquarters in Durant, Oklahoma. To mark the 150th anniversary, eight Irish people retraced the Trail of Tears ( In the late 20th century, Irish President Robinson extolled the donation in a public commemoration.()For the Choctaw who remained in or returned to Mississippi after 1855, the situation deteriorated. Many lost their lands and money to unscrupulous whites.() the state of Mississippi refused the Choctaw any participation in government.( Their limited understanding of the English language caused them to live in isolated groups. In addition, they were prohibited from attending any of the few institutions of higher learning, as the European Americans considered them people of color and excluded from the segregated white institutions. The state had no public schools prior to those established during the era.(American Civil War (1861)f mccurtain.jpg|left|175px|thumb|Jackson McCurtain, Lieutenant Colonel of the First Choctaw Battalion, CSA.At the beginning of the Civil War, Pike was appointed as Confederate envoy to Native Americans. In this capacity he negotiated several treaties, including the with Choctaws and Chickasaws in July 1861. The treaty covered sixty-four terms, covering many subjects, such as Choctaw and Chickasaw nation sovereignty, States of America citizenship possibilities, and an entitled delegate in the House of Representatives of the Confederate States of America.()Some Choctaw identified with the Southern cause and a few owned slaves. In addition, they well remembered and resented the Indian removals from thirty years earlier, and the poor services they received from the federal government. The main reason the Choctaw Nation agreed to sign the treaty was for protection from regional tribes. Soon Confederate battalions were formed in Indian Territory and later in Mississippi in support of the southern cause.(The Confederacy wanted to recruit Indians east of the Mississippi River in 1862, so they opened up a recruiting camp in Alabama.() The Mobile Advertiser and Register advertised for recruits:General Arnold Spann organized the first battalion of Choctaw in Mississippi in February 1863.() After a train wreck, referred to as the Creek Train Wreck of 1863, near Mississippi, the Choctaw Battalion, which had been organized days earlier, led rescue and recovery efforts. Led by Jack Amos and Elder Williams, the Indians rushed to the scene, stripped, and plunged into the flooded creek. Many of the passengers were rescued due to their heroic acts.() Noted Choctaw Historian Clara Kidwell writes, in an act of heroism in Mississippi, Choctaws rescued twenty three survivors and retrieved ninety bodies when a Confederate troop train plunged off a bridge and fell into the Chunky River.( Major S. G. Spann, Commander of Dabney H. Maury Camp of Mississippi, wrote about the deeds of the Choctaw years after the Civil War had ended.() Mississippi Choctaws were captured in Louisiana, and several died in a Union prison in York.() Spann describes the incident, J.W. Pearce established two camps&mdash;a recruiting camp in Newton County and a drill camp at Tangipahoa&mdash;just beyond the State boundary line in Louisiana in the fall of 1862. Orleans at that time was in the hands of the Federal Gen. Butler. Without notice a reconnoitering party of the enemy raided the camp, and captured over two dozen Indians and several noncommissioned white officers and carried them to New Orleans. All the officers and several of the Indians escaped and returned to the Newton County camp; but all the balance of the captured Indians were carried to New York, and were daily paraded in the public parks as curiosities for the sport of sight-seers.(Choctaw Under Reconstruction (1865)Mississippi Choctawright|205px|thumb|Choctaw girls in 1868. Smithsonian Institution.From about 1865 to 1918, Mississippi Choctaws were largely ignored by governmental, health, and educational services and fell into obscurity.  In the aftermath of the Civil War, their issues were pushed aside in the struggle between defeated Confederates, freedmen and Union sympathizers.  Records about the Mississippi Choctaw during this period are non-existent. They had no legal recourse, and were often bullied and intimidated by local whites.() They chose to live in isolation and practiced their culture as they had for generations.Following Reconstruction and conservative Democrats regaining power in the late 1870s, white state legislators passed laws establishing Crow laws and legal segregation by race. In addition they disfranchised Native Americans by constitutional changes in 1890 regarding voter registration and elections.(Stephen Edward Cresswell, Rednecks, Redeemers, and Race: Mississippi after Reconstruction, Jackson: University Press of Mississippi, 2006, p.124) Such legislators included Mississippi Choctaws in the colored population, subjecting them to racial segregation and exclusion from public facilities along with freedmen and their descendants. The Choctaw were non-white, landless, and had minimal legal protection.()At the turn of the 20th century, only 1,253 Choctaw Indians remained in Mississippi. The beginning of the 20th century found Mississippi Choctaws struggling to overcome poverty, discrimination, and lack of opportunity. (Deborah Boykin, choctaw Heritage of Louisiana and Mississippi, Louisiana Folklife Program, 2000, accessed 25 March 2009)After a US Congressional investigation discovered their poor living conditions, in 1918 the US of Indian Affairs (BIA) established the Choctaw Agency. Under segregation, few schools were open to Choctaw children, who were included with other non-whites. The Choctaw agency was based in Mississippi, a center of several Indian communities. It set up elementary schools and worked to address the poor health conditions of the Choctaw, building a hospital in Philadelphia for tribal members.( Deborah Boykin, Choctaw Indians in the 21st Century, Mississippi History Now, accessed 25 March 2009) Dr. Frank McKinley was the first superintendent. Prior to McKinleys arrival, the Choctaws had grouped themselves in six communities.Because the state remained dependent on agriculture, despite the declining price of cotton, most landless men earned a living by becoming sharecroppers. The women created and sold traditional hand-woven baskets. Choctaw sharecropping declined in the 1950s after farming mechanization had become more prevalent.Choctaw Nationleft|240px|thumb|Faunceway Baptiste, a mixed blood Choctaw man in 1868. Smithsonian Institution.The Confederacys loss was also the Choctaw Nations loss. Prior to removal, the Choctaws had interacted with Africans in their native homeland of Mississippi.() Slavery was a European-American institution which the Choctaws had adopted.( During the pre-civil war period, enslaved African-Americans had more formal legal protection than did the Choctaw.( Moshulatubbee, an important Choctaw chief, had slaves, as did many of the Europeans who married into the Choctaw nation.( The Choctaw Nation, in what will be Oklahoma, kept slavery until 1866. After the Civil War, they were required by treaty with the United States to free the slaves within their nation. Former slaves of the Choctaw Nation were called the Freedmen.( After considerable debate, Choctaw Freedmen were granted Choctaw Nation citizenship in 1885.() In post-war treaties, the US government also acquired land in the western part of the territory and access rights for railroads to be built across Indian Territory. Choctaw chief Allen Wright suggested Oklahoma (red man, a portmanteau of the choctaw words okla man and humma red) as the name of the newly ceded territory. The improved transportation afforded by the railroads drew large-scale mining and timber operations. These added to tribal receipts. The railroads and industries also attracted European-American settlers, including new immigrants to the United States.(Kidwell (2007))Continuing the struggle over land and assimilation, the US proposed the end to the tribal lands held in common, and allotment of lands to tribal members in severalty (individually). This would also enable new settlers to buy land from those Native Americans who wished to sell. The US government set up the Commission to manage the land allotment policy.(Beginning in 1894, the Dawes Commission was established to register Choctaw and other families of the Indian Territory, so that the former tribal lands could be properly distributed among them. The final list included 18,981 citizens of the Choctaw Nation, 1,639 Mississippi Choctaw, and 5,994 former slaves, most held by Choctaws in the Indian/Oklahoma Territory. (At the same time, the Dawes Commission registered members of the other Five Civilized Tribes.) Following completion of the land allotments, the US proposed to end tribal governments of the Five Civilized Tribes and admit the territories as a state.(Territory transition to Oklahoma statehood (1889)left|275px|thumb|Choctaw Nation senate in 1898. Oklahoma Historical Society.The establishment of Oklahoma Territory following the Civil War was a required land cession by the Five Civilized Tribes, who had supported the Confederacy. The government used its railroad access to the Oklahoma Territory to stimulate development there. The Indian Appropriations Bill of 1889 included an amendment by Illinois Representative McKendree Springer, that authorized President Harrison to open the two million acres (8,000 km) of Oklahoma Territory for settlement, resulting in the Run of 1889. The Choctaw Nation was overwhelmed with new settlers and could not regulate their activities. In the late 19th century Choctaws suffered almost daily from violent crimes, murders, thefts and assaults from whites and from other Choctaws. Intense factionalism divided the traditionalistic Nationalists and pro-assimilation Progressives, who fought for control.(Devon Abbott Mihesuah, Choctaw Crime and Punishment, 1884-1907 (2009))In 1905, the Five Civilized Tribes met at the Convention to counter proposed dissolution of their governments by creating an alternate of Sequoyah. Although they took a thoroughly developed proposal to Washington, DC, seeking approval, there was political opposition from eastern states representatives. President Theodore Roosevelt ruled that the Oklahoma and Indian territories would be merged to be admitted as one state, Oklahoma. Nonetheless, many of the Native American representatives from the Sequoyah Convention participated in the new state convention. Its constitution was based on many elements of the one developed for the State of Sequoyah.(In 1906 the U.S. dissolved the governments of the Five Civilized Tribes in an attempt to assimilate the tribes as citizens of the United States. This action was part of continuing negotiations by Native Americans and European Americans over the best proposals for the future. The Choctaw Nation continued to protect resources not stipulated in treaty or law.( On November 16, 1907, Oklahoma was admitted to the union as the 46th state.World War I (1918)right|thumb|Choctaws in training in World War I for coded radio & telephone transmissions.In the closing days of War I, a group of Choctaws serving in the Army used their native language as the basis for secret communication among Americans, as Germans could not understand it. They are now called the Code Talkers.(   Choctaw Indian Code Talkers of World War I (notes/letters),   Phillip Allen, Oklahoma University, 2000, webpage:   CodeTalkers.)(   Germans Confused by Choctaw Code Talkers (article),   BISHINIK, August 1986: 2.)() The Choctaws were the Native American innovators who served as talkers.( Captain Lawrence, a company commander, overheard Solomon Louis and Mitchell Bobb conversing in the language. He asked them if there were more Choctaws and found out there were eight men in the battalion.()left|thumb|Wounded Choctaw soldier in World War I, U.S. National Red Cross Hospital No. 5, Auteuil, France.14 Choctaw Indian men in the Armys 36th Division trained to use their language for military communications. Their communications, which could not be understood by Germans, helped the Expeditionary Force win several key battles in the Campaign in France, during the last big German offensive of the war. Within 24 hours after the US Army starting using their Choctaw speakers, the tide of the battle had turned. In less than 72 hours the Germans were retreating and the Allies were on full attack.( The 14 Choctaw Code Talkers were Albert Billy, Mitchell Bobb, Victor Brown, Ben Caterby, James Edwards, Tobias Frazer, Ben Hampton, Solomon Louis, Pete Maytubby, Jeff Nelson, Joseph Oklahombi, Robert Taylor, Calvin Wilson, and Captain Walter Veach.()More than 70 years passed before the contributions of the Choctaw Code talkers were fully recognized. On November 3, 1989, in recognition of the important role the Choctaw Code Talkers played during World War I, the French government presented the Chevalier de LOrdre National du Mrite (the Knight of the National Order of Merit) to the Choctaws Code Talkers. The US Army again used Choctaw speakers for coded language during War II.Reorganization (1934)290px|left|thumb|A European American and Louisiana Choctaws stand in front of their cabin in 1909, Smithsonian Museum.During the Depression and the Roosevelt Administration, officials began numerous initiatives to alleviate some of the social and economic conditions in the South. The 1933 Special Narrative Report described the dismal state of welfare of Mississippi Choctaws, whose population by 1930 had declined to 1,665 people.( John Collier, the US Commissioner for Indian Affairs (now BIA), used the report as instrumental support in a proposal to re-organize the Mississippi Choctaw as the Band of Choctaw Indians. This enabled them to establish their own tribal government, as well as to have a beneficial relationship with the federal government.In 1934, President Franklin Roosevelt signed into law the Indian Reorganization Act. This law proved critical for survival of the Mississippi Choctaw. Baxter York, Emmett York, and Joe Chitto worked on gaining recognition for the Choctaw.() They realized that the only way to gain recognition was to adopt a constitution.( A rival organization, the Choctaw Indian Federation, opposed tribal recognition because of fears of dominance by the of Indian Affairs (BIA). They disbanded after leaders of the opposition were moved to another jurisdiction.( The first Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians tribal council members were Baxter and Emmett York with Joe Chitto as the first chairperson.(With the tribes adoption of government, in 1944 the Secretary of the Interior declared that  would be held in trust for the Choctaw of Mississippi. Lands in Neshoba and surrounding counties were set aside as a federal reservation. Eight communities were included in the reservation land: Bogue Chitto, Bogue Homa, Conehatta, Crystal Ridge, Pearl River, Red Water, Tucker, and Standing Pine.Under the Indian Reorganization Act, the Mississippi Choctaws re-organized on April 20, 1945 as the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians. This gave them some independence from the state government, which continued with its system of racial segregation under the Democratic Party.World War II (1941)War II was a significant turning point for Choctaws and Native Americans in general. Although the of Dancing Rabbit Creek stated Mississippi Choctaws had U.S. citizenship, they had become associated with colored people as non-white in a state that had imposed racial segregation under Crow laws. State services for Native Americans were non-existent. The state was poor and still dependent on agriculture. In its system of segregation, services for minorities were consistently underfunded. The state constitution and voter registration rules dating from the turn of the 20th century kept most Native Americans from voting, serving on juries or being eligible for any local offices.(A Mississippi Choctaw veteran stated, Indians were not supposed to go in the military back then ... the military was mainly for whites. My category was white instead of Indian. I dont know why they did that. Even though Indians werent citizens of this country, couldnt register to vote, didnt have a draft card or anything, they took us anyway.()Van Barfoot, a Choctaw from Mississippi, who was a Sergeant and later a Second Lieutenant in the U.S. Army, 157th Infantry, 45th Infantry Division, received the of Honor. Barfoot was commissioned a Second Lieutenant after he destroyed two German machine gun nests, took 17 prisoners, and disabled an enemy tank.()Post-Reorganization (1946)right|250px|thumb|Group of Mississippi Choctaw males in the late 50s or early 60s. Photograph by Bob Ferguson.After World War II, pressure in Congress mounted to reduce Washingtons authority on Native American lands and liquidate the governments responsibilities to them. In 1953 the House of Representatives passed Resolution 108, proposing an end to federal services for 13 tribes deemed ready to handle their own affairs. The same year, Public Law 280 transferred jurisdiction over tribal lands to state and local governments in five states. Within a decade Congress terminated federal services to more than sixty groups despite intense opposition by Indians. Congress settled on a policy to terminate tribes as quickly as possible. Out of concern for the isolation of many Native Americans in rural areas, the federal government created relocation programs to cities to try to expand their employment opportunities. Indian policy experts hoped to expedite assimilation of Native Americans to the larger American society, which was becoming urban.(President F. Kennedy halted further termination in 1961 and decided against implementing additional terminations. He did enact some of the last terminations in process, such as with the Ponca. Both presidents Johnson and Nixon repudiated termination of the federal governments relationship with Native American tribes. In 1959, the Choctaw Termination Act was passed.() Unless repealed by the federal government, the Choctaw Nation of Oklahoma would effectively be terminated as a sovereign nation as of August 25, 1970.(President Lyndon Johnson, Message to Congress The Forgotten American, March 6, 1968.()Mississippi Choctaw Self-Determination Eraleft|325px|thumb|Phillip Martin and family in the late 50s or early 60s. Photograph by Bob Ferguson.The Choctaw people continued to struggle economically due to bigotry, cultural isolation, and lack of jobs. The Choctaws, who for 150 years had been neither white nor black, were left where they had always been-- in poverty.( Campbell, a Baptist minister and Civil Rights activist, witnessed the destitution of the Choctaw. He would later write, the thing I remember the most ... was the depressing sight of the Choctaws, their shanties along the country roads, grown men lounging on the dirt streets of their villages in demeaning idleness, sometimes drinking from a common bottle, sharing a roll-your-own cigarette, their half-clad children a picture of hurting that would never end.( With reorganization and establishment of tribal government, however, over the next decades they took control of schools, health care facilities, legal and judicial systems, and social service programs.(Deborah Boykin, Choctaw Heritage of Louisiana and Mississippi, Louisiana Folklife Program, 2000, accessed 26 March 2009)The Choctaws witnessed the social forces that brought Summer and it after effects to their ancient homeland. The Civil Rights Era produced significant social change for the Choctaws in Mississippi, as their civil rights were also enhanced. Prior to the Rights Act of 1964, most jobs were given to whites, then blacks.( Ladd wrote that a Choctaw, now in her 40s, remembers as a little girl, she thought that a white only sign in a local store meant she could only order white, or vanilla, ice cream. It was a small story, but one that shows how a third race can easily get left out of the attempts for understanding.() On June 21, 1964 James Chaney, Andrew Goodman, and Michael Schwerner (renowned civil rights workers) disappeared; their remains were later found in a newly constructed dam. A crucial turning point in the FBI investigation came when the charred remains of the murdered Mississippi civil rights workers station wagon was found on a Mississippi Choctaw reservation.( Two Choctaw women, who were in the back seat of a deputys patrol car, said they witnessed the meetingof two conspirators who expressed their desire to beat-up the boys.() The end of legalized segregation permitted the Choctaws to participate in public institutions and facilities that had been reserved exclusively for white patrons. In 1981, African American Duprees final High School footballgame was played on the Choctaw Indian Resevations tribal high schools Warriors Stadium. He finished with 5,284 rushing yards on 8.3 yards per carry; there was considerable media coverage to witness the record breaking event that was multi-racially praised.()Martin, who had served in the U. S. Army in Europe during World War II, returned to visit his former County, Mississippi home. After seeing the poverty of his people, he decided to stay to help.() Martin served as chairperson in various Choctaw committees up until 1977. Martin was then elected as Chief of the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians. He served a total of 30 years, being re-elected until 2007. Martin died in Jackson, Mississippi, on February 4, 2010, and was eulogized as a visionary leader who lifted his people out of poverty with business and casinos built on tribal land. http://obits.nola.com/obituaries/nola/obituary.aspx?nphillip-martin&pid139394844Choctaws todayIn the social changes around the Civil Rights era, between 1965 and 1982 Native Americans renewed their commitments to the value of their ancient heritage. Working to celebrate their own strengths and exercise appropriate rights; they dramatically reversed the trend toward abandonment of Indian culture and tradition.() During the 1960s, Community Action programs connected with Native Americans were based on citizen participation. In the 1970s, the Choctaws repudiated the extremes of Indian activism. The Oklahoma Choctaw sought a local grassroots solution to reclaim their cultural identity and sovereignty as a nation. The Mississippi Choctaw would lay the foundations of business ventures. Policy continued toward the ideology of Self-Determination.President Richard Nixon, Special Message on Indian Affairs, July 8, 1970.() Soon after this, Congress passed the landmark Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act of 1975, completing a 15-year period of federal policy reform with regard to American Indian tribes. The legislation included means by which tribes could negotiate contracts with the BIA to manage more of their own education and social service programs. In addition, it provided direct grants to help tribes develop plans for assuming responsibility. It also provided for Indian parents involvement on school boards.(William C. Canby, Jr., American Indian Law in a Nut Shell, St. Paul, MN: West Publishing Co., pp. 23-33)left|275px|thumb|Norma Howard (Choctaw Nation of Oklahoma), award-winning watercolor painter with Choctaw stickball sticks made by her son.Beginning in 1979 the tribal council worked on a variety of economic development initiatives, first geared toward attracting industry to the reservation. They had many people available to work, natural resources and no taxes. Industries have included automotive parts, greeting cards, direct mail and printing, and plastic-molding. The Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians is one of the states largest employers, running 19 businesses and employing 7,800 people.(Starting with New Hampshire in 1963, numerous state governments began to operate lotteries and other gambling to raise money for government services. In 1987 the Court of the United States ruled that recognized tribes could operate gaming facilities on reservation land free from state regulation. In 1988 the U.S. Congress enacted the Gaming Regulatory Act (IGRA). It set the terms for Native American tribes to operate casinos.(After years of waiting under the Mabus administration, Mississippi Governor Fordice in 1992 gave permission for the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians to develop Class III gaming. The Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians (MBCI) has one of the largest casino resorts in the nation; it is located in Mississippi. The Silver Star Casino opened its doors in 1994. The Golden Moon Casino opened in 2002. The casinos are collectively known as the River Resort. The Nation of Oklahoma has its own gaming operations: the Casino Resort and Casino Bingo, popular gaming destinations in Durant. Near the Oklahoma-Texas border, they serve residents of Southern Oklahoma and North Texas. The largest regional population base from which they draw is the Worth Metroplex.After nearly two hundred years, the Choctaw have retaken control of the ancient site of Waiya. For years protected as a Mississippi state park, Nanih Waiya was returned to the Choctaw in 2006, under Mississippi Legislature State Bill 2803.Jack Abramoffs Introduction to Indian lobbyingright|thumb|275px|Video capture from video of Senate Indian Affairs Committee Hearing on Lobbying Practices Involving Indian Tribes on September 29, 2004 as found at indian.senate.govIn the second half of the 1990s, Abramoff was employed by Preston Gates Ellis & Rouvelas Meeds LLP, the lobbying arm of Gates & Ellis LLP law firm based in Seattle, WA. In 1995, Abramoff began representing Native American tribes with gambling interests, starting with the Band of Choctaw Indians. The Choctaw originally had lobbied the federal government directly, but beginning in 1994, they found that many of the congressional members who were respondent to their issues had either retired or were defeated in the Revolution of the 1994 elections. Nell Rogers, the tribes specialist on legislative affairs, had a friend who was familiar with Abramoffs father and Abramoffs work as a Republican activist. The tribe contacted Preston Gates, and soon after hired the firm and Abramoff.One of Abramoffs first acts was to defeat a Congressional bill, that sought to use the unrelated business income tax (UBIT) to tax Native American casinos, sponsored by Reps. Bill Archer (R-TX) and Istook (R-OK). Since the matter involved taxation, Abramoff enlisted help from his College Republican acquaintance Norquist, and his for Tax Reform (ATR). The bill was eventually defeated in 1996 in the Senate, due in part to grassroots work by ATR, for which the Choctaw paid $60,000.According to Washington Business Forward, a lobbying trade magazine, Tom DeLay|DeLay was a major factor in those victories, and the fight helped cement the alliance between the two men.(www.bizforward.com)Purporting to represent Native Americans before Congress and state governments in this new field, Jack Abramoff and Scanlon used fraudulent means to gain profits of $15 million in payment from the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians. Congressional hearings were held and charges were brought against Abramoff and Scanlon.() In an e-mail sent January 29, 2002, Abramoff tells Scanlon I have to meet with the monkeys from the Choctaw tribal council.()On January 3, 2006, Abramoff pled guilty to three felony counts &mdash; conspiracy, fraud, and tax evasion &mdash; involving charges stemming principally from his lobbying activities in Washington on behalf of Native American tribes. In addition, Abramoff and other defendants must make restitution of at least $25 million that was defrauded from clients, most notably the Native American tribes.(http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId5081540 NPR)MOWA ChoctawFor generations Choctaw Indians lived in Mobile and Washington Counties in southwestern Alabama. These Indians traced their lineage to two groups of Choctaw that settled the area in the early 19th century. The first group had been allies of the Red Sticks during the Creek War of 1813-14 and hid in the remote swamps after their defeat. The second group arrived in the 1830s, when they hid rather than be removed to the western Indian Territories. These two groups merged and lived in relative isolation from white contact for several decades. Over the years, the MOWA (for Mobile and Washington) faced discrimination, persecution, and debt peonage because of their racial status, which in the eyes of the federal government was undocumented and ambiguous. Despite achieving official recognition as a Native American tribe by the state of Alabama, the MOWA Choctaw were still fighting for federal recognition in the 21st century.(Jacqueline Anderson Matte, Extinction by Reclassification: the MOWA Choctaws of South Alabama and Their Struggle for Federal Recognition, Alabama Review 2006 59(3): 163-204,)Choctaw in the 2010 Census4,513 people in Alabama reported being Choctaw in the 2010 Census.  They were exceeded in number by the 23,403 people in California who reported being Choctaw.  Californias number also exceeded the 9,260 Choctaw in Mississippi and the 4,840 Choctaw in Arkansas.  Texas with 24,024 Choctaw had more, and all these numbers were dwarfed by the 79,006 Choctaw in Oklahoma.  There were Choctaw in every state of the Union, the lowest number being the 10 in Rhode Island.(2010 US Census table on reported tribes)Cultureright|thumb|200px|Tullockchishko, Drinks the Juice of the Stones, was the greatest of all Choctaw stickball players, 1834.After the fall of the Mississippian Culture, Choctaw culture would be established and greatly evolve over the centuries, combining mostly European-American influences; however, interaction with Spain, France, and England greatly shaped it as well. They were known for their rapid incorporation of modernity, developing a written language, transitioning to yeoman farming methods, and accepting European-Americans and African-Americans into their society. The Choctaw also practiced Flattening, but the practice eventually fell out of favor. In mid-summer the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians celebrate their culture during the Indian Fair with ball games, dancing, cooking and entertainment.()ClansWithin the Choctaws were two distinct Moieties: Imoklashas (elders) and Inhulalatas (youth). Each moiety had several clans or Iskas, it is estimated there were about 12 Iskas altogether. Identity was established first by Moiety and Iska, so a Choctaw identified himself first as Imoklasha or Inhulata and second as Choctaw. Children belonged to the Iska of their mother meaning they are matrilineal. The following were some major districts:()*Okla Hannalli (people of six towns)*Okla Tannap (people from the other side)*Okla Fayala (people who are widely dispersed)John Swanton writes there are only the faintest traces of groups with truly totemic designations, the animal and plant names which occur seeming not to have had a totemic connotation.()Swanton also adds Adam Hodgson ... who spoke English very well, told ... that there were tribes or families among the Indians, somewhat similar to the Scottish clans; such as, the Panther family, the Bird family, Raccoon Family, the Wolf family.( The following are possible totemic clan designations:(*Wind*Bear*Deer*Wolf*Panther*Holly Leaf*Bird*Raccoon*CrawfishGamesImage:Chunkeyplayer painting HRoe 2006.jpg|200px|left|thumb|A Mississippian era engraved shell discovered at Kentucky and chunkey player as depicted by Herb Roe, 2006.Choctaw stickball, the oldest field sport in North America, was also known as the little brother of war because of its roughness and substitution for war.() When disputes arose between Choctaw communities, stickball provided a civil way to settle issues. The stickball games would involve as few as twenty or as many as 300 players. The goal posts could be from a few hundred feet apart to a few miles. Goal posts were sometimes located within each opposing teams village. A Jesuit priest referenced stickball in 1729, and George Catlin painted the subject. The Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians continue to practice the sport.Chunkey was a game that consisted of a stone-shaped disk that was about 1&ndash;2 inches in length.() The disk was thrown down a  corridor so that it could roll past the players at great speed. As the disk rolled down the corridor, players would throw wooden shafts at it. The object of the game was to strike the disk or prevent your opponents from hitting it.(Other games included corn, cane, and moccasin games.() The corn game included five to seven kernels of corn. One side was blackened and the other side white. Points were assigned for each color. One point was awarded for the black side and 5-7 points for the white side. There were usually only two players.(LanguageThe Choctaw language is a member of the Muskogean family and was well known among the frontiersmen, such as U.S. President Andrew Jackson and William Henry Harrison, of the early 19th century. The language is closely related to Chickasaw, and some linguists consider the two dialects a single language. The Choctaw language is the essence of tribal culture, tradition, and identity.() Many Choctaw adults learned to speak the language before speaking English. The language is a part of daily life on the Mississippi Choctaw reservation. The following table is an example of Choctaw text and its translation:ReligionThe Choctaws believed in a good spirit and an evil spirit. They may have been sun, or Hushtahli, worshippers. The historian Swanton wrote, The Choctaws anciently regarded the sun as a deity ... the sun was ascribed the power of life and death. He was represented as looking down upon the earth, and as long as he kept his flaming eye fixed on any one, the person was safe ... fire, as the most striking representation of the sun, was considered as possessing intelligence, and as acting in concert with the sun ... having constant intercourse with the sun ...( The word nanpisa (the one who sees) expressed the reverence the Choctaw had for the sun.()Greg OBrien, Choctaws in a Revolutionary Age, 1750-1830()255px|right|thumb|Mississippi Choctaw group wearing traditional garb, c. 1908.Prayers may have been introduced by missionaries; however, Choctaw prophets were known to have addressed the sun. Swanton wrote, an old Choctaw informed Wright that before the arrival of the missionaries, they had no conception of prayer. However, he adds, I have indeed heard it asserted by some, that anciently their hopaii, or prophets, on some occasions were accustomed to address the sun ...(Traditional clothingThe colorful dresses worn by todays Choctaw are made by hand and adapted from the 19th century European-American designs. Choctaws today wear Choctaw clothing mainly for special events. Choctaw elders, especially the Choctaw women, dress in their traditional garb every day. Choctaw dresses are trimmed by full diamond, half diamond or circle and crosses that represent stickball sticks.( )Treatiesleft|thumb|220px| The complete Choctaw Nation shaded in blue in relation to the U.S. state of Mississippi.Land was the most valuable asset, which the Native Americans held in collective stewardship. The United States systematically obtained Choctaw land for conventional European-American settlement through treaties, legislation, and threats of warfare. Although the Choctaw made treaties with Great Britain, France, Spain, and the Confederate States of America; the nation signed only nine treaties with the United States.( ) Some treaties which the US made with other nations, such as the of San Lorenzo, indirectly affected the Choctaw.The Treaty of Mount DexterThe of Mount Dexter treaty conveyed vast amountsof land in what is now southeastern Mississippi and southwestern Alabama,including much of the western portion of County, Alabama, tothe United States.()ReservationsReservations can be found in Alabama-(Band of Choctaw Indians), Louisiana-(Band of Choctaw Indians; United Houma Nation; Choctaw-Apache of Ebarb; Bayou Lacombe Choctaw; Clifton Choctaw), Texas-(Mount Tabor Indian Community), Mississippi-(Band of Choctaw Indians), and Oklahoma-(Nation of Oklahoma). Other population centers include California, Oregon, Dallas, Houston and Chicago.Influential leaders*Tuscaloosa (?-d. October 1540) retaliated against Hernando de Soto at the Battle of Mabilia. The battle was the first major conflict in North America between Native Americans and Europeans.*Franchimastabe (d. 19th c.) was a transitional benefactor and a contemporary of Taboca. To some Americans he was the leading chief of the Choctaws. He led a war party with British forces against American rebels.*Taboca (d. 19th c.) was a traditional prophet-chief who led a delegation starting in October 1785 to Hopewell, South Carolina.*Apuckshunubbee (ca. 17401824) was chief of the Okla Falaya (Tall People) district in old Choctaw nation. He died in Kentucky on his way to Washington D.C. to conduct negotiations.*Pushmataha (Apushmataha) (1760sDecember 24, 1824) was a chief in old Choctaw nation. He negotiated treaties with the United States and fought on the Americans side in the War of 1812. He died in Washington D.C. and is buried in the Congressional Cemetery in Washington D.C.*Mosholatubbee (17701836) was a chief in the Choctaw nation before the removal and after. He went to Washington D.C. to negotiate for the tribe in 1824 and was the only major leader to return. In the summer of 1830, he ran for a seat in the Congress of the United States to represent the state of Mississippi.*LeFlore (June 3, 1800August 31, 1865) was a District Chief of the Choctaws in Mississippi. He was an influential state representative and senator in Mississippi.*W. Harkins (18101890) was a district Choctaw chief in Indian Territory (18501857) prior to the Civil War and author of the Letter to the American People.*Pitchlynn (January 30, 1806January 17, 1881) was a highly influential leader during the removal era and long after. He represented the Choctaws in Washington D.C. for some years and is buried in the Congressional Cemetery. Dickens described him as stately and complete a gentleman of natures making as ever I beheld.*Martin (March 13, 1926February 4, 2010) was the Chief of the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians from 19792007 and worked in tribal government for over fifty years. He encouraged outside investment and reduced unemployment to nearly 0% on the reservation.See also* Bartram* Culture* mythology* Nation of Oklahoma* Trail of Tears* Byington* Band of Choctaw Indians* Lincecum* of Choctaw Treaties* of sites and peoples visited by the Hernando de Soto Expedition* Band of Choctaw Indians* Band of Choctaw Indians* okay (okeh)ReferencesFurther reading*Alan, Gallay. The Indian Slave Trade, The Rise of the English Empire in the American South, 1670-1717. ISBN 9780300101935.*Akers, Donna L. Living in the Land of Death: The Choctaw Nation, 1830-1860, Lansing: Michigan State University, 2004.*Bartram, William. Travels Through...Country of the Chactaws..., Florida: printed by James & Johnson, 1791.*Belue, Ted Franklin. Long Hunt, Death of the Buffalo East of the Mississippi.ISBN 081170968X.*Bushnell, David I. Smithsonian Institution Bureau of American Ethnology Bulletin 48: The Choctaw of Bayou Lacomb, St. Tammany Parish, Louisiana. Washington, DC: Government Printing Office, 1909.*Byington, Cyrus. Smithsonian Institution Bureau of American Ethnology Bulletin 46: A Dictionary of the Choctaw Language. Washington, DC: Government Printing Office, 1915.*Carson, James Taylor. Searching for the Bright Path: The Mississippi Choctaws from Prehistory to Removal. Lincoln: University of Nebraska Press, 1999.*Clarke, Hewitt. Thunder At Meridian, Lone Star Press, Spring, Texas, 1995.*Cushman, H. B., History of the Choctaw, Chickasaw, and Natchez Indians. Norman, OK: University of Oklahoma Press, 1899,1962,1999. ISBN 0-8061-3127-6.* Galloway, Patricia (1998). Choctaw Genesis 1500-1700 Lincoln, Nebraska: University of Nebraska Press. ISBN 0-8032-7070-4.*Haag, Marcia and Henry Willis. Choctaw Language & Culture: Chahta Anumpa. Norman, Okla: University of Oklahoma Press, 2001.*Hurley, Patrick J.(1883). National Atty. for Choctaw Nation Choctaw Citizenship Litigation.*Jimmie, Randy and Jimmie, Leonard. NANIH WAIYA Magazine, 1974, Vol I, Number 3.*Kidwell, Clara Sue. Choctaws and Missionaries in Mississippi, 1818-1918. University of Oklahoma Press: Norman and London, 1995.*Kidwell, Clara Sue. The Choctaws in Oklahoma: From Tribe to Nation, 1855-1970 2007.* Lambert, Valerie. Choctaw Nation: A Story of American Indian Resurgence. U. of Nebraska Press, 2007.*Lincecum, Gideon. Pushmataha: A Choctaw Leader and His People. Tuscaloosa: University of Alabama Press, 2004.*Lincecum, Gideon. Traditional History of the Chahta Nation, Translated from the Chahta by Gideon Lincecum, 1861. University of Texas Library, March 1932.* Mihesuah, Devon Abbott. Choctaw Crime and Punishment, 1884-1907 (2009)*Morrison, James D. The Social History of the Choctaw Nation, 1865-1907. Choctaw Nation of Oklahoma, Durant, OK: Creative Infomatics, Inc., 1987.*Mould, Tom. Choctaw Tales. Jackson, MS: University Press of Mississippi, 2004. ISBN 1-57806-683-2.*OBrien, Greg. Choctaws in a Revolutionary Age, 1750-1830. Lincoln: University of Nebraska Press, 2002.*OBrien, Greg, ed. Pre-removal Choctaw History: Exploring New Paths. Norman: University of Oklahoma Press, 2008.*OBrien, Greg. Mushulatubbee and Choctaw Removal: Chiefs Confront a Changing World.   2001.*OBrien, Greg. Pushmataha: Choctaw Warrior, Diplomat, and Chief. 2001.*Pesantubbee, Michelene E. Choctaw Women in a Chaotic World: The Clash of Cultures in the Colonial Southeast. Albuquerque, NM: University of New Mexico, 2005.*Swanton, John Reed. (1922) Early History of the Creek Indians and their neighbors. ISBN 1436827434*Swanton, John R. Source Material for the Social and Ceremonial Life of the Choctaw Indians. Tuscaloosa and London: The University of Alabama Press, 2001. ISBN 0-8173-1109-2.*Tingle, Tim. Walking the Choctaw Road. El Paso, Tex: Cinco Puntos Press, 2003.*Wells, Samuel J., and Tubby, Roseanna (Editors). After Removal, The Choctaw in Mississippi. Jackson and London: University Press of Mississippi, 1986. ISBN 0-87805-289-5.*Wilson,Gustavus James Nash. The early history of Jackson County 2009. ISBN 0217627145.*Mississippi Choctaw Reservation and Off-Reservation Trust Land, Mississippi United States Census BureauExternal links*Official websites of Choctaw Governments:**Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians (official site)**Choctaw Nation of Oklahoma (official site)**Jena Band of Choctaw Indians (official site)*Choctaw Indian Fair*Choctaws by Dr. D.L. Birchfield** Choctaw, Oklahoma Historical Society articlear:ca:Choctawda:Choctaw(Volk)es:Choctaweo:oktaojfr:Choctawsgl:Choctawhr:Choctawit:Choctawlt:oktavaimk:(volk)ja:no:Choctawpl:Czoktawowiept:Choctawqu:Chahta()simple:Choctawfi:Choctawitsv:Choctawerta:th:tr:Choctawzh:
7243
Call_centre
File:callcentre.jpg|thumb|A very large collections call centre in Florida.A call centre or call center is a centralised office used for the purpose of receiving and transmitting a large volume of requests by telephone. A call centre is operated by a company to administer incoming product support or information inquiries from consumers. Outgoing calls for telemarketing, clientele, product services, and debt collection are also made. In addition to a call centre, collective handling of letters, faxes, chat, and e-mails at one location is known as a contact centre.A call centre is often operated through an extensive open workspace for call centre agents, with work stations that include a computer for each agent, a telephone set/headset connected to a switch, and one or more supervisor stations. It can be independently operated or networked with additional centres, often linked to a corporate network, including mainframes, microcomputers and LANs. Increasingly, the voice and data pathways into the centre are linked through a set of new technologies called telephony integration (CTI).Most major businesses use call centres to interact with their customers. Examples include utility companies, mail order catalogue retailers, and customer support for computer hardware and software. Some businesses even service internal functions through call centres. Examples of this include help desks, retail financial support, and sales support.centre desk lakeland florida.jpg|thumb|A typical call centre workers desk environment in Lakeland, Florida, United States.A contact centre, also known as customer interaction centre is a central point of any organization from which all customer contacts are managed. Through contact centres, valuable information about company are routed to appropriate people, contacts to be tracked and data to be gathered. It is generally a part of companys customer relationship management (CRM). Today, customers contact companies by calling, emailing, chatting online, visiting websites, faxing, and even instant messaging.File:Callcentreterminal.JPG|thumb|Call centre worker at a very small workstation/booth, using CallWeb Internet-based survey software.TechnologyCall centre technology is subject to improvements and innovations. Some of these technologies include recognition software to allow computers to handle first level of support, mining and language processing to allow better customer handling, agent training by automatic mining of practices from past interactions, automation and many other technologies to improve agent productivity and satisfaction.() Automatic lead selection or lead steering is also intended to improve efficiencies,() both for inbound and outbound campaigns, whereby inbound calls are intended to quickly land with the appropriate agent to handle the task, whilst minimizing wait times and long lists of irrelevant options for people calling in, as well as for outbound calls, where lead selection allows management to designate what type of leads go to which agent based on factors including skill, socioeconomic factors and past performance and percentage likelihood of closing a sale per lead.The concept of the Queue standardizes the processing of communications across multiple technologies such as fax, phone, and email whilst the concept of a queue provides callers with an alternative to waiting on hold when no agents are available to handle inbound call demand.Premise-based Call Centre TechnologyHistorically, call centres have been built on PBX equipment that is owned and hosted by the call centre operator. The PBX might provide functions such as Call Distribution, Voice Response, and routing. The call centre operator would be responsible for the maintenance of the equipment and necessary software upgrades as released by the vendor.Virtual Call Centre Technology()With the advent of the as a service technology delivery model, the virtual call centre has emerged. In a virtual call centre model, the call centres operator does not own, operate or host the equipment that the call centre runs on. Instead, they subscribe to a service for a monthly or annual fee with a service provider that hosts the call centre telephony equipment in their own data centre. Such a vendor may host many call centres on their equipment. Agents connect to the vendors equipment through traditional PSTN telephone lines, or over over IP. Calls to and from prospects or contacts originate from or terminate at the vendors data centre, rather than at the call centre operators premise. The vendors telephony equipment then connects the calls to the call centre operators agents.Virtual Call Centre Technology allows people to work from home, instead of in a traditional, centralised, call centre location, which increasingly allows people with physical or other disabilities that prevent them from leaving the house, to work.()Cloud Computing for Call CentresCloud computing for call centres extends cloud computing to as a service, or hosted, on-demand call centres by providing application programming interfaces (APIs) on the call centre cloud computing platform that allow call centre functionality to be integrated with cloud-based relationship management, such as Salesforce.com or CRM and leads management and other applications.The APIs typically provide programmatic access to two key groups of features in the call centre platform:Computer Telephony Integration (CTI) APIs provide developers with access to basic telephony controls and sophisticated call handling on the call centre platform from a separate application.Configuration APIs provide programmatic control of administrative functions of the call centre platform which are typically accessed by a human administrator through a Graphical User Interface (GUI). Patents There are many patents covering various aspects of call centre operation, automation, and technology.  One of the early inventors in this field, A. Katz, personally holds over 40 patents covering inventions related to charge-free numbers, automated attendant, automated call distribution, voice response unit, computer telephone integration and speech recognition.() Dynamics Calls may be inbound or outbound. Inbound calls are made by consumers, for example to obtain information, report a malfunction, or ask for help. In contrast, outbound calls are made by agents to consumers, usually for sales purposes (telemarketing). One can combine inbound and outbound campaigns.()Call centre staff are often organised into a multi-tier support system for more efficient handling of calls.  The first tier consists of operators, who initially answer calls and provide general information. If a caller requires more assistance, the call is forwarded to the second tier (in the appropriate department depending on the nature of the call). In some cases, there are three or more tiers of support staff. Typically the third tier of support is formed of product engineers/developers or highly skilled technical support staff for the product. Some critics of call centres argue that the work atmosphere in such an environment is dehumanising.() Others point to the low rates of pay and restrictive working practices of some employers.()() There has been much controversy over such things as restricting the amount of time that an employee can spend in the toilet(). Call centres have also been the subject of complaints by callers who find the staff often do not have enough skill or authority to resolve problems(), while the staff sometimes appear apathetic().Telephone calls are easily monitored, and the close monitoring of call centre staff is widespread.() This has the benefit() of helping the company to plan the workload and time of its employees. However it has also been argued that such close monitoring breaches the human right to privacy(). Varieties Some variations () of call centre models are listed below: *Contact centre  Supports interaction with customers over a variety of media, including but not necessarily limited to telephony,  e-mail and internet chat.*Inbound call centre - Exclusively or predominantly handles inbound calls (calls initiated by the customer).*Outbound call centre - One in which call centre agents make outbound calls to customers or sales leads.*Blended call centre - Combining automatic call distribution for incoming calls with predictive dialling for outbound calls, it makes more efficient use of agent time as each type of agent (inbound or outbound) can handle the overflow of the other. Criticism and performance Criticisms of call centres generally follow a number of common themes, from both callers and call centre staff. From callers, common criticisms include:(Ali, S.  2006 If you want to scream, press...  Wall Street Journal http://online.wsj.com/google_login.html?urlhttp%3A%2F%2Fonline.wsj.com%2Farticle%2FSB116171027921802238.html%3Fmod%3Dgooglenews_wsj)* Operators working from a script* Non-expert operators (call screening)* Incompetent or untrained operators incapable of processing customers requests effectively(Adsit, D. (2007) Do Call Centers Need to Carry Malpractice Insurance? In Queue, http://www.nationalcallcenters.org/pubs/In_Queue/vol2no24.html)* Overseas location, with language and accent problems* Touch tone menu systems and automated queuing systems* Excessive waiting times to be connected to an operator* Complaints that departments of companies do not engage in communication with one another* Deceit over location of call centre (such as allocating overseas workers false English names)* Requiring the caller to repeat the same information multiple timesCommon criticisms from staff include:(P Taylor, P Bain An assembly line in the head: work and employee relations in the call centre Industrial Relations Journal, 1999.)* Close scrutiny by management (e.g. frequent random call monitoring)* Low compensation (pay and bonuses)* Restrictive working practices (some operators are required to follow a pre-written script)* High stress: a common problem associated with front-end jobs where employees deal directly with customers* Repetitive job task* Poor working conditions (e.g. poor facilities, poor maintenance and cleaning, cramped working conditions, management interference, lack of privacy and noisy)* Impaired vision and hearing problems* Rude and abusive customersThe net-net of these concerns is that call centres as a business process exhibit levels of variability. The experience a customer gets and the results a company achieves on a given call are almost totally dependent on the quality of the agent answering that call.(Fleming, J., Coffman, C., Harter, J. (2005) Manage Your Human Sigma, Harvard Business Review) Call centres are beginning to address this by using Automation to standardise the process all agents use.(Patel, S. (2008) How to win a no-win situation. In Queue. http://www.nationalcallcenters.org/pubs/In_Queue/vol3no12.html#How_to_Win_a_No-Win_Situation) Anton and Phelps have provided a detailed HOWTO to conduct the performance evaluation of the business,() whereas others are using various scientific technologies to do the jobs.()()() However more popular alternatives are using personality and skill based approaches.()() The various challenges encountered by call operators are discussed by several authors.()()()()() Outsourced bureau contact centres Outsourced bureau contact centres are a model of contact centre that provide services on a pay per use model. The overheads of the contact centre are shared by many clients thereby supporting a very cost effective model especially for low volumes of calls.Bureau contact centres provide an opportunity for:* Pilot schemes - perform test of concept for new models for communications, sales or customer services before investing in staff and infrastructure.* Flexible solutions for SMEs - small or medium-size enterprises can benefit from a flexible service that can evolve with the business.* Best of breed systems/technology - clients can benefit from considerable investment into communications technology, receiving benefits without having to invest in large capital expenditure projects. Unionisation Unions in America have made some effort to gain members from this sector,() including the Workers of America( ) and the Steelworkers. In Australia, the Union of Workers represents unionised workers; their activities form part of the Australian labour movement.() In Europe, Uni Global Union of Switzerland is involved in assisting unionisation in this realm.() Standardisation Customer Operations Performance Center Inc. (COPC) is the globally recognised performance management framework for the contact centre and BPO industry.  You can become certified to the COPC-2000 CSP Standard after demonstrating compliance to over 30 different items of contact centre performance as outlined in the COPC-2000 CSP Standard.The COPC-2000 CSP Standard can be downloaded for free and is open source meaning it can also be utilized within your contact centre as a service to the industry. Mathematical theory Queuing theory is a branch of mathematics in which models of queuing systems have been developed. A call centre can be seen as a queuing network.()(Queueing Models of Call Centers: An Introduction Ger Koole) The models can be applied to answer queueing questions for call centres.  The most widespread queueing model used is the Erlang C Formula.Call centre operations have been supported by mathematical models beyond queueing, with research, which considers a wide range of optimisation problems.Media portrayalsIndian call centres have been the focus of at least two documentary films, the 2005 film by Day, Nancy by Night and the 2006 film Calling. See also * messaging* process outsourcing in India* management* of call centre companies* call distributor* center industry in the Philippines* distribution* based routing* management system* queue References  Further reading * Cusack M., Online Customer Care, American Society for Quality (ASQ) Press, 2000. * Cleveland B., Call Center Management on Fast Forward, ICMI Press, 2006.* Kennedy I., Call centres, School of Electrical and Information Engineering, University of the Witwatersrand, 2003.* Masi D.M.B., Fischer M.J., Harris C.M., Numerical Analysis of Routing Rules for Call centres, Telecommunications Review, 1998. http://www.noblis.org/Publications/TR98_8.doc* HSE Web site at www.hse.gov.uk/lau/lacs/94-2.htm for guidelines about call centre working practices.* Reena Patel, Working the Night Shift: Women in Indias Call Center Industry (Stanford University Press; 2010) 219 pages; traces changing views of womens work in India under globalization.* Fluss, Donna, The Real-Time Contact centre, 2005 AMACOM* Wegge, J., van Dick, R., Fisher, G., Wecking, C., & Moltzen, K. (2006, January). Work motivation, organisational identification, and well-being in call centre work. Work & Stress, 20(1), 60-83.* Customer Operations Performance Center Inc. web site at http://www.copc.com/ for more information on the COPC-2000 CSP Standard.centrumde:Callcenterde llamadasdappelcenterde appellarcentercentrascenternl:Callcenterja:centerde atendimentocentru bazat pe protocoale IPru:-sv:Callcentermerkezizh:
7299
Colonialism
:See colony and colonization for examples of colonialism that do not refer to Western colonialism. Also see (disambiguation)File:Musee-de-lArmee-IMG 0976.jpg|thumb|The helmet (in this case, of the French Empire) is an icon of colonialism in tropical landsColonialism is the establishment, maintenance, acquisition and expansion of colonies in one territory by people from another territory. It is a process whereby the metropole claims sovereignty over the colony and the structure, government, and economics of the colony are changed by colonizers from the metropole. Colonialism is a set of unequal relationships between the metropole and the colony and between the colonists and the indigenous population.The colonial period normally refers to the late 15th to the 20th century, when European states established colonies on other continents. During this time, the justifications for colonialism included various factors such as the profits to be made, the expansion of the power of the metropole and various religious and political beliefs.Colonialism and imperialism are ideologically linked with mercantilism.(DefinitionsFile:COLLECTIE TROPENMUSEUM Opening van het Koloniaal Instituut 10020669.jpg|thumb|The opening of the Colonial Institute (now the Tropenmuseum) in Amsterdam by Queen Wilhelmina, 1926English Dictionary defines colonialism as the policy of acquiring and maintaining colonies, especially for exploitation.() The Merriam-Webster Dictionary offers four definitions, including something characteristic of a colony and control by one power over a dependent area or people.()The 2006 Encyclopedia of Philosophy uses the term colonialism to describe the process of European settlement and political control over the rest of the world, including Americas, Australia, and parts of Africa and Asia. It discusses the distinction between colonialism and imperialism and states that given the difficulty of consistently distinguishing between the two terms, this entry will use colonialism as a broad concept that refers to the project of European political domination from the sixteenth to the twentieth centuries that ended with the national liberation movements of the 1960s.()In his preface to Osterhammels Colonialism: A Theoretical Overview, Roger Tignor says, For Osterhammel, the essence of colonialism is the existence of colonies, which are by definition governed differently from other territories such as protectorates or informal spheres of influence.() In the book, Osterhammel asks, How can colonialism be defined independently from colony?() He settles on a three-sentence definition:Colonialism is a relationship between an indigenous (or forcibly imported) majority and a minority of foreign invaders.  The fundamental decisions affecting the lives of the colonized people are made and implemented by the colonial rulers in pursuit of interests that are often defined in a distant metropolis.  Rejecting cultural compromises with the colonized population, the colonizers are convinced of their own superiority and their ordained mandate to rule.()Types of colonialismHistorians often distinguish between two forms of colonialism, chiefly based on the number of people from the colonizing country who settle in the colony*:*colonialism involved a large number of colonists, typically seeking fertile land to farm.*colonialism involved fewer colonists, typically interested in extracting resources to export to the metropole. This category includes posts, but it applies more to the much larger colonies where the colonists would provide much of the administration and own much of the land and other capital, but rely on indigenous people for labor.These models of colonialism overlap. In both cases, people moved to the colony, and goods were exported to the metropole.A plantation colony is normally considered to fit the model of exploitation colonialism. However, in this case there may be other immigrants to the colony such as slaves to grow the crop for export. In some cases, settler colonialism took place in substantially pre-populated areas and the result was either a culturally mixed population (such as the mestizos of the Americas), or a racially divided population, such as in Algeria or Rhodesia.Although legally different from colonies, of Nations mandates had many elements of exploitation colonialism.HistoryActivity that could be called colonialism has a long history. The Egyptians, Phoenicians, Greeks and Romans all built in antiquity. The word metropole comes from the Greek metropolis mother city. The word colony comes from the Latin coloniaa place for agriculture. Between the 11th and 18th centuries, the Vietnamese established military colonies south of their original territory and absorbed the territory, in a process known as nam tin.(The Le Dynasty and Southward Expansion)Modern colonialism started with the of Discovery. Portugal and Spain discovered new lands across the oceans and built trading posts. For some people, it is this building of colonies across oceans that differentiates colonialism from other types of expansionism. These new lands were divided between the Empire and Empire, first by the papal bull caetera and then by the of Tordesillas and the of Zaragoza (1529).This period is also associated with the Revolution. The late middle ages saw reforms in accountancy and banking in Italy and the eastern Mediterranean. These ideas were adopted and adapted in western Europe to the high risks and rewards associated with colonial ventures.The 17th century saw the creation of the colonial empire and the Empire, as well as the English colonial empire, which later became the Empire. It also saw the establishment of some overseas colonies and a colonial empire.The spread of colonial empires was reduced in the late 18th and early 19th centuries by the Revolutionary War and the American wars of independence. However, many new colonies were established after this time, including the colonial empire and colonial empire. In the late 19th century, many European powers were involved in the for Africa.The Empire, Empire and Austrian Empire existed at the same time as the above empires, but did not expand over oceans. Rather, these empires expanded through the more traditional route of conquest of neighboring territories. There was, though, some colonization of the Americas across the Bering Strait. The of Japan modeled itself on European colonial empires. The States of America gained overseas territories after the War for which the term American Empire was coined.After the First World War, the victorious allies divided up the German colonial empire and much of the Ottoman Empire between themselves as of Nations mandates. These territories were divided into three classes according to how quickly it was deemed that they would be ready for independence.() However, decolonization outside the Americas lagged until after the World War. In 1962 the Nations set up a Committee on Decolonization, often called the Committee of 24, to encourage this process. Further, dozens of independence movements and global political solidarity projects such as the Movement were instrumental in the decolonization efforts of former colonies. NeocolonialismThe term disdickolism has been used to refer to a variety of contexts since decolonization that took place after War II. Generally it does not refer to a type of direct colonization, rather, colonialism by other means. Specifically, neocolonialism refers to the theory that former or existing economic relationships, such as the Agreement on Tariffs and Trade and the American Free Trade Agreement, created by former colonial powers were or are used to maintain control of their former colonies and dependencies after the colonial independence movements of the postWorld War II period.Colonialism and the history of thoughtColonialism and geographySettlers acted as the link between the natives and the imperial hegemony, bridging the geographical, ideological and commercial gap between the colonizers and colonized. Painter, J. and Jeffrey, A. affirm that certain advances aided the expansion of European states. With tools such as cartography, shipbuilding, navigation, mining and agricultural productivity colonizers had an upper hand. Their awareness of the Earths surface and abundance of practical skills provided colonizers with a knowledge that, in turn, created power.Painter and Jeffrey argue that geography as a discipline was not and is not an objective science, rather it is based on assumptions about the physical world. Whereas it may have given The West an advantage when it came to exploration, it also created zones of racial inferiority. Geographical beliefs such as environmental determinism, the view that some parts of the world are underdeveloped, legitimised colonialism and created notions of skewed evolution.(Painter, J. & Jeffrey, A., 2009. Political Geography 2nd ed., Sage. Imperialism pg 23 (GIC)) These are now seen as elementary concepts. Political geographers maintain that colonial behavior was reinforced by the physical mapping of the world, visually separating them and us. Geographers are primarily focused on the spaces of colonialism and imperialism, more specifically, the material and symbolic appropriation of space enabling colonialism.(Gallaher, C. et al., 2008. Key Concepts in Political Geography, Sage Publications Ltd. Imperialism/Colonialism pg 5 (GIC))Colonialism and imperialismA colony is part of an empire and so colonialism is closely related to imperialism. Assumptions are that colonialism and imperialism are interchangeable, however Robert Young suggests that imperialism is the concept while colonialism is the practice. Colonialism is based on an imperial outlook, thereby creating a consequential relationship. Through an empire, colonialism is established and capitalism is expanded, on the other hand a capitalist economy naturally enforces an empire. In the next section Marxists make a case for this mutually reinforcing relationship.Marxist view of colonialismMarxism views colonialism as a form of capitalism, enforcing exploitation and social change. Marx thought that working within the global capitalist system, colonialism is closely associated with uneven development. It is an instrument of wholesale destruction, dependency and systematic exploitation producing distorted economies, socio-psychological disorientation, massive poverty and neocolonial dependency.(Dictionary of Human Geography, Colonialism) Colonies are constructed into modes of production. The search for raw materials and the current search for new investment opportunities is a result of inter-capitalist rivalry for accumulation. Lenin regarded colonialism as the root cause of imperialism, as imperialism was distinguished by monopoly capitalism via colonialism and as S. Sunga explains: Vladimir Lenin advocated forcefully the principle of self-determination of peoples in his Theses on the Socialist Revolution and the Right of Nations to Self-Determination as an integral plank in the programme of socialist internationalism and he quotes Lenin who contended that The right of nations to self-determination implies exclusively the right to independence in the political sense, the right to free political separation from the oppressor nation.  Specifically, this demand for political democracy implies complete freedom to agitate for secession and for a referendum on secession by the seceding nation.(In the Emerging System of International Criminal Law: Developments and Codification, Brill Publishers (1997) at page 90, Sunga traces the origin of the international movement against colonialism, and relates it to the rise of the right to self-determination in international law.)Liberalism, capitalism and colonialismliberals generally opposed colonialism and imperialism, including Smith, Bastiat, Cobden, John Bright, Henry Richard, Spencer, H. R. Fox Bourne, Edward Morel, Josephine Butler, W. J. Fox and Ewart Gladstone. Moreover, revolution was the first anti-colonial rebellion, inspiring others.(Liberal Anti-Imperialism, professor Daniel Klein, 1.7.2004)(Johannorberg.net 2004-9-4)Smith wrote in of Nations that Britain should liberate all of its colonies and also noted that it would be economically beneficial for British people in the average, although the merchants having mercantilist privileges would lose out.(Post-colonialismPost-colonialism (or post-colonial theory) can refer to a set of theories in philosophy and literature that grapple with the legacy of colonial rule. In this sense, postcolonial literature may be considered a branch of literature concerned with the political and cultural independence of peoples formerly subjugated in colonial empires. Many practitioners take Edward Sads book Orientalism (1978) as the theorys founding work (although French theorists such as Csaire and Fanon made similar claims decades before Said).Sad analysed the works of Balzac, Baudelaire and Lautramont, exploring how they both absorbed and helped to shape a societal fantasy of European racial superiority. Writers of post-colonial fiction interact with the traditional colonial discourse, but modify or subvert it; for instance by retelling a familiar story from the perspective of an oppressed minor character in the story. Chakravorty Spivaks Can the Subaltern Speak? (1998) gave its name to Studies.In A Critique of Postcolonial Reason (1999), Spivak explored how major works of European metaphysics (such as those of Kant and Hegel) not only tend to exclude the subaltern from their discussions, but actively prevent non-Europeans from occupying positions as fully human subjects. Hegels of Spirit (1807), famous for its explicit ethnocentrism, considers Western civilization as the most accomplished of all, while Kant also allowed some traces of racialism to enter his work.Impact of colonialism and colonizationThe impacts of colonization are immense and pervasive. (Come Back, Colonialism, All is Forgiven) Various effects, both immediate and protracted, include the spread of virulent diseases, the establishment of unequal social relations, exploitation, enslavement, medical advances, the creation of new institutions, and technological progress. Impact on healthEncounters between explorers and populations in the rest of the world often introduced new diseases, which sometimes caused local epidemics of extraordinary virulence.(Kenneth F. Kiple, ed. The Cambridge Historical Dictionary of Disease (2003)) For example, smallpox, measles, malaria, yellow fever, and others were unknown in pre-Columbian America.(Alfred W. Crosby, Jr., The Columbian Exchange: Biological and Cultural Consequences of 1492 (1974))Disease killed the entire native (Guanches) population of the Islands in the 16th century. Half the native population of Hispaniola in 1518 was killed by smallpox. Smallpox also ravaged Mexico in the 1520s, killing 150,000 in Tenochtitlan alone, including the emperor, and Peru in the 1530s, aiding the European conquerors. Measles killed a further two million Mexican natives in the 17th century. In 16181619, smallpox wiped out 90% of the Bay Native Americans.(Smallpox The Fight to Eradicate a Global Scourge, David A. Koplow) Smallpox epidemics in 17801782 and 18371838 brought devastation and drastic depopulation among the Indians.(The first smallpox epidemic on the Canadian Plains: In the fur-traders words, National Institutes of Health) Some believe that the death of up to 95% of the Native American population of the World was caused by World diseases.(The Story Of... Smallpox  and other Deadly Eurasian Germs) Over the centuries, the Europeans had developed high degrees of immunity to these diseases, while the peoples had no time to build no such immunity.(Stacy Goodling, Effects of European Diseases on the Inhabitants of the New World)Smallpox decimated the native population of Australia, killing around 50% of Australians in the early years of British colonisation.() It also killed many Zealand Mori.(New Zealand Historical Perspective) As late as 184849, as many as 40,000 out of 150,000 Hawaiians are estimated to have died of measles, cough and influenza. Introduced diseases, notably smallpox, nearly wiped out the native population of Island.(How did Easter Islands ancient statues lead to the destruction of an entire ecosystem?, The Independent) In 1875, measles killed over 40,000 Fijians, approximately one-third of the population.(Fiji School of Medicine) The Ainu population decreased drastically in the 19th century, due in large partto infectious diseases brought by Japanese settlers pouring into Hokkaido.(Meeting the First Inhabitants, TIMEasia.com, 21 August 2000)Conversely, researchers concluded that syphilis was carried from the New World to Europe after Columbuss voyages. The findings suggested Europeans could have carried the nonvenereal tropical bacteria home, where the organisms may have mutated into a more deadly form in the different conditions of Europe.(Genetic Study Bolsters Columbus Link to Syphilis, New York Times, January 15, 2008) The disease was more frequently fatal than it is today; syphilis was a major killer in Europe during the Renaissance.(Columbus May Have Brought Syphilis to Europe, LiveScience) The cholera pandemic began in Bengal, then spread across India by 1820. Ten thousand British troops and countless Indians died during this pandemic.(Choleras seven pandemics. CBC News. December 2, 2008) Between 1736 and 1834 only some 10% of India Companys officers survived to take the final voyage home.(Sahib: The British Soldier in India, 1750-1914 by Richard Holmes) Haffkine, who mainly worked in India, who developed and used vaccines against cholera and plague in the 1890s, is considered the first microbiologist.Countering diseaseAs early as 1803, the Spanish Crown organised a mission (the expedition) to transport the smallpox vaccine to the Spanish colonies, and establish mass vaccination programs there.(Dr. Francisco de Balmis and his Mission of Mercy, Society of Philippine Health History) By 1832, the federal government of the States established a smallpox vaccination program for Native Americans.(Lewis Cass and the Politics of Disease: The Indian Vaccination Act of 1832) Under the direction of Elphinstone a program was launched to propagate vaccination in India.(Smallpox History - Other histories of smallpox in South Asia) From the beginning of the 20th century onwards, the elimination or control of disease in tropical countries became a driving force for all colonial powers.(Conquest and Disease or Colonialism and Health?, Gresham College | Lectures and Events) The sleeping sickness epidemic in Africa was arrested due to mobile teams systematically screening millions of people at risk.() In the 20th century, the world saw the biggest increase in its population in history due to lessening of the rate in many countries due to medical advances.(The Origins of African Population Growth, by John Iliffe, The Journal of African HistoryVol. 30, No. 1 (1989), pp. 165-169) The population has grown from 1.6 billion in 1900 to an estimated 6.975 billion today.(World Population Clock - Worldometers)Some believe that discussion of how diseases were spread has been scuttled by descendants of colonialists to conceal actual origins of how indigenous populations were purposefully infected with these new diseases. An argument here is that once European colonists discovered indigenous populations were not immune to certain diseases, they deliberately spread diseases to gain military advantages and subjugate local peoples. The most infamous case involves suggestions by Lord Jeffery Amherst, British commander in chief for America during the so-called French and Indian Wars between 1754 to 1763,(http://www.college.ucla.edu/webproject/micro12/webpages/indianssmallpox.html) although history is mute on whether his barbaric suggestions were carried out. Many scholars have argued that evidence that supports this practice as having been executed on a larger scale across North America is weak. Yet, growing evidence is showing that other indigenous communities were purposefully infected, citing oral history from the descendants of said peoples. It has been regarded as one of the first instances of bio-terrorism or use of biological weapons in the history of warfare.(Ann F. Ramenofsky, Vectors of Death: The Archaeology of European Contact (Albuquerque, NM: University of New Mexico Press, 1987):)(Robert L. OConnell, Of Arms and Men: A History of War, Weapons, and Aggression (NY and Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1989)) There is, however, only one documented case of germ warfare, involving British commander Jeffrey Amherst.() It is uncertain whether this documented British attempt successfully infected the Native Americans.(Dixon, Never Come to Peace, 15255; McConnell, A Country Between, 19596; Dowd, War under Heaven, 190. For historians who believe the attempt at infection was successful, see Nester, Haughty Conquerors, 112; Jennings, Empire of Fortune, 44748.)See also*independence movements*of discovery*American Empire*Anticolonialism*Austria-Hungary*colonial empire*Empire*Empire*companies*and colonialism*mission*War*cinema*Empire*wars*in antiquity*India*Colony*(territory)*overseas colonies*Empire*of Liberty*colonization of the Americas*Exploration*colonial empire*colonial empire*eastward expansion*Empire*migration*of the British Empire*in Asia*Imperialism*Empire*Empire*Empire*Destiny*Empire*Empire*invasions*Empire*conquests*Empire*wars in Europe*Empire*Empire*Postcolonialism*Protectorate*to exist*Empire*colonialism*relations*Empire*occupations*Empire*Committee on Decolonization*King (Concept)*overseas colonies*program*geography*migration*Nations list of non-self-governing territories*colonial flags*of French possessions and colonies*of Muslim empires and dynastiesNotesReferences* Cooper, Frederick. Colonialism in Question: Theory, Knowledge, History (2005)* Getz, Trevor R. and Heather Streets-Salter, eds. Modern Imperialism and Colonialism: A Global Perspective (2010)* Stuchtey, Benedikt: Colonialism and Imperialism, 1450-1950, History Online, Mainz: of European History, 2011, retrieved: July 13, 2011.Primary sources* Conrad, Joseph, of Darkness, 1899* Fanon, Frantz, Wretched of the Earth, Pref. by Sartre. Translated by Constance Farrington. London : Penguin Book, 2001* Kipling, Rudyard, White Mans Burden, 1899* Las Casas, Bartolom de, Short Account of the Destruction of the Indies (1542, published in 1552)* LeCour Grandmaison, Olivier, Coloniser, Exterminer - Sur la guerre et lEtat colonial, Fayard, 2005, ISBN 2-213-62316-3* Lindqvist, Sven, Exterminate All The Brutes, 1992, New Press; Reprint edition (June 1997), ISBN 978-1-56584-359-2* Maria Petringa, Brazza, A Life for Africa (2006), ISBN 978-1-4259-1198-0* Jrgen Osterhammel, Colonialism: A Theoretical Overview, Princeton, NJ: M. Wiener, 1997.* Said, Edward, Orientalism, 1978; 25th-anniversary edition 2003 ISBN 978-0-394-74067-6External links* Liberal opposition to colonialism, imperialism and empire (pdf) - by professor Daniel Klein* * Globalization (and the metaphysics of control in a free market world) - an online video on globalization, colonialism, and control.ar:an:Colonialismoast:Colonialismuzh-min-nan:Sit-bn-ch-gbe:be-x-old:bs:Kolonijalizambg:ca:Colonialismecs:Kolonialismusny:Chitsamundacy:Trefedigaethrwyddda:Kolonialismede:Kolonialismuset:Kolonialismel:es:Colonialismoeo:Koloniismofa:hif:Upniweswaadfr:Colonialismegl:Colonialismoko:hi:hr:Kolonijalizamid:Kolonialismeis:Nlendustefnait:Colonialismohe:krc:sw:Ukoloniku:Kolontla:Colonialismuslv:Kolonilismslt:Kolonializmasml:arz:ms:Kolonialismenl:Kolonialismeja:no:Kolonialismenn:Kolonialismeoc:Colonialismepnb:pap:Kolonialismopl:Kolonializmpt:Colonialismoro:Colonialismrue:ru:sah:sq:Kolonializmiscn:Culunialismusimple:Colonialismsk:Kolonializmussl:Kolonializemsr:sh:Kolonijalizamfi:Kolonialismisv:Kolonialismtl:Kolonyalismota:te:th:tr:Smrgecilikuk:za:Cigminzcujyingha thc dnwa:Colnijhaedjewar:Kolonyalismoyi:bat-smg:Kuoluonlzmoszh:
7316
Hypothetical_types_of_biochemistry
Hypothetical types of biochemistry are forms of biochemistry speculated to be scientifically viable but not proven to exist at this time. While the kinds of living beings we know on earth commonly use carbon for basic structural and metabolic functions, water as a solvent and DNA or RNA to define and control their form, it is possible that undiscovered life-forms could exist that differ radically in their basic structures and biochemistry from that known to science.The possibility of life being based on these alternative biochemistries is a common subject in fiction, but is also discussed in a non-fiction scientific context. A recent example of the non-fiction discussion is a 2007 report on lifes limiting conditions prepared by a committee of scientists under the States National Research Council.(Committee on the Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems, Committee on the Origins and Evolution of Life, National Research Council; The Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems; The National Academies Press, 2007.) The committee, chaired by A. Baross, considers hypothetical alternative chemistries of life,(Committee on the Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems, Committee on the Origins and Evolution of Life, National Research Council; The Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems; The National Academies Press, 2007; page x) including a range of solvents other than water.(Committee on the Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems, Committee on the Origins and Evolution of Life, National Research Council; The Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems; The National Academies Press, 2007; pages 69 - 79)  The committee begins its discussion by raising the concern that a space agency might conduct a well-resourced search for life on other worlds and then fail to recognize it if it is encountered.(Committee on the Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems, Committee on the Origins and Evolution of Life, National Research Council; The Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems; The National Academies Press, 2007; page 5)Alternative-chirality biomoleculesPerhaps the least unusual alternative biochemistry would be one with differing chirality of its biomolecules. In known Earth-based life, acids are almost universally of the L form and sugars are of the D form. Molecules of opposite chirality have identical chemical properties to their mirrored forms, so life that used D amino acids or L sugars may be possible; molecules of such a chirality, however, would be incompatible with organisms using the opposing chirality molecules. It is questionable, however, whether such a biochemistry would be truly alien; while it is certainly an alternative stereochemistry, molecules that are overwhelmingly found in one enantiomer throughout the vast majority of organisms can nonetheless often be found in another enantiomer in different (often basal) organisms such as in comparisons between members of Archea and other domains, making it an open topic whether an alternative stereochemistry is truly novel.Non-carbon-based biochemistriesScientists have speculated about the pros and cons of using atoms other than carbon to form the molecular structures necessary for life, but no one has proposed a theory employing such atoms to form all the molecular machinery necessary for life. Still, since humans are carbon-based beings and have never encountered life outside the earths environment, excluding the possibility of all other elements may be considered chauvinism. Silicon biochemistry Image:Silane.png|thumb|right|250px|The structure of silane, the silicon-based analogue of methane.The most commonly proposed basis for an alternative biochemical system is the silicon atom, since silicon has many chemical properties similar to carbon and is in the same table group, the group. Like carbon, silicon can create molecules that are sufficiently large to carry biological information.()However, silicon has several drawbacks as a carbon alternative. Silicon, unlike carbon, lacks the ability to form chemical bonds with diverse types of atoms, which permits the chemical versatility necessary for metabolism. Elements creating organic functional groups with carbon include hydrogen, oxygen, nitrogen, phosphorus, sulfur, and metals such as iron, magnesium, and zinc. Silicon, on the other hand, interacts with very few other types of atoms.( Moreover, where it does interact with other atoms, silicon creates molecules that have been described as monotonous compared with the combinatorial universe of organic macromolecules.( This is because silicon atoms are much bigger, having a larger mass and radius, and so have difficulty forming double or triple bonds, which are important for a biochemical system.Silanes, which are compounds of hydrogen and silicon that are analogous to the alkane hydrocarbons, are highly reactive with water, and long-chain silanes spontaneously decompose. Molecules incorporating polymers of alternating silicon and oxygen atoms instead of direct bonds between silicon, known collectively as silicones, are much more stable. It has been suggested that silicone-based chemicals would be more stable than equivalent hydrocarbons in a sulfuric-acid-rich environment, as is found in some extraterrestrial locations.() Complex long-chain silicone molecules are still less stable than their carbon counterparts, though.Another obstacle is that dioxide (a common ingredient of many sands), the analog of dioxide, is a non-soluble solid at the temperature range where water is liquid, making it difficult for silicon to be introduced into water-based biochemical systems even if the necessary range of biochemical molecules could be constructed out of it. Another problem with silicon dioxide is that it would be the product of aerobic respiration. If a silicon-based life form were to breathe using oxygen, as life on Earth does, it would possibly produce silicon dioxide as a by-product of this, assuming that the only difference between the two types of life is silicon in place of carbon. This implies that the exhaled product, silicon dioxide, would be a solid, thus filling the respiratory organs of the organism with sand. This however would be solved if the organism lives in temperatures of several hundred to thousand degrees, where the silicon dioxide becomes a liquid. Oxygen-breathing silicon life, if it exists, is therefore most likely to exist in environments with very high temperatures or pressure.Finally, of the varieties of molecules identified in the medium , 84 are based on carbon while only 8 are based on silicon.() Moreover, of those 8 compounds, four also include carbon within them. The cosmic abundance of carbon to silicon is roughly 10 to 1. This may suggest a greater variety of complex carbon compounds throughout the cosmos, providing less of a foundation upon which to build silicon-based biologies, at least under the conditions prevalent on the surface of planets.Also, even though Earth and other planets are exceptionally silicon-rich and carbon-poor (the relative abundance of silicon to carbon in the Earths crust is roughly 925:1()), terrestrial life is carbon-based. The fact that carbon, though rare, has proven to be much more successful as a life base than the much more abundant silicon, may be evidence that silicon is poorly suited for biochemistry on Earth-like planets. For example: silicon is less versatile than carbon in forming compounds; the compounds formed by silicon are unstable and it blocks the flow of heat.() Even so, silica is used by some Earth life, such as the silicate skeletal structure of diatoms. This suggests that extraterrestrial life forms may have silicon-based structure molecules and carbon-based proteins for metabolic purposes, therefore enabling the ability to feed on a common resource on a terrestrial planet like Earth for building up the silicon-based part of their body.Silicon compounds may possibly be biologically useful under temperatures or pressures different from the surface of a terrestrial planet, either in conjunction with or in a role less directly analogous to carbon.A. G. Cairns-Smith has proposed that the first living organisms to exist on Earth were clay mineralswhich were probably based on silicon.()In cinematic and literary fiction, a moment when man-made machines cross from nonliving to living, it is often posited, this new form would be the first example of non-carbon-based life. Since the advent of the microprocessor in the late 1960s, these machines are often classed as computers (or computer-guided robots) and filed under silicon-based life, even though the silicon backing matrix of these processors is not nearly as fundamental to their operation as carbon is for wet life.Nitrogen and phosphorus biochemistryNitrogen and phosphorus also offer possibilities as the basis for biochemical molecules. Like carbon, phosphorus can form long chain molecules on its own, which would potentially allow it to form complex macromolecules were it not so reactive. However, in combination with nitrogen, it can form much more stable covalent bonds and create a wide range of molecules, including rings (a class of compounds called phosphazenes).Earths atmosphere is approximately 78% nitrogen, but this would probably not be of much use to a phosphorus-nitrogen (P-N) life-form since molecular nitrogen (N2) is nearly inert and energetically expensive to fix due to its triple bond. On the other hand, one could say that some Earth plants such as legumes can fix nitrogen using symbiotic bacteria contained in their root nodules, but those bacteria have to exist before the nitrogen fixation process they perform can actually take place. On Earth, the intense temperatures created by lightning split atmospheric nitrogen in order to make it available for the first nitrogen containing organisms to use. A dioxide (NO2) or ammonia (NH3) atmosphere would be more useful. Nitrogen also forms several oxides, such as oxide, oxide, and tetroxide, and all would be present in a nitrogen-dioxide-rich atmosphere.* In a nitrogen dioxide atmosphere, P-N plant analogues could absorb nitrogen dioxide from the air and phosphorus from the ground. The nitrogen dioxide would be reduced, with analogues to sugar being produced in the process, and waste oxygen would be released into the atmosphere. Animals based on phosphorus and nitrogen would consume the plants, use atmospheric oxygen to metabolize the sugar analogues, exhaling nitrogen dioxide and depositing phosphorus, or phosphorus-rich material, as solid waste.* In an ammonia atmosphere, P-N plants would absorb ammonia from the air and phosphorus from the ground, then oxidize the ammonia to produce P-N sugars and release hydrogen waste. P-N animals are now the reducers, breathing in hydrogen and converting the P-N sugars to ammonia and phosphorus. This is the opposite pattern of oxidation and reduction from a nitrogen dioxide world, and from the known biochemistry of Earth. It would be analogous to Earths atmospheric carbon supply being in the form of methane instead of dioxide.Debate continues, as several aspects of a phosphorus-nitrogen cycle biology would be energy deficient. Also, nitrogen and phosphorus are unlikely to occur in the ratios and quantity required in the universe. Carbon, being preferentially formed during nuclear fusion, is more abundant and is more likely to end up in a preferred location.An ammoniated atmosphere would be possible and stable at first view (in a reductive environment), and this type of environment would be preferencially present on massive planets which are more likely to retain hydrogen slowing down its escape to space, and have thick atmosphere that better protect ammonia from radiations; like super-Earth with mass in range between the Earth and the little giant planets like Uranus and Neptune. But it is doubtful that an atmosphere rich in nitrogen dioxide could even exist. Since the nitrogen oxides are all endoenergetic compared with molecular nitrogen and oxygen; and they are oxidizing, they would decompose by stellar radiation and by catalysis on the surface of rocks when they are produced. Unlike nitrogen dioxide, the chemically similar gas trifluoride is not endoenergetic and is more stable, but the relative rarity of fluorine means that NF3 is unlikely to be present in large enough concentrations in any atmosphere. Other exotic element-based biochemistries * Borons chemistry is possibly even more variable than that of carbon, since it has the ability to form polyhedral clusters and two-electron bonds. Boranes are dangerously explosive in Earths atmosphere, but would be more stable in a reducing environment. However, borons low cosmic abundance makes it less likely as a base for life than carbon.* Various metals, together with oxygen, can form very complex and thermally stable structures rivaling those of organic compounds; the acids are one such family. Some metal oxides are also similar to carbon in their ability to form both nanotube structures and diamond-like crystals (such as zirconia). Titanium, aluminum, magnesium and iron are all more abundant in the Earths crust than carbon. Metal oxide-based life could therefore be a possibility under certain conditions, including those (such as high temperatures) at which carbon-based life would be unlikely.* Sulfur is also able to form long-chain molecules, but suffers from the same high reactivity problems as phosphorus and silanes. The biological use of sulfur as an alternative to carbon is purely theoretical, especially since sulfur usually forms only linear chains rather than branched ones. (The biological use of sulfur as an electron acceptor is widespread and can be traced back 3.5 billion years on Earth, thus predating the use of molecular oxygen.(Early Archaean Microorganisms Preferred Elemental Sulfur, Not Sulfate Science AAAS, by Philippot, et al., (14 September 2007)) bacteria can utilize elemental sulfur instead of oxygen, reducing sulfur to sulfide.)Carbon-based alternatives to hydrocarbonsIn hydrogen-depleted or strongly oxidizing environments, a carbon-based biology in which little to no hydrogen is used might be a possibility. Such hydrogenless life would use oxocarbons (such as anhydride or similar) as its building blocks, instead of hydrocarbons. Chlorine as an alternative to oxygenA number of alternatives to molecular oxygen as a terminal electron acceptor are known from anaerobic life forms on Earth. However, it has been proposed that chlorine might serve as a more general biological alternative to oxygen, either in carbon-based biologies or hypothetical non-carbon-based ones. But chlorine is much less abundant than oxygen in the universe, and so planets with a sufficiently chlorine-rich atmosphere are likely to be rare, if they exist at all. Chlorine will instead likely be bound up as salts and other inert compounds.Arsenic as an alternative to phosphorusArsenic, which is chemically similar to phosphorus, while poisonous for most life forms on Earth, is incorporated into the biochemistry of some organisms.() Some algae incorporate arsenic into complex organic molecules such as arsenosugars and arsenobetaines. Fungi and bacteria can produce volatile methylated arsenic compounds. Arsenate reduction and arsenite oxidation have been observed in microbes (arsenatis).() Additionally, some prokaryotes can use arsenate as a terminal electron acceptor during anaerobic growth and some can utilize arsenite as an electron donor to generate energy.It has been speculated that the earliest life forms on Earth may have used arsenic in place of phosphorus in the backbone of their DNA.() A common objection to this scenario is that arsenate esters are so much less stable to hydrolysis than corresponding phosphate esters that arsenic would not be suitable for this function.() The authors of a 2010 geomicrobiology study supported in part by NASA have postulated that a bacterium, named GFAJ-1, collected in the sediments of Lake in eastern California, can employ such arsenic DNA when cultured without phosphorus.()() They proposed that the bacterium may employ high levels of poly--hydroxybutyrate or other means to reduce the effective concentration of water and stabilize its arsenate esters.(This claim was heavily criticized almost immediately after publication for the perceived lack of appropriate controls()() Science writer Zimmer contacted several scientists for an assessment: I reached out to a dozen experts ... Almost unanimously, they think the NASA scientists have failed to make their case.() Selenium or tellurium as an alternative to sulfur Some organisms are already known to feature selenoproteins, in which sulfur is replaced by selenium. Some fungi also can produce telluro-methionine and telluro-cysteine. No organism has yet been shown to completely replace sulfur with the heavier chalcogens, however.Non-water solventsIn addition to carbon compounds, all currently known terrestrial life also requires water as a solvent. This has led to discussion about whether water is the only liquid capable of filling that role. The idea that an extraterrestrial life-form might be based on a solvent other than water has been taken seriously in recent scientific literature by the biochemist Benner,(Text as pdf from www.sciencedirect.com (accessed 13 July 2011)) and by the astrobiological committee chaired by John A. Baross.(  Solvents discussed by the Baross committee include ammonia,(Committee on the Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems, Committee on the Origins and Evolution of Life, National Research Council; The Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems; The National Academies Press, 2007; p 72) acid,(Committee on the Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems, Committee on the Origins and Evolution of Life, National Research Council; The Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems; The National Academies Press, 2007; p 73)formamide,(Committee on the Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems, Committee on the Origins and Evolution of Life, National Research Council; The Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems; The National Academies Press, 2007; p 74) hydrocarbons,(and (at temperatures much lower than Earths) liquid nitrogen, or hydrogen in the form of a fluid.(Committee on the Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems, Committee on the Origins and Evolution of Life, National Research Council; The Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems; The National Academies Press, 2007; p 75)Sagan once described himself as both a chauvinist and a water chauvinist;()however on another occasion he said he was a carbon chauvinist but not that much of a water chauvinist.() He considered hydrocarbons,() acid,() and ammonia (( as possible alternatives to water.Some of the properties of water that are important for life processes include a large temperature range over which it is liquid, a high capacity useful for temperature regulation, a large of vaporization, and the ability to dissolve a wide variety of compounds. Water is also amphoteric, meaning it can donate and accept an H+ ion allowing it to act as an acid or a base. This property is crucial in many organic and biochemical reactions, where water serves as a solvent, a reactant, or a product. There are other chemicals with similar properties that have sometimes been proposed as alternatives. Additionally, water is the only compound listed here that is less dense as a solid (ice) than as a liquid. This is why bodies of water freeze over but do not freeze solid (from the bottom up). If ice were denser than liquid water (as is true for nearly all other compounds) then large bodies of liquid would slowly freeze solid, which would not be conducive to the formation of life.There are some properties that make certain compounds and elements much more favorable than others as solvents in a successful biosphere. The solvent must be able to exist in liquid equilibrium over a range of temperatures the planetary object would normally encounter. Since boiling points can vary based on the pressure, the question tends not to be does the prospective solvent remain liquid, but at what pressure. For example, cyanide has a narrow liquid phase temperature range at 1 atmosphere, but in an atmosphere with the pressure of Venus, with  of pressure, it can indeed exist in liquid form over a wide temperature range.AmmoniaAmmonia is perhaps the most commonly proposed alternative. Numerous chemical reactions are possible in an ammonia solution, and liquid ammonia has some chemical similarities with water. Ammonia can dissolve most organic molecules at least as well as water does, and in addition it is capable of dissolving many elemental metals. Given this set of chemical properties it has been theorized that ammonia-based life forms might be possible.However, ammonia has some problems as a basis for life. The bonds between ammonia molecules are weaker than those in water, causing ammonias of vaporization to be half that of water, its tension to be three times smaller, and reducing its ability to concentrate non-polar molecules through a hydrophobic effect. For these reasons, some members of the scientific community question how well ammonia could hold prebiotic molecules together to allow the emergence of a self-reproducing system. Ammonia is also flammable and can be oxidized and could not exist sustainably in a biosphere that oxidizes it. It would, however, be stable in a environment.A biosphere based on ammonia would likely exist at temperatures or air pressures that are extremely unusual for terrestrial life on Earth. Terrestrial life on Earth usually exists within the melting point and point of water at pressure, between 0 C (273 K) and 100 C (373 K); at normal pressure ammonias melting and boiling points are between 78 C (195 K) and 33 C (240 K). Such extremely cold temperatures create problems, as they slow biochemical reactions tremendously and may cause biochemical precipitation out of solution due to high points. Ammonia could be a liquid at normal temperatures, but at much higher pressures; for example, at 60 atm, ammonia melts at 77 C (196 K) and boils at 98 C (371 K).Ammonia and ammonia-water mixtures remain liquid at temperatures far below the freezing point of pure water, so such biochemistries might be well suited to planets and moons orbiting outside the water-based zone. Such conditions could exist, for example, under the surface of Saturns largest moon Titan.()MethaneA mixture of hydrocarbons, such as the methane/ethane lakes detected on Titan by the Cassini spacecraft, could act as a solvent over a wide range of temperatures but would lack polarity. There is debate about the effectiveness of methane as a medium for life compared to water or ammonia.(Committee on the Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems, Committee on the Origins and Evolution of Life, National Research Council; The Limits of Organic Life in Planetary Systems; The National Academies Press, 2007; page 74.) While water is a far better solvent than methane, enabling easier transport of substances in a cell,() methanes lesser chemical reactivity allows for the easier formation of large structures akin to proteins.() Asimov, the biochemist and fiction writer, suggested that poly-lipids could form a substitute for proteins in a non-polar solvent such as methane or hydrogen.()Possible evidence for this form of on Titan was identified in 2010 by Darrell Strobel of Hopkins University; an over-abundance of hydrogen in Titans upper atmospheric layers, which leads to a downward flow at a rate of roughly 1025 molecules per second. Near the surface the hydrogen apparently disappears, which may imply its consumption by methanogenic life forms.(()() Another paper released the same month showed little evidence of acetylene on Titans surface, where scientists had expected the compound to accumulate; according Strobel, this is consistent with the hypothesis that acetylene is being consumed by methanogens.( Chris McKay, while agreeing that presence of life is a possible explanation for the findings about hydrogen and acetylene, has cautioned that other explanations are currently more likely: namely the possibility that the results are due to human error, or to the presence of some as-yet unknown catalyst in the soil.()  He noted that such a catalyst, effective at 95 Kelvin, would in itself be a startling discovery.(Hydrogen fluoridefluoride, like water, is a polar molecule, and due to its polarity it can dissolve many ionic compounds. Its melting point is 84 C and its boiling point is 19.54 C (at pressure); the difference between the two is little more than 100 C. HF also makes hydrogen bonds with its neighbor molecules as do water and ammonia. These would make HF a candidate to host life on other planets.Not much research has been done on liquid HF in regards to its ability to dissolve and react with non-polar molecules. The biota in an HF ocean could use the fluorine as an electron acceptor to photosynthesize energy.HF is dangerous to the systems of molecules that earth-life is made of, but the paraffins are stable with it.(But presence of great amounts of free HF on a planetary scale, like water on Earth, is only possible outside the temperature range from liquid water and water vapour.  Any free water would be react with the polar HF and would form a solution of acid. The hypothetical planet would also surely contain silicates that would react with HF to form inert compounds as silicon fluorides, as soon as HF would be present; thus preventing its concentration in great quantities in a hypothetical planetary environment.The cosmic abundance of fluorine is low, and it forms chemically inert compounds rapidly in interstellar nebulae, because it is the most reactive element.Other solvents or cosolventsOther solvents sometimes proposed include formamide, methanol, sulfide and chloride. Hydrogen chloride suffers from the low cosmic abundance of chlorine, while hydrogen sulfide suffers from its high reactivity. Moreover, the first two could not be expected to be found in vast quantities on a planetary scale, and would only be part of the internal physiology of organisms.A proposal has been made that on Mars may exist and be using a mixture of water and peroxide as its solvent. A 61.2% (by weight) mix of water and hydrogen peroxide has a freezing point of 56.5 C, and also tends to super-cool rather than crystallize. It is also hygroscopic, an advantage in a water-scarce environment.()()Molten saltsA molten salt, or a eutectic mixture of such salts, could remain liquid at extremely high temperatures, and could theoretically act as a solvent.  Life in such circumstances may be restricted to materials like metal oxides.  The participation of metal oxide compounds in a biochemical system is unlikely, as their molecular structures are simpler compared to organic compounds and they are largely inert.Other types of speculationsNon-green photosynthesizersPhysicists have noted that, while photosynthesis on Earth generally involves green plants, a variety of other colored plants could also support photosynthesis, essential for most life on Earth, and that other colors might be preferred in places that receive a different mix of stellar radiation than that received on Earth.()()  These studies indicate that while blue photosynthetic plants would be unlikely (because absorbed blue light provides some of the highest photosynthetic yields in the light spectrum), yellow or red plants are plausible. These conclusions are based in part on the luminosity spectra of different types of stars, the transmission characteristics of hypothetical planetary atmospheres, and the absorption spectra of various pigments from organisms on Earth.The first plants on Earth may have been a slightly different colour, because the Sun was, in the first geological eons, a little less bright, and its light was filtered by passing through an atmosphere with a different composition.Black is the optimum color for converting all available light to energy as efficiently as possible.It is as of yet unclear exactly why plants on Earth are green and not black.Alternative atmospheresThe gases present in the atmosphere on Earth have varied greatly over its history. Traditional plant photosynthesis has terraformed the atmosphere by sequestering carbon from carbon dioxide, increasing the proportion of molecular oxygen, and by participating in the cycle. Modern oxygen breathing animals would have been biochemically impossible until earlier photosynthetic life transformed Earths atmosphere. The first dramatic rise in atmospheric oxygen on Earth, to about a tenth of its present-day value, occurred approximately 2.5 billion years ago, and that level did not change significantly until the Cambrian era approximately 600 million years ago.()Changes in the gas mixture in the atmosphere, even in an atmosphere made up predominantly of the same molecules of Earths atmosphere, impacts the biochemistry and morphology of life. For example, periods of high oxygen concentrations determined from ice core samples have been associated with fauna of a larger scale in the fossil record, while periods associated with of low oxygen concentrations have been associated with fauna of a smaller scale in the fossil record.()Also, while it is customary to think of plants on one side of the oxygen and nitrogen cycles as being sessile, and of animals on the other side as being motile, this is not a biological imperative. There are animals which are sessile for all or most of their lives (such as corals), and there are plants (such as tumbleweeds, and fly traps) that exhibit more mobility than is customarily associated with plants. On a slowly rotating planet, for example, it might be adaptive for photosynthesis to be performed by plants that can move to remain in the light, like Earths sunflowers; while non-photosynthetic animals, much like Earths fungi, might have a lesser need to move from place to place on their own. This would be a mirror image of Earths ecology.Variable environmentsMany Earth plants and animals undergo major biochemical changes during their life cycles as a response to changing environmental conditions, for example, by having a spore or hibernation state that can be sustained for years or even millennia between more active life stages. Thus, it would be biochemically possible to sustain life in environments that are only periodically consistent with life as we know it.For example, frogs in cold climates can survive for extended periods of time with most of their body water in a frozen state,() while desert frogs in Australia can become inactive and dehydrate in dry periods, losing up to 75% of their fluids, yet return to life by rapidly rehydrating in wet periods.(Main and Bentley, Ecology, Water Relations of Australian Burrowing Frogs and Tree Frogs (1964)) Either type of frog would appear biochemically inactive (i.e. not living) during dormant periods to anyone lacking a sensitive means of detecting low levels of metabolism.Nonplanetary lifeDust and plasma-basedIn 2007 N. Tsytovich and colleagues proposed that life-like behaviors could be exhibited by dust particles suspended in a plasma, under conditions that might exist in space.()() Computer models showed that when the dust became charged the particles could self-organize into microscopic helical structures capable of replicating themselves, interacting with other neighboring structures,and evolving into more stable forms. Similar forms of life were described in Hoyles classic novel Black Cloud.Usage in fictionIn the realm of science fiction, there have occasionally been forms of life proposed that, while often highly speculative and unsupported by rigorous theoretical examination, are nevertheless interesting and in some cases even plausible.Novels, short stories and comicsIn C. Clarkes short story Technical Error there is an example of differing chirality. This is not a case of alien life, rather it is an accident. A technical error in a new power plant changes the chirality of a worker. He cannot read because he sees all type as reversed, and he believes his left side is his right. The amusement ends when it is discovered that he is dying from malnutrition because his new biology cannot utilize normal food.The concept of reversed chirality also figured prominently in the plot of Blishs Star Trek novel Must Die!, where a transporter experiment gone awry ends up creating a duplicate Spock who turns out to be a perfect mirror-image of the original all the way down to the atomic level.An example of silicon based life forms takes place in the Dean Foster novel to Prism in which the protagonist Evan Orgell is trapped on a planet whose entire ecosystem is mostly silicon-based.Perhaps the most extreme example in science fiction is James Whites General: a series of novels and short stories about multienvironment hospital for the strangest life-forms imaginable, some of them breathing methane, chlorine, water and sometimes also oxygen. Some of the species metabolise directly hard radiation and their environment doesnt differ much from the atmosphere of a star, while others live in near absolute zero temperatures. All life forms are classified according to their metabolism, internal and external features, and more extreme abilities (telepathy, empathy, hive mind, etc.) with four letter codes. Humans from Earth share the DBDG specification with small furry beings called Nidians.One of the major sentient species in Pratchetts Discworld universe are the earth-based (ranging from Detritus to Diamond) Trolls.Pratchett has also written the science fiction novel Dark Side of the Sun which features a range of extraordinary life-forms, including a telepathic body of water, creatures called Sundogs, which are capable of interstellar travel from birth, and a sentient planet: effectively a giant silicon-based computer.Hoyles classic novel Black Cloud features a life form consisting of a vast cloud of interstellar dust, the individual particles of which interact via electromagnetic signalling analogous to how the individual cells of multicellular terrestrial life interact. Outside of science-fiction, life in interstellar dust has been proposed as part of the panspermia hypothesis. The low temperatures and densities of interstellar clouds would seem to imply that life processes would operate much more slowly there than on Earth. Inorganic dust-based life has been speculated upon based on recent computer simulations.(Similarly, Arthur C. Clarkes Crusade revolves around a planetwide life-form based on silicon and superfluid helium located in deep intergalactic space, processing its thoughts slowly by human standards, that sends probes to look for similar life in nearby galaxies. It concludes that it needs to make planets more habitable for similar life-forms, and sends out other probes to foment supernovae to do so. Clarke implies that this is what accounts for most supernovae having occurred in the same region of space and warns that the effort will eventually reach Earth.L. Forwards 30K describes an ecosystem on the surface of belt objects that is based on a fluorocarbon chemistry with OF2 as the principal solvent instead of H2O. The organisms in this ecology keep warm by secreting a pellet of uranium-235 inside themselves and then moderating its nuclear fission using a boron-rich carapace around it. Kuiper belt objects are known to be rich in organic compounds such as tholins, so some form of life existing on their surfaces is not entirely implausiblethough perhaps not going so far as to develop natural internal nuclear reactors, as have Forwards. Fluorine is also of low cosmic abundance, so its use in this manner is unlikely.In Forwards Rocheworld series, an Earth-like biochemistry is proposed that uses a mixture of water and ammonia as its solvent. In Egg and Starquake, Forward proposes life on the surface of a star utilizing nuclear chemistry in the matter crust. Since such life utilised nuclear forces instead of electromagnetic interactions, it was posited that life might function millions of times faster than typical on Earth.Benford and Brins of the Comet features a comet with a conventional carbon-and-water-based ecosystem that becomes active near the perihelion when the Sun warms it. Brins own novel Sundiver is an example of science fiction proposing a form of life existing within the plasma atmosphere of a star using complex self-sustaining fields. Similar sorts of plasmoid life have sometimes been proposed to exist in other places, such as planetary ionospheres or the medium, but usually only by fringe theorists (see lightning for some additional discussion). Gregory Benford had a form of plasma-based life exist in the disk of a black hole in his novel Eater.The suggestion that life could even occur within the plasma of a star has been picked up by other science fiction writers, as in David Brins Uplift Saga or Frederik Pohls novel World at the End of Time. The idea is that places where reactions occureven an incredible environment as a starpresents a possible medium for some chain of events that could produce a system able to replicate.The Outsiders in Nivens Space universe are cryogenic creatures based on helium. They derive thermoelectric energy from a temperature gradient by basking half their body in sunlight, keeping the other half in shadow and exposed to interstellar vacuum.Baxter has imagined perhaps some of the most unusual exotic life-forms in his Xeelee series of novels and stories, including supersymmetric photino-based life that congregate in the gravity wells of stars, entities composed of quantum functions, and the Qax, who thrive in any form of cells, from swamp gas to the atmospheres of giants. In his book Space, he also proposes natural robots, life forms made of iron, called the Gaijin, evolving from creatures in oceans of carbonyl.In his novel Diaspora, Egan posits entire virtual universes implemented on Machines encoded by Wang Tiles in gargantuan polysaccharide carpets. The sentient ocean that covers much of the surface of Solaris in Lems eponymous novel also seems, from much of the fictional research quoted and discussed in the book, to be based on some element other than carbon. In the same novel Egan describes lifeforms in the 6-D macrosphere which use a collapsed atom chemistry with energetic processes of the same order as nuclear reactions, due to the peculiarities of higher dimensional physics.In her novel Brain Plague, Slonczewski describes a species of intelligent microrganisms with arsenic based chemistries that live symbiotically with human hosts.Sergeant Schlock is one of the lead characters in the webcomic Mercenary. His species, Carbosilicate Amorphs, evolved from self-repairing distributed storage devices, and as such, redundantly distribute their brain throughout their body. They are highly resistant to vacuum, decompression, weapons, chemical-based explosives, and dismemberment. Their only specialty organ is their eyes, which they harvest as fruit from the Ghanj-Rho eye-tree on their home planet. While the Amorphs have the ability to move fast, quietly,() and sprout appendages at will, they excel at closer-than-melee-range combat, primarily meme-toxins against other Amorphs.A more farcical example comes from Hitchhikers Guide to the Galaxy, where the Hooloovoo are a hyperintelligent shade of the colour blue.Alien warriors recruited by the god Klael in Eddings Tamuli trilogy are noted by their human opponents to breathe marsh-gas (methane). Within Eddings universe, this limits their capacity for exertion in an oxygen atmosphere, and also determines the tactics used to fight them and eventually to destroy them in their encampments.The eponymous organism in Crichtons Andromeda Strain is described as reproducing via the direct conversion of energy into matter.Star TrekImage:STDevilDark.jpg|thumb|right|180px|A Horta, a fictional silicon-based life-form in the Trek universe.A well-known example of a noncarbon-based life-form in science fiction is the Horta in the original Star Trek episode Devil in the Dark. A highly intelligent silicon-based creature made almost entirely of pure rock, it tunnels through rock as easily as humans move through air. The entire species dies out every 50,000 years except for one who tends for all the eggs, which take the form of silicon nodules scattered throughout the caverns and tunnels of its home planet, Janus VI. The inadvertent destruction of many of these eggs by a human mining colony led the mother Horta to respond by killing the colonists and sabotaging their equipment; it was only through a mind meld that the races benevolence and intelligence were discovered and peaceful relations established.Star Trek would later offer other corporeal life-forms with an alternative biochemistry. The Tholians of Tholian Web are depicted and described, in that episode and later in the Trek: Enterprise episode In a Mirror, Darkly as being primarily of mineral-based composition and thriving only in superheated conditions. Another episode from TOSs third season, Savage Curtain, depicted another rock creature called an Excalbian, which is believed in fanon to also have been silicon-based.(SciFi.com StarTrek Syfy) ()In Trek: The Next Generation, the Entity appeared in two episodes, Datalore and Avatar. This was an enormous spacefaring crystal lattice that had taken thousands of lives in its quest for energy. It may have been unaware of this, however, but it was destroyed before communications could be established at a level sufficient to ascertain it.In another episode, Soil, intelligent crystals that formed a microbrain were discovered during a terraforming mission, and they described the humans they encountered as ugly bags of mostly water.The Disease, an episode of Trek: Voyager featured some artificially-engineered silicon-based parasites, and an Enterprise episode, Observer Effect, also presented a lethal silicon-based virus.In another Voyager episode, Hope and Fear, a xenon-based life-form was mentioned. In the Enterprise episode The Communicator, an alien species is encountered whose blood chemistry, while not explicitly stated, is sufficiently different from terrestrial organisms that it is not red and iron is toxic to it. Various Star Trek series also had episodes featuring photonic lifeforms.Star WarsIn the Wars movie Empire Strikes Back, two life-forms were encountered by the characters that were non-carbon based entities. Although details of their physiology were not mentioned on screen, the slug, (a giant worm-like creature that lived on asteroids in the vacuum of space),()() and the Mynock, (pesky bat-like vermin that would attach to spaceship hulls and chew through power conduits to feed off the raw energy),()() are said to be silicon-based organisms in Wars Expanded Universe sources. Also from The Empire Strikes Back, the hunter Zuckuss is a member of the Gand race, an ammonia-based life-form. However, it is worth noting that the Gand are divided into two subspecies, only one of which breathes at all, the other drawing all their required sustenance from food intake and producing speech by essentially modulated flatulence.Appearing only in the Wars Expanded Universe is the spice spider of Kessel, a creature made of glitterstim spice and silicon that spun crystalline webs harvested by miners as glitterstim spice, an illegal psychoactive narcotic. The spider used the webs to catch bogeys, tiny energy creatures that it consumed for energy.()()Other film and television* In the movie A.E., an alien race called the Drej were composed of a coherent plasma.* In the movie Monolith Monsters, a silicon meteor reproduces, draining silicates from everything it touches. It needs water to start its cycle and contains molecular structures typical of many kinds of rocks, mixed together. A geologist says that its structure is nearly impossible. The meteor is killed by salt water, which can stop the cycle.* In Firewalker, a second-season episode of X-Files, a silicon-based plant that infects humans parasitically through its spores is discovered living deep in a volcano.* Also from The X-Files, the first-season episode Ice deals with an ammonia-based vermiform parasite.* A key plot point in the comedy Evolution involves nitrogen-based life forms, and using selenium-based shampoo to poison them (with the bonus of a product placement for & Shoulders).* In the SG-1 fourth season episode Earth, a Human society known as the Enkarans are threatened on their new homeworld by an alien ship that is terraforming the planet to be suitable for the sulfur-based Gadmeer species.* In the Atlantis fifth season episode Remnants, a device is found whose purpose was to seed a planet with silicon-based life.* In 10, both the Omnitrix alien Diamondhead and the alien hunter Tetrax Shard are members of the Petrosapien species, which are a form of silicon-based life.  Other silicon-based lifeforms on the show include the Omnitrix aliens Chromostone (who is crystalline), and Echo Echo and Upgrade (who are both biomechanical).  Other members of Upgrades species have appeared, including the shape-shifting Ship, a pet of Bens girlfriend, Julie.* In Dragon Ball Z, shortly before the destruction of Namek, Frieza tells Goku that he does not need to breathe. This would allow him to survive the destruction of the planet and suggest that he is not a carbon-based life-form.* Jones and the Kingdom of the Crystal Skull (2008) introduces thirteen extra dimensional beings with crystal skeletons, who founded a city that became the basis of the Dorado myth. Though their flesh has died and rotted away, their minds still live on within their skeletons, which communicate telepathically.* An episode (The Chrysalids) of the series 1999 presents humanoids on a planet protected by a electric waves system, which are living in a chlorine atmosphere.*The episode The Stones of Blood, of the 16th season of Who, the Fourth Doctor encounters the Ogri, a silicon-based life form, and in the same sub-plot, the Megara, who are made entirely out of an unknown substance, possibly energy, and they uphold the word of the law, and execute all who break the law with a beam of energy.Computer and video gamesIn the Command & Conquer strategy games, both the gameplay and storyline revolve heavily around the introduction to Earth of an extraterrestrial mutagen called Tiberium via meteor, which displays strikingly lifelike behaviours such as self-replication, evolution, and homeostasis, without undergoing anything like common carbon-based metabolic cycles, and which appears to be colonising the Earth, converting it into an environment unsuited to carbon-based biology. Earth creatures (such as animals, plants and even humans) exposed to Tiberium can either be killed because of the radiation or be transformed into Tiberium-based life-forms, to whom Tiberium radiation is curative rather than toxic. It is later revealed that Tiberium was introduced to earth by the Scrin, an extremely advanced race of Tiberium-based aliens bent on mining the planet after the Tiberium deposits have reached maturity.In the Halo video game series, a race of Covenant aliens named Grunts by humans require a breathing apparatus while fighting the humans in an Earth-like atmosphere. According to the novelizations of the video game, the Grunts apparatus allows them to breathe the methane they need to survive.In the of Orion series of space strategy games, there exists an extraterrestrial race called Silicoids, whose appearance (and presumably composition) is similar to crystalline mineral structures. The game posits that this grants them immunity to the effects of hostile environments and pollution and they require no sustenance, at the expense of impeding their reproductive rate and their ability to interact with other intelligent species.In the Prime series, Phazon is a highly radioactive, self-regenerating mineral with organic properties that is generated by the sentient planet Phaaze.In Prime Hunters, Spire is a rock-like, silicon-based alien. He is the last Diamont (presumably a play on the word diamond, which is composed of carbon).In the TITANS strategy game,  the alien race in the game are called the Silicons because they are silicon-based life forms.In the Control series, the Chenjesu, are hyperintelligent, peaceful silicon-based life-forms that were the backbone of the Alliance of Free Stars. Their crystalline biology apparently gives them the ability to send and receive hyperwave transmissions. Also, there are the Slylandro, who are gas beings residing in the upper atmosphere of a giant. As well, there are evidences of another silicon-based race, the Taalo who are described by the xenophobic Ur-Quan as the only race to have not awakened their territorial instincts. The Taalo were also immune to mind controlIn the game of Xenosaga, artificial life forms known as Realians have been created using silicon-based chemistry. They resemble humans in every aspect, except they are considered to be lower than humans on the social ladder.In Effect the alien Turians and Quarians, are both based on dextro-amino acids, as opposed to the all other sentient species of the galaxy based on levo-amino acids. There are also the Volus, an ammonia based species that must wear pressure suits to survive in environments suited to the other races.In Spore, the Grox refer to the player and to other alien empires as slow thinking carbon-based lifeforms and carbon wads, implying that the Grox (which are at least partly machine life) are not carbon-based. Also, the Grox can only exist on barren planets which cannot support other life, and when a planet is terraformed the Grox inhabiting it die immediately. The Grox seem to gather sustenance from the radiation from the galactic core, as the Grox colonies are larger the closer they are to the galactic core.In Luv, the BETA which calls itself the higher/superior existence says they were created by a silicon-based being simply called The Creator. As such, they dont consider any non-silicon-based creature to be alive, not even themselves. Its reasoning was that only silicon-based beings occur naturally and have the ability to reproduce and disperse. When the human main character, Takeru, argues that humans also have the ability to reproduce and disperse, the higher existence says carbon too easily mingles with other elements and therefore it would be impossible for a carbon-based existence to have evolved on its own. Thus, humans must be other biological machines created by a life form just as the BETA are.See also* biology* Astrobiology* life* chauvinism* life* world theory* life* acid analogues* habitability* biosphereReferencesFurther reading*External links* Astronomy FAQ* Ammonia-based life* Silicon-based lifehipottics de bioqumicahipotticashypothtiquesipoteticheja:biokemia
7382
Maritimes
902The Maritime provinces, also called the Maritimes or the Canadian Maritimes, is a region of Canada consisting of the three original provinces, Brunswick, Scotia, and Edward Island which joined Confederation in 1873. On the Atlantic coast, the Maritimes are a subregion of Canada, which also includes the northeastern province of & Labrador.  The population of the Maritime provinces was 1,826,896 in 2008.()The Maritimes front the Atlantic Ocean and its various sub-basins such as the of Maine and of St. Lawrence systems.  The region is located northeast of England, southeast of Quebecs Peninsula, and southwest of the island of Newfoundland.There was talk of a Union of the three provinces to have greater political power; however, the first discussions on the subject in 1864 at the Conference led to the process of Confederation which formed the larger Dominion of Canada instead.Image:Peggys Cove Harbour 01.jpg|thumb|225px|right|Cove, Nova Scotia, an archetypal Maritime sceneright|thumb|250px|The MaritimesThe Maritimes are home to Mikmaq, Maliseet and Passamaquoddy people and have an extensive history of French and British settlement dating back to the seventeenth century, forming a unique culture that predates Canada.NameThe word maritime is an adjective that simply means of the sea, thus any land associated with the sea can be considered a maritime state or province (e.g. All the provinces of Canada except Alberta and Saskatchewan border water).  The term Maritimes has historically been collectively applied to New Brunswick, Nova Scotia and Prince Edward Island.HistoryFollowing the northerly retreat of glaciers at the end of the glaciation over ten thousand years ago, human settlement by Native Americans or Nations began in the Maritimes with Paleo-Indians during the Early Period, ending around six thousand years ago.The Middle Period, starting six thousand years ago, and ending three thousand years ago, was dominated by rising sea levels from the melting glaciers in polar regions. This is also when what is called the Laurentian tradition started among Indians, existing First Nations peoples of the time. Evidence of Archaic Indian burial mounds and other ceremonial sites existing in the St. John River valley has been uncovered.The Late Period extended from three thousand years ago until first contact with European settlers and was dominated by the organization of First Nations peoples into the Algonquian-influenced Abenaki Nation which existed largely in present-day interior Vermont, New Hampshire, and Maine, and the Mikmaq Nation which inhabited all of Nova Scotia, Prince Edward Island, eastern New Brunswick and the southern Gasp. The primarily agrarian Maliseet Nation settled throughout the St. John River and River valleys of present-day New Brunswick and Maine. The Passamaquoddy Nation inhabited the northwestern coastal regions of the present-day of Fundy. The Mikmaq Nation is also assumed to have crossed the present-day Strait at around this time to settle on the south coast of Newfoundland but were in a minority position compared to the Beothuk Nation.European contactThe Maritimes was the first area in Canada to be settled by Europeans. There is speculation that Viking explorers discovered and settled in the Vinland region around 1000 AD, which is when the aux Meadows settlement in and Labrador has been dated, and it is possible that further exploration was made into the present-day Maritimes and northeastern United States.Both Giovanni Caboto (John Cabot) and da Verrazzano are reported to have sailed in or near Maritime waters during their voyages of discovery for England and France respectively. Several Portuguese explorers/cartographers have also documented various parts of the Maritimes, namely Homem. However, it was French explorer Cartier who made the first detailed reconnaissance of the region for a European power, and in so doing, claimed the region for the King of France. Cartier was followed by nobleman Dugua, Sieur de Monts who was accompanied by explorer/cartographer de Champlain in a 1604 expedition where they established the second permanent European settlement in North America, following Spains settlement at St. Augustine. Champlains settlement at Saint Croix Island, later moved to Port-Royal, survived where the ill-fated English settlement at Roanoke did not, and pre-dated the more successful English settlement at Jamestown by three years. Champlain went on to greater fame as the founder of Frances province of Canada which comprises much of the present-day lower Lawrence River valley in the province of Quebec.AcadiaChamplains success in the region, which came to be called Acadie, led to the fertile tidal marshes surrounding the southeastern and northeastern reaches of the of Fundy being populated by French immigrants who called themselves Acadien. Acadians eventually built small settlements throughout what is today mainland Scotia and Brunswick, as well as le-Saint-Jean (Edward Island), le-Royale (Breton Island), and other shorelines of the Gulf of Lawrence in present-day Newfoundland and Labrador, and Quebec. Acadian settlements had primarily agrarian economies, although there were many early examples of Acadian fishing settlements in southwestern Nova Scotia and in le-Royale, as well as along the south and west coasts of Newfoundland, the Gasp Peninsula, and the present-day Cte-Nord region of Quebec. Most Acadian fishing activities were overshadowed by the comparatively enormous seasonal European fishing fleets based out of Newfoundland which took advantage of proximity to the Banks.The growing English colonies along the American seaboard to the south and various European wars between England and France during the 17th and 18th centuries brought Acadia to the centre of world-scale geopolitical forces. In 1613, Virginian raiders captured Royale, and in 1621 Acadia was ceded to Scotlands Sir William Alexander who renamed it Nova Scotia. By 1632, Acadia was returned from Scotland to France under the Treaty of Saint-Germain-en-Laye, and the Port Royale settlement was moved to the site of nearby present-day Annapolis Royal. More French settlers, primarily from the Vienne, Normandie, and Brittany regions of France, continued to populate the colony of Acadia during the latter part of the 17th and early part of the 18th centuries. Important settlements also began in the Beaubassin region of the present-day of Chignecto, and in the St. John River valley, and settlers began to establish communities on le-Saint-Jean and le-Royale as well.In 1654, England raiders attacked Acadian settlements on the Basin, starting a period of uncertainty for Acadians throughout the English constitutional crises under Cromwell, and only being properly resolved under the Treaty of Breda in 1667 when Frances claim to the region was reaffirmed. Colonial administration by France throughout the history of Acadia was contemptuous at best. Frances priorities were in settling and strengthening its claim on France and the exploration and settlement of interior America and the River valley.British and French controlFurther French-English conflict resulted in the Treaty of Utrecht in 1713 which saw France formally relinquish Acadia to Britain. Confusion over the boundaries between Acadia, New France, and the Commonwealth of Massachusetts left Britain in possession of what is the present-day Scotia peninsula. The early British capital of the Colony of Nova Scotia (sometimes referred to as the 14th Colony) was established at Annapolis Royal, where Anne was constructed.France still maintained control over much of present-day New Brunswick and northern Maine, le-Saint-Jean, and le-Royale. In 1719, to further protect strategic interests in the of St. Lawrence and Lawrence River, France began the 20-year construction of a large fortress at Louisbourg on le-Royale. Massachusetts was increasingly concerned over reports of the capabilities of this fortress, and of privateers staging out of its harbour to raid New England fishermen on the Grand Banks. The of the Austrian Succession saw Britain and France in conflict with each other, and in 1745 several warships and a small contingent of troops were sent from Boston, first to the Nova Scotian fishing port of Canso, and on to Louisbourg where they laid siege to the fortress until the French surrendered and were evacuated.The British returned control of le-Royale to France with the fortress virtually intact three years later under the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle and the French reestablished their forces there. In 1749, to counter the rising threat of Louisbourg, Halifax was founded and the Navy established a major naval base and citadel. The Seven Years War File:A View of the Plundering and Burning of the City of Grymross, by Thomas Davies, 1758.JPG|300px|thumb |right|John River Campaign: Raid on Grimrose (present day New Brunswick). This is the only contemporaneous image of the of the Acadians The forth and final colonial war was the Seven Years War. During the war, military conflicts in Nova Scotia included: of Fort Beausjour; of Fundy Campaign (1755); the of Petitcodiac; the Raid on Lunenburg (1756); the Expedition (1757); of Bloody Creek (1757); of Louisbourg (1758), River Campaign, of St. Lawrence Campaign (1758), John River Campaign, and of Restigouche.File:British burninng warship Prudent and capturing Bienfaisant. Siege of Louisbourg 1758. Maritime Museum of the Atlantic, M55.7.1.jpg|300px|thumb|left|of Louisbourg (1758)The British Conquest of Acadia happened in 1710. Over the next forty-five years the Acadians refused to sign an unconditional oath of allegiance to Britain. During this time period Acadians participated in various militia operations against the British and maintained vital supply lines to the French Fortress of Louisbourg and Fort Beausejour.(John Grenier, Far Reaches of Empire: War in Nova Scotia 1710-1760. Oklahoma Press. 2008) During the Seven Years War, the British sought to neutralize any military threat Acadians posed and to interrupt the vital supply lines Acadians provided to Louisbourg by deporting Acadians from Acadia.(Stephen E. Patterson. Indian-White Relations in Nova Scotia, 1749-61: A Study in Political Interaction. Buckner, P, Campbell, G. and Frank, D. (eds). The Acadiensis Reader Vol 1: Atlantic Canada Before Confederation. 1998. pp.105-106.; Also see Stephen Patterson, Colonial Wars and Aboriginal Peoples, p. 144.)The British began the of the Acadians with the of Fundy Campaign (1755).  Over the next nine years over 12,000 Acadians were removed from Nova Scotia.(Ronnie-Gilles LeBlanc (2005). Du Grand Drangement  la Dportation: Nouvelles Perspectives Historiques, Moncton: Universit de Moncton, 465 pages ISBN 1897214022 (book in French and English). The Acadians were scattered across the Atlantic, in the Thirteen Colonies, Louisiana, Quebec, Britain and France. (See Jean-Franois Mouhot (2009) Les Rfugis acadiens en France (1758-1785): LImpossible Rintgration?, Quebec, Septentrion, 456 p. ISBN 2894485131; Ernest Martin (1936) Les Exils Acadiens en France et leur tablissement dans le Poitou, Paris, Hachette, 1936). Very few eventually returned to Nova Scotia (See John Mack Faragher (2005). A Great and Noble Scheme: The Tragic Story of the Expulsion of the French Acadians from their American Homeland, New York: W.W. Norton, 562 pages ISBN 0-393-05135-8 online excerpt).)In 1758, the fortress of Louisbourg was laid siege for a second time within 15 years, this time by more than 27,000 British soldiers and sailors with over 150 warships. After the French surrender, Louisbourg was thoroughly destroyed by British engineers to ensure it would never be reclaimed. With the fall of Louisbourg, French resistance in the region crumbled. British forces seized remaining French control over Acadia in the coming months, with le-Saint-Jean falling in 1759 to British forces on their way to Quebec City for the Siege of Quebec and ensuing Battle of the Plains of Abraham.The war ended and Britain had gained control over the entire Maritime region.American RevolutionFollowing the Years War, empty Acadian lands were settled first by England Planters and then by immigrants brought from Yorkshire. le-Royale was renamed to Cape Breton Island and incorporated into the Colony of Nova Scotia.Both the colonies of Nova Scotia (present-day Nova Scotia and New Brunswick) and St. Johns Island (Prince Edward Island) were affected by the Revolutionary War, largely by privateering against American shipping, but several coastal communities were also the targets of American raiders. Charlottetown, the capital of the new colony of St. Johns Island, was ransacked in 1775 with the provincial secretary kidnapped and the Great Seal stolen. The largest military action in the Maritimes during the revolutionary war was the attack on Fort Cumberland (the renamed Beausejour) in 1776 by a force of American sympathizers led by Eddy. The fort was partially overrun after a month-long siege, but the attackers were ultimately repelled after the arrival of British reinforcements from Halifax.The most significant impact from this war was the settling of large numbers of Loyalist refugees in the region, especially in Shelburne and Parrtown (Saint John). Following the Treaty of Paris in 1783, Loyalist settlers in what would become New Brunswick persuaded British administrators to split the Colony of Nova Scotia to create the new colony of New Brunswick in 1784. At the same time, another part of the Colony of Nova Scotia, Cape Breton Island, was split off to become the Colony of Cape Breton Island.The Colony of St. Johns Island was renamed to Edward Island on November 29, 1798.The of 1812 had some affect on the shipping industry in the Maritime colonies of New Brunswick, Nova Scotia, Prince Edward Island, and Cape Breton Island; however, the significant Navy presence in Halifax and other ports in the region prevented any serious attempts by American raiders. Maritime and American privateers targeted unprotected shipping of both the United States and Britain respectively, further reducing trade. The American border with New Brunswick did not have any significant action during this conflict, although British forces did occupy a portion of coastal Maine at one point. The most significant incident from this war which occurred in the Maritimes was the British capture and detention of the American frigate USS Chesapeake in Halifax.19th centuryIn 1820, the Colony of Breton Island was merged back into the Colony of Nova Scotia for the second time by the British government.British settlement of the Maritimes, as the colonies of Nova Scotia, New Brunswick and Prince Edward Island came to be known, accelerated throughout the late 18th century and into the 19th century with significant immigration to the region as a result of Scottish migrants displaced by the Clearances and Irish escaping the Great Irish Famine (1845-1849). As a result, significant portions of the three provinces are influenced by Celtic heritages, with Scottish Gaelic having been widely spoken, particularly in Cape Breton, although it is less prevalent today.During the Civil War, some Maritimers emigrated to the United States to volunteer for the armies of the Union or the Confederacy. However, the majority of the conflicts impact was felt in the shipping industry since diplomatic tensions between Britain and the Unionist North had deteriorated after Britain expressed support for the secessionist Confederate South. The Union navy, although much smaller than the Royal Navy, did posture off Maritime coasts at times. Although an amphibious invasion was never in question, blockading by Union naval forces was common, particularly at Halifax, where Confederate navy ships sought refuge and reprovisioning.The immense size of the Union army (the largest on the planet toward the end of the Civil War), however, was viewed with increasing concern by Maritimers throughout the early 1860s. Another concern was the rising threat of Fenian raids on border communities in Brunswick by those seeking to end British rule of Ireland. This combination of events, coupled with an ongoing decline in British military and economic support to the region as the Home Office favoured newer colonial endeavours in Africa and elsewhere, led to a call among Maritime politicians for a conference on Union, to be held in early September, 1864 in Charlottetown - chosen in part because of Prince Edward Islands reluctance to give up its jurisdictional sovereignty in favour of uniting with New Brunswick and Nova Scotia into a single colony. New Brunswick and Nova Scotia felt that if the union conference were held in Charlottetown, they might be able to convince Island politicians to support the proposal.The Conference, as it came to be called, was also attended by a slew of visiting delegates from the neighbouring colony of Canada, who had largely arrived at their own invitation with their own agenda. This agenda saw the conference dominated by discussions of creating an even larger union of the entire territory of North America into a united colony. The Charlottetown Conference ended with an agreement to meet the following month in City, where more formal discussions ensued, culminating with meetings in London and the signing of the North America Act. Of the Maritime provinces, only Nova Scotia and New Brunswick were initially party to the BNA Act, Prince Edward Islands reluctance, combined with a booming agricultural and fishing export economy having led to that colony opting not to sign on.Major communitiesThe major communities of the region include Halifax and Sydney in Nova Scotia, Saint John, Fredericton and Moncton in New Brunswick, and Charlottetown in Prince Edward Island.Society and culturethumb|Map showing the mother tongue of people in the Maritimes. Red represents areas with a majority of Anglophones and less that 33% Francophones, Orange, a majority of Anglophones and more than 33% Francophones. Blue shows a Francophone majority with less than 33% Anglophones and green a Francophone majority with more than 33% Anglophones.thumb|250px||right|Halifax skyline from Dartmouth, Nova ScotiaMaritime society is based upon a mixture of traditions and class backgrounds. Predominantly rural until recent decades, the region traces many of its cultural activities to those rural resource-based economies of fishing, agriculture, forestry, and mining.While Maritimers are predominantly of west European heritage (Scottish, Irish, English, and Acadian), immigration to Cape Breton during the heyday of coal mining and steel manufacturing brought people from eastern Europe as well as from Newfoundland. The Maritimes also have a black population who are cultural descendants of The West Indies or are former American runaway slaves and loyalists, largely concentrated in Nova Scotia but also in various communities throughout southern New Brunswick, Cape Breton, and Prince Edward Island. The Mikmaq Nations reserves throughout Nova Scotia, Prince Edward Island and eastern New Brunswick dominate aboriginal culture in the region, compared to the much smaller population of the Maliseet Nation in western New Brunswick.thumb|300px|left|Skyline of Saint John, New Brunswick as of Summer 2002Cultural activities are fairly diverse throughout the region, with the music, dance, theatre, and literary art forms tending to follow the particular cultural heritage of specific locales. Notable Nova Scotian folklorist and cultural historian Creighton spent the majority of her lifetime recording the various musical and folk traditions of rural Nova Scotia during the mid-20th century, prior to this knowledge being wiped out by mass media assimilation with the rest of North America. A fragment of culture remains in Nova Scotia but primarily on Cape Breton Island.thumb|left|Skyline of Moncton, New Brunswick|300pxCanada has witnessed a Celtic revival in which many Maritime musicians and songs have risen to prominence in recent decades. Some companies, particularly breweries such as Keiths and Moosehead have played up a connection between folklore with alcohol consumption during their marketing campaigns. The Maritimes were among the strongest supporters of prohibition (Prince Edward Island lasting until 1949), and some predominantly rural communities maintain dry status, banning the retail sale of alcohol to this day as a vestige of the original temperance movement in the region.EconomyPresent statusthumb|250px|right|Fredericton City HallGiven the small population of the region (compared with the Central Canadian provinces or the New England states), the regional economy is a net exporter of natural resources, manufactured goods, and services. The regional economy has long been tied to natural resources such as fishing, logging, farming, and mining activities. Significant industrialisation in second half of the 19th century brought steel to Nova Scotia, and subsequent creation of a widespread industrial base to take advantage of the regions large underground coal deposits. After Confederation, however, this industrial base withered with technological change, and trading links to Europe and the U.S. were reduced in favour of those with Ontario and Quebec. In recent years, however, the Maritime regional economy has begun increased contributions from manufacturing again and the steady transition to a service economy.Important manufacturing centres in the region include Pictou County, Truro, the Valley and the South Shore, and the of Canso area in Nova Scotia, as well as Summerside in Prince Edward Island, and the Miramichi area, the North Shore and the upper Saint John River valley of New Brunswick.Some predominantly coastal areas have become major tourist centres, such as parts of Prince Edward Island, Cape Breton Island, the South Shore of Nova Scotia and the of St. Lawrence and of Fundy coasts of New Brunswick. Additional service-related industries in technology, pharmaceuticals, insurance and financial sectors&mdash;as well as research-related spin-offs from the regions numerous universities and colleges&mdash;are significant economic contributors.Another important contribution to Nova Scotias provincial economy is through spin-offs and royalties relating to off-shore petroleum exploration and development. Mostly concentrated on the continental shelf of the provinces Atlantic coast in the vicinity of Sable Island, exploration activities began in the 1960s and resulted in the first commercial production field for oil beginning in the 1980s. gas was also discovered in the 1980s during exploration work, and this is being commercially recovered, beginning in the late 1990s. Initial optimism in Nova Scotia about the potential of off-shore resources appears to have diminished with the lack of new discoveries, although exploration work continues and is moving farther off-shore into waters on the margin.Image:Charlottetown quay.JPG|thumb|250px|left|Peakes Quay on the Charlottetown waterfrontRegional transportation networks have also changed significantly in recent decades with port modernizations, with new expressways and ongoing arterial highway construction, the abandonment of various low-capacity railway branchlines (including the entire railway system of Prince Edward Island and southwestern Nova Scotia), and the construction of the Causeway and the Bridge. There have been airport improvements at various centres providing improved connections to markets and destinations in the rest of North America and overseas.Improvements in infrastructure and the regional economy notwithstanding, the three provinces remain one of the poorer regions of Canada. While urban areas are growing and thriving, economic adjustments have been harsh in rural and resource-dependent communities, and emigration has been an ongoing phenomenon for some parts of the region. Another problem is seen in the lower average wages and family incomes within the region. Property values are depressed, resulting in a smaller tax base for these three provinces, particularly when compared with the national average which benefits from central and western Canadian economic growth.This has been particularly problematic with the growth of the state in Canada since the 1950s, resulting in the need to draw upon payments to provide nationally-mandated social services. Since the 1990s the region has experienced an exceptionally tumultuous period in its regional economy with the collapse of large portions of the ground fishery throughout Atlantic Canada, the closing of coal mines and a steel mill on Breton Island, and the closure of military bases in all three provinces.HistoricalGrowthImage:CharlottetownConference1864.jpg|thumb|right|Delegates of the Conference on the steps of Government HouseWhile the economic underperformance of the Maritime economy has been long lasting, it has not always been present. The mid-19th century, especially the 1850s and 1860s, has long been seen as a Golden Age in the Maritimes. Growth was strong, and the region had one of North Americas most extensive manufacturing sectors. The question of why the Maritimes fell from being a centre of Canadian manufacturing to being an economic hinterland is thus a central one to the study of the regions pecuniary difficulties. The period in which the decline occurred had a great many potential culprits. In 1867 Nova Scotia and New Brunswick merged with the Canadas in Confederation, with Prince Edward Island joining them six years later in 1873. Canada was formed only a year after trade with the United States (in the form of the Reciprocity Agreement) had ended. In the 1870s A. Macdonalds Policy was implemented, creating a system of protective tariffs around the new nation. Throughout the period there was also significant technological change both in the production and transportation of goods.DeclineThe cause of economic malaise in the Maritimes is an issue of great debate and controversy among historians, economists, and geographers. The differing opinions can approximately be divided into the structuralists, who argue that poor policy decisions are to blame, and the others, who argue that unavoidable technological and geographical factors caused the decline.magnate Sir Samuel CunardThe exact date that the Maritimes began to fall behind the rest of Canada is difficult to determine. Historian Kris Inwood places the date very early, at least in Nova Scotia, finding clear signs that the Maritimes Golden Age of the mid-nineteenth century was over by 1870, before Confederation or the National Policy could have had any significant impact. Richard Caves places the date closer to 1885. T.W. Acheson takes a similar view and provides considerable evidence that the early 1880s were in fact a booming period in Nova Scotia and this growth was only undermined towards the end of that decade. David Alexander argues that any earlier declines were simply part of the global Depression, and that the Maritimes first fell behind the rest of Canada when the great boom period of the early twentieth century had little effect on the region. E.R. Forbes, however, emphasizes that the precipitous decline did not occur until after the First World War during the 1920s when new railway policies were implemented. Forbes also contends that significant Canadian defence spending during the Second World War favoured powerful political interests in Central Canada such as Howe, when major Maritime shipyards and factories, as well as Canadas largest steel mill, located in Cape Breton Island, fared poorly.N.S 1910.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Yarmouth in 1910One of the most important changes, and one that almost certainly had an effect, was the revolution in transportation that occurred at this time. The Maritimes were connected to central Canada by the Railway in the 1870s, removing a longstanding barrier to trade. For the first time this placed the Maritime manufacturers in direct competition with those of Central Canada. Maritime trading patterns shifted considerably from mainly trading with England, Britain, and the Caribbean, to being focused on commerce with the Canadian interior, enforced by the federal governments tariff policies.Simultaneous with the construction of railways in the region, the age of the wooden sailing ship began to come to an end, being replaced by larger and faster steel ships. The Maritimes had long been a centre for shipbuilding, and this industry was hurt by the change. The larger ships were also less likely to call on the smaller population centres such as Saint John and Halifax, preferring to travel to cities like New York and Montreal. Even the Line, founded by Haligonian Cunard, stopped making more than a single ceremonial voyage to Halifax each year.More controversial than the role of technology is the argument over the role of politics in the origins of the regions decline. Confederation and the tariff and railway freight policies that followed have often been blamed for having a deleterious effect on the Maritime economies. Arguments have been made that the Maritimes poverty was caused by control over policy by Central Canada which used the national structures for its own enrichment. This was the central view of the Rights Movement of the 1920s, which advocated greater local control over the regions finances. T.W. Acheson is one of the main proponents of this theory. He notes the growth that was occurring during the early years of the National Policy in Nova Scotia demonstrates how the effects of railway fares and the tariff structure helped undermine this growth. Capitalists from Central Canada purchased the factories and industries of the Maritimes from their bankrupt local owners and proceeded to close down many of them, consolidating the industry in Central Canada.thumb|250px|left|Princess and Water Street in Saint JohnThe policies in the early years of Confederation were designed by Central Canadian interests, and they reflected the needs of that region. The unified Canadian market and the introduction of railroads created a relative weakness in the Maritime economies. Central to this concept, according to Acheson, was the lack of metropolises in the Maritimes.Montreal and Toronto were well suited to benefit from the development of large-scale manufacturing and extensive railway systems in Quebec and Ontario, these being the goals of the Macdonald and Laurier governments. In the Maritimes the situation was very different. Today New Brunswick has several mid-sized centres in Saint John, Moncton, and Fredericton but no significant population centre. Nova Scotia has a growing metropolitan area surrounding Halifax, but a contracting population in industrial Cape Breton, and several smaller centres in Bridgewater, Kentville, Yarmouth, and Pictou County. Prince Edward Islands only significant population centres are in Charlottetown and Summerside. During the late 19th and early 20th centuries, just the opposite was the case with little to no population concentration in major industrial centres as the predominantly rural resource-dependent Maritime economy continued on the same path as it had since European settlement on the regions shores.Despite the regions absence of economic growth on the same scale as other parts of the nation, the Maritimes has changed markedly throughout the 20th century, partly as a result of global and national economic trends, and partly as a result of government intervention. Each sub-region within the Maritimes has developed over time to exploit different resources and expertise. Saint John became a centre of the timber trade and shipbuilding and is currently a centre for oil refining and some manufacturing. The northern New Brunswick communities of Edmundston, Campbellton, Dalhousie, Bathurst, and Miramichi are focused on the pulp and paper industry and some mining activity. Moncton was a centre for railways and has changed its focus to becoming a multi-modal transportation centre with associated manufacturing and retail interests. The Halifax metropolitan area has come to dominate peninsular Nova Scotia as a retail and service centre, but that provinces industries were spread out from the coal and steel industries of industrial Cape Breton and Pictou counties, the mixed farming of the North Shore and Annapolis Valley, and the fishing industry was primarily focused on the South Shore and Eastern Shore. Prince Edward Island is largely dominated by farming, fishing, and tourism.Given the geographic diversity of the various sub-regions within the Maritimes, policies to centralize the population and economy were not initially successful, thus Maritime factories closed while those in Ontario and Quebec prospered.The traditional thesis, advocated by scholars such as S.A. Saunders, looks at the resource endowments of the Maritimes and argues that it was the decline of the traditional industries of shipbuilding and fishing that led to Maritime poverty, since these processes were rooted in geography, and thus all but inevitable. Kris Inwood has revived the staples approach and looks at a number of geographic weaknesses relative to Central Canada. He repeats Achesons argument that the region lacks major urban centres, but adds that the Maritimes were also lacking the great rivers that led to the cheap and abundant power, key to Quebec and Ontarios urban and manufacturing development, that the extraction costs of Maritime resources were higher (particularly in the case of Cape Breton coal), and that the soils of the region were poorer and thus the agricultural sector weaker.The Maritimes are the only provinces in Canada which entered Confederation in the 19th century and have kept their original colonial boundaries. All three provinces have the smallest land base in the country and have been forced to make do with resources within. By comparison, the former colony of the Province of Canada (divided into the District of East, and the District of West) and the western provinces were dozens of times larger and in some cases were expanded to take in territory formerly held in British Crown grants to companies such as the Bay Company; in particular the November 19, 1869 sale of Land to the Government of Canada under the Land Act 1868 was facilitated in part by Maritime taxpayers.  The economic riches of energy and natural resources held within this larger land base were only realized by other provinces during the 20th century.One comparison made with the wealthier areas of Canada is that of the regions political and/or work culture. Today few academics make such a claim, but it still a common explanation in other circles. Some writers have also alleged that Maritime business people were unwilling to take risks or invest in manufacturing, a thesis Acheson devotes much attention to debunking.In recent years theory has been used to examine the situation of the Maritimes, and while it rejects most traditional economic models it does correspond with the evidence.PoliticsMaritime conservatism since the Second World War has been very much part of the Tory tradition, key influences being former of Nova Scotia and federal Progressive Conservative Party leader Stanfield and New Brunswick Tory strategist Camp.In recent years, the social democratic Democratic Party (NDP) has made significant inroads both federally and provincially in the region. The NDP has elected Members of Parliament (MPs) from New Brunswick, but most of the focus of the party at the federal and provincial levels is currently in the Halifax area of Nova Scotia. Industrial Cape Breton has historically been a region of labour activism, electing Commonwealth Federation (and later NDP) MPs, and even produced many early members of the Party of Canada in the pre-War II era. In the 2004 federal election, the NDP captured 28.45% of the vote in Nova Scotia, more than any other province.  In the 2009 provincial election the NDP formed a majority government, the first in the region.The Maritimes are generally socially conservative but unlike Alberta, they also have fiscally socialist tendencies. It is because of the lack of support for conservatism that federal parties such as the Alliance never had much success in the region, and the level of support for the new Party of Canada in the region is uncertain. In the 2004 federal election, the Conservatives had one of the worst showings in the region for a right-wing party, going back to Confederation, with the possible exception of the 1993 election.An area within the region where both fiscal and social conservatism do coincide and where the federal Reform Party and Canadian Alliance have met success is in the central-western part of New Brunswick, in the St. John River valley north of Saint John and south of Grand Falls. Contributing demographics include a predominantly Anglophone population residing in a largely rural agrarian setting. One influence might be proximity to the International Boundary and the state of Maine. The valley is also settled by descendants of Empire Loyalists, some of whom established fundamentalist Christian congregations in the area which continue to influence certain segments of society. There are also a large number of active and retired military personnel located in the Fredericton and Oromocto area as a result of the large military base at Gagetown. Another area in the region with smatterings of coinciding fiscal and social conservatism is the Valley of Nova Scotia.The Party of Canada has done well in the Maritimes in the past because of its interventionist policies. The Acadian Peninsula region of New Brunswick, long dependent upon seasonal employment in the of St. Lawrence fishery, tends to vote for the Liberals or NDP for this reason. In the 1997 federal election, Prime Minister Chrtiens Liberals endured a bitter defeat to the PCs and NDP in many ridings as a result of unpopular cuts to benefits for seasonal workers, as well as closures of several Forces Bases, the refusal to honour a promise to rescind the Goods and Services Tax, cutbacks to provincial payments, care, education and regional transportation infrastructure such as airports, fishing harbours, seaports, and railways. The Liberals held onto seats in Prince Edward Island and New Brunswick, while being shut out of Nova Scotia entirely, the second time in history (the only other time being the Diefenbaker sweep).The Maritimes is currently represented in the Canadian Parliament by 25 Members of the House of Commons (Nova Scotia - 11, New Brunswick - 10, Prince Edward Island - 4) and 24 Senators (Nova Scotia and New Brunswick - 10 each, Prince Edward Island - 4). This level of representation was established at the time of Confederation when the Maritimes had a much larger proportion of the national population. The comparatively large population growth of western and central Canada during the immigration boom of the 20th century has reduced the Maritimes proportion of the national population to less than 10%, resulting in an over-representation in Parliament, with some federal ridings having fewer than 35,000 people, compared to central and western Canada where ridings typically contain 100,000-120,000 people.The Senate is structured along regional lines, giving an equal number of seats (24) to the Maritimes, Ontario, Quebec, and western Canada, in addition to the later entry of Newfoundland and Labrador, as well as the three territories. Enshrined in the Constitution, this model was developed to ensure that no area of the country is able to exert undue influence in the Senate. The Maritimes, with its much smaller proportion of the national population (compared to the time of Confederation) also have an over-representation in the Senate, particularly compared to the population growth of Ontario and the western provinces. This has led to calls to reform the Senate; however, such a move would entail constitutional changes.Another factor related to the number of Senate seats is that a constitutional amendment in the early 20th century mandated that no province can have fewer Members of Parliament than it has senators. This court decision resulted from a complaint by the Government of Prince Edward Island after that provinces number of MPs was proposed to change from 4 to 3, accounting for its declining proportion of the national population at that time. When PEI entered Confederation in 1873, it was accorded 6 MPs and 4 Senators; however this was reduced to 4 MPs by the early twentieth century. Senators being appointed for life at this time, these coveted seats rarely went unfilled for a long period of time anywhere in Canada. As a result, PEIs challenge was accepted by the federal government, and its level of federal representation was secured. In the aftermath of the 1989 budget, which saw a fillibuster by Liberal Senators in attempt to kill legislation creating the Goods and Services Tax, Prime Minister Mulroney stacked the Senate by creating additional seats in several provinces across Canada, including New Brunswick; however, there was no attempt by these provinces to increase the number of MPs to reflect this change in Senate representation.See also*Canada*Canada*of regions of Canada*Film Classification Board*UnionReferencesExternal links*The Maritime Provinces, the Maritime Rights Movement and Canadian Federalism*Weather, travel, newspapers and radio links*Atlantic Provinces Economic Council*Atlantic Institute of Market Studies*Genuine Progress Indicator Atlantic*Atlantic Provinces Communities: Towns & Cities. Basic Information, Facts, Figures, Pictures*Atlantic Canada Portal/Portail du Canada Atlantique*Maritime Series - The State of the Regions.  From the Canadian Institute for Research on Public Policy and Public Administrationmartimes del Canadprovinciede:Seeprovinzenmartimas de CanadmaritimesMaritimesmarittimetartomnyokmartimas do Canadsv:Kustprovinserna
7406
Cheshire
Halton (Unitary)Cheshire ( or ; also known, archaically, as the County of Chester)() is a ceremonial county in West England. Cheshires town is the city of Chester,( ) although its largest town is Warrington. Other major towns include Widnes, Congleton, Crewe, Port, Runcorn, Macclesfield, Winsford, Northwich, and Wilmslow.() The county is bordered by Merseyside and Manchester to the north, Derbyshire to the east, Staffordshire and Shropshire to the south, and Flintshire and Wrexham in Wales to the west.Cheshires area is  and its population is around 700,000(). Apart from the large towns along the Mersey and the historic city of Chester, it is mostly rural, with a number of small towns and villages that support an agricultural industry. It is historically famous as a former principality and for the production of cheese,() salt, bulk chemicals, and woven silk.HistoryToponymyCheshires name was originally derived from an early name for Chester, and was first recorded as Legeceasterscir in the Chronicles,(Harris, B. E. and Thacker, A. T. (1987). p. 237.) meaning the shire of the city of legions.(Crosby, A. (1996). page 31.) Although the name first appears in 980, it is thought that the county was created by the Elder around 920.( In the Book, Chester was recorded as having the name Cestrescir (Chestershire), derived from the name for Chester at the time.( A series of changes that occurred as English itself changed, together with some simplifications and elision, resulted in the name Cheshire, as it occurs today.Because of the historically close links with the land bordering Cheshire to the west, which became Wales, there is a history of interaction between Cheshire and Wales. The Domesday Book records Cheshire as having two complete Hundreds (Atiscross and Exestan) that later became entirely part of Wales. Additionally, another large portion of the Duddestan Hundred later became known as Saesneg when it was transferred to Wales.(Harris, B.E. and Thacker, A.T. (1987). pp. 340341.) For this and other reasons, the Welsh name for Cheshire (Swydd Gaerlleon)(Welsh dictionary entry for Cheshire. www.geriadur.net website (Welsh-English / English-Welsh On-line Dictionary  ). Department of Welsh, University of Wales, Lampeter. Retrieval Date: 21 February 2008) is sometimes used within Wales and by Welsh speakers.Administrative historyAfter the Norman conquest of 1066 by William I, dissent and resistance continued for many years after the invasion. In Cheshire in 1069 local resistance was finally overcome, and draconian measures were taken to impress the native Saxons with the futility of future resistance. Earl Edwin of Mercia along with other major landowners were made examples of, their properties confiscated and redistributed amongst Norman barons. King William created one of his barons, Hugh dAvranches (nicknamed Hugh Lupus, or wolf) as Earl of Chester, ruling virtually autonomously in Williams name and with his full authority, and Cheshire was thereby declared a County Palatine.Cheshire in the Book (1086) was recorded as a larger county than it is today. It included two hundreds, Atiscross and Exestan, that later became part of Wales. At the time of the Domesday Book, it also included as part of Duddestan Hundred the area of land later known as Saesneg (which used to be a detached part of Flintshire) in Wales.() The area between the Mersey and Ribble (referred to in the Domesday Book as Ripam et Mersam) formed part of the returns for Cheshire.(Morgan (1978). pp.269c301c,d.)(Sylvester (1980). p. 14.) Although this has been interpreted to mean that at that time south Lancashire was part of Cheshire,((Roffe (2000)) more exhaustive research indicates that the boundary between Cheshire and what was to become Lancashire remained the Mersey.(Harris and Thacker (1987) write on page 252: )(Phillips and Phillips (2002); pp. 2631.)(Crosby, A. (1996) writes on page 31: ) With minor variations in spelling across sources, the complete list of of Cheshire at this time are: Atiscross, Bochelau, Chester, Dudestan, Exestan, Hamestan, Middlewich, Riseton, Roelau, Tunendune, Warmundestrou and Wilaveston.(Harris, B. E., and Thacker, A. T. (1987); pages 340341.)In 1182 the land north of the Mersey became administered as part of the new county of Lancashire, thus resolving any uncertainty about the county in which the land Inter Ripam et Mersam was.()  Over the years, the ten hundreds consolidated and changed names to leave just sevenBroxton, Bucklow, Eddisbury, Macclesfield, Nantwich, Northwich and Wirral.()In 1397 the county had lands in the of Wales added to its territory, and was promoted to the rank of principality. This was because of the support the men of the county had given to King Richard II, in particular by his standing armed force of about 500 men called the Cheshire Guard. As a result the Kings title was changed to King of England and France, Lord of Ireland, and Prince of Chester. No other English county has been honoured in this way, although it lost the distinction on Richards fall in 1399.(Davies, R. R. Richard II and the Principality of Chester in The Reign of Richard II: Essays in Honour of May McKisack, ed. F. R. H. Du Boulay and Caroline Baron (1971))Through the Local Government Act 1972, which came into effect on 1 April 1974, some areas in the north-west became part of the metropolitan counties of Manchester and Merseyside.()  Stockport (previously a county borough), Altrincham, Hyde, Dukinfield and Stalybridge in the north-east became part of Greater Manchester. Much of the Peninsula in the north-west, including the county boroughs of Birkenhead and Wallasey, joined Merseyside. At the same time the Rural District was transferred to Derbyshire. The area of Lancashire south of the Merseyside/Greater Manchester area, including Widnes and the county borough of Warrington, was added to the new non-metropolitan county of Cheshire.(Local Government Act 1972)Halton and Warrington became unitary authorities independent of Cheshire County Council on 1 April 1998, but remain part of Cheshire for ceremonial purposes and also for fire and policing.()A referendum for a further local government reform connected with an elected regional assembly was planned for 2004, but was abandoned  see England referendum, 2004.As part of the local government restructuring in April 2009, County Council and the Cheshire districts were abolished and replaced by two new unitary authorities, East and West and Chester. The existing unitary authorities of Halton and Warrington were not affected by the change.As part of a 2002 marketing campaign, the plant conservation charity Plantlife chose the cuckooflower as the flower.Buildings and structuresPrehistoric burial grounds have been discovered at Bridestones, near Congleton (Neolithic) and Robin Hoods Tump, near Alpraham (Age).() The remains of Iron Age forts are found on sandstone ridges at several locations in Cheshire. Examples include Maiden Castle on Hill, Helsby Hillfort and Woodhouse Hillfort at Frodsham. The Roman fortress and walls of Chester, perhaps the earliest building works in Cheshire remaining above ground, are constructed from purple-grey sandstone.()The distinctive local red sandstone has been used for many monumental and ecclesiastical buildings throughout the county: for example, the medieval Castle, Cathedral and numerous parish churches. Occasional residential and industrial buildings, such as Helsby Station, Helsby (1849), are also in this sandstone.Many surviving buildings from the 15th to 17th centuries are timbered, particularly in the southern part of the county. Notable examples include the moated manor house Moreton Hall, dating from around 1450, and many commercial and residential buildings in Chester, Nantwich and surrounding villages.Early brick buildings include Hall near Macclesfield (1585), Hall (pre-1622), and Pied Bull Hotel in Chester (17th century). From the 18th century, orange, red or brown brick became the predominant building material used in Cheshire, although earlier buildings are often faced or dressed with stone. Examples from the Victorian period onwards often employ distinctive brick detailing, such as brick patterning and ornate chimney stacks and gables. Notable examples include Hall near Northwich, Hall() near Chester (both by Nantwich architect George Latham) and Overleigh Lodge, Chester. From the Victorian era, brick buildings often incorporate timberwork in a mock Tudor style, and this hybrid style has been used in some modern residential developments in the county. Industrial buildings, such as the Macclesfield silk mills (for example, Waters Green New Mill), are also usually in brick.Physical geographyCheshire covers a boulder clay plain separating the hills of Wales and the District of Derbyshire (the area is also known as the Cheshire Gap). This was formed following the retreat of age glaciers which left the area dotted with holes, locally referred to as meres. The bedrock of this region is almost entirely Triassic sandstone, outcrops of which have long been quarried, notably at Runcorn, providing the distinctive red stone for Cathedral and Cathedral.The eastern half of the county is Upper Triassic Mercia Mudstone laid down with large salt deposits which were mined for hundreds of years around Northwich. Separating this area from Lower Triassic Sherwood Sandstone to the west is a prominent sandstone ridge known as the Cheshire Ridge. A  footpath,() the Trail, follows this ridge from Frodsham to Whitchurch passing Forest, Castle and earlier Age forts.()The highest point in Cheshire is Tor on the Derbyshire/Cheshire border between Macclesfield and Buxton, at  above sea level. Prior to county boundary alterations in 1974, the county top was Black Hill () near Crowden in the far east of the historic county on the border with the Riding of Yorkshire. Black Hill is now the highest point in Yorkshire. DemographyPopulationBased on the Census of 2001, the overall population of Cheshire is 673,781, of which 51.3% of the population were male and 48.7% were female. Of those aged between 014 years, 51.5% were male and 48.4% were female; and of those aged over 75 years, 62.9% were female and 37.1% were male.The population density of Cheshire is 32 people per km, lower than the North West average of 42 people/km and the England and Wales average of 38 people/km. Ellesmere Port and Neston has a greater urban density than the rest of the county with 92 people/km.()The population for 2021 is forecast to be 708,000.()EthnicityEthnic white groups accounted for 98% (662,794) of the population with 10,994 (2%) in ethnic groups other than white.Of the 2% in non-white ethnic groups:*3,717 (34%) belonged to mixed ethnic groups*3,336 (30%) were Asian or Asian British*1,076 (10%) were Black or Black British*1,826 (17%) were of Chinese ethnic groups*1,039 (9%) were of other ethnic groups.()Population changePolitics and administrationCurrentFile:Cheshire unitary labell.png|300px|thumb|The ceremonial county showing the four unitary authorities. Click on the map for more informationpoly 132 343 74 237 19 152 25 129 215 134 231 120 255 121 298 172 293 195 263 221 221 222 179 257 152 293 175 350 West and Chesterpoly 168 293 241 241 285 239 325 225 382 264 383 272 316 308 312 348 225 368 Eastpoly 333 175 269 130 267 103 300 82 357 102 480 90 491 189 410 239 Eastpoly 313 228 334 183 419 219 354 293 Eastpoly 131 105 166 58 182 73 182 94 201 99 207 91 218 105 210 129 183 127 161 121 131 107 Haltonpoly 188 75 192 30 266 9 296 73 267 82 251 107 234 112 Warringtondesc noneCheshire is a ceremonial county. This means that although there is no county-wide elected local authority, Cheshire has a Lieutenant and High Sheriff for ceremonial purposes under the Act 1997.Local government functions apart from the Police and Fire/Rescue services are carried out by four smaller unitary authorities: East, West and Chester, Halton, and Warrington.Policing and fire and rescue services are still provided across the County as a whole, but by unelected bodies. The Cheshire Police Authority and Cheshire Fire Authority consist of members of the four councils.Transition from the previous (1974) arrangementFrom 1 April 1974 the area under the control of the county council was divided into eight local government districts; Chester, Congleton, and Nantwich, Port and Neston, Halton, Macclesfield, Royal and Warrington.(Vision of Britain  Divisions of Cheshire)(Cheshire County Council  Map of Cheshire districts) Halton (which includes the towns of Runcorn and Widnes) and Warrington became unitary authorities in 1998.(() The remaining districts and the county were abolished as part of local government restructuring on 1 April 2009.()  The Halton and Warrington boroughs were not affected by the 2009 restructuring.On 25 July 2007, the Secretary of State Blears announced she was minded to split Cheshire into two new unitary authorities, West and Chester, and East. She confirmed she had not changed her mind on 19 December 2007 and therefore the proposal to split two-tier Cheshire into two would proceed.Cheshire County Council leader Paul Findlow, who attempted High Court legal action against the proposal, claimed that splitting Cheshire would only disrupt excellent services while increasing living costs for all. A widespread sentiment that this decision was taken by the Union long ago has often been portrayed via angered letters from Cheshire residents to local papers. On 31 January 2008 The Standard, Cheshire & district newspaper, announced that the legal action had been dropped. Members against the proposal were advised that they may be unable to persuade the court that the decision of Hazel Blears was manifestly absurd.The Cheshire West and Chester unitary authority covers the area formerly occupied by the City of Chester and the boroughs of Ellesmere Port and Neston and Vale Royal; Cheshire East now covers the area formerly occupied by the boroughs of Congleton, Crewe and Nantwich, and Macclesfield. The changes were implemented on 1 April 2009.()()Congleton Borough Council pursued an appeal against the judicial review it lost in October 2007. The appeal was dismissed on 4 March 2008.()BordersThe ceremonial county borders Merseyside, Manchester, Derbyshire, Staffordshire and Shropshire in England along with Flintshire and Wrexham in Wales, arranged by compass directions as shown in the table. below. Cheshire also forms part of the West England region.() ReligionIn the 2001 Census, 81% of the population (542,413) identified themselves as Christian; 124,677 (19%) did not identify with any religion or did not answer the question; 5,665 (1%) identified themselves as belonging to other major world religions; and 1,033 belonged to other religions.(The boundary of the of England of Chester follows most closely the pre-1974 county boundary of Cheshire, so it includes all of Wirral, Stockport, and the Cheshire panhandle that included Rural District council area.(Chester Diocese (Church of England). Official website. Retrieval Date: 30 September 2007.) In terms of Roman Catholic church administration, most of Cheshire falls into the Roman Catholic of Shrewsbury.(Diocese of Shrewsbury (Roman Catholic). Official website. Retrieval Date: 30 September 2007.)Economy and industryCheshire has a diverse economy with significant sectors including agriculture, automotive, bio-technology, chemical, financial services, food and drink, ICT, and tourism. The county is famous for the production of cheese, salt and silk.A mainly rural county, Cheshire has a high concentration of villages. Agriculture is generally based on the dairy trade, and cattle are the predominant livestock. Land use given to agriculture has fluctuated somewhat, and in 2005 totalled 1558 km over 4,609 holdings.()  Based on holdings by EC farm type in 2005, 8.51 km was allocated to dairy farming, with another 11.78 km allocated to cattle and sheep.The chemical industry in Cheshire was founded in Roman times, with the mining of salt in Middlewich and Northwich. Salt is still mined in the area by Salt. The salt mining has led to a continued chemical industry around Northwich, with Mond based in the town. Other chemical companies, including Ineos (formerly ICI), have plants at Runcorn. The Shell Refinery is at Ellesmere Port. The oil refinery has operated since 1924 and has a capacity of 12 million tonnes per year.Crewe was once the centre of the British railway industry, and remains a major railway junction. The Crewe railway works, built in 1840, employed 20,000 people at its peak, although the workforce is now less than 1,000. Crewe is also the home of Bentley cars. Also within Cheshire are manufacturing plants for Jaguar and Motors in Ellesmere Port. The county also has an aircraft industry, with the Systems facility at Aerodrome, part of BAE Systems Military Air Solutions division. The facility designed and constructed Lancaster and Vulcan bombers and the Nimrod. On the Cheshire border with Flintshire is the Broughton aircraft factory, more recently associated with Airbus.Tourism in Cheshire from within the UK and overseas continues to perform strongly. Over 8 million nights of accommodation (both UK and overseas) and over 2.8 million visits to Cheshire were recorded during 2003.()At the start of 2003, there were 22,020 VAT-registered enterprises in Cheshire, an increase of 7% since 1998, many in the business services (31.9%) and wholesale/retail (21.7%) sectors. Between 2002 and 2003 the number of businesses grew in four sectors: public administration and other services (6.0%), hotels and restaurants (5.1%), construction (1.7%), and business services (1.0%).(  The county saw the largest proportional reduction between 2001 and 2002 in employment in the energy and Water sector and there was also a significant reduction in the manufacturing sector. The largest growth during this period was in the other services and distribution, hotels and retail sectors.(Cheshire is considered to be an affluent county. Due to Cheshires proximity to the cities of Manchester and Liverpool, urbanisation is common. Cheshire West has a fairly large proportion of residents who work in Liverpool, while Cheshire East falls within Manchesters sphere of influence.EducationSee also: of schools in Cheshire East; of schools in Cheshire West and Chester; of schools in Halton; of schools in WarringtonAll four local education authorities in Cheshire operate only comprehensive state school systems. When Altrincham and Sale were moved from Cheshire to Trafford in 1974, they took some former Cheshire selective schools. Today, there are two universities based in the county, the of Chester and the Crewe campus of Metropolitan University.Culture, media and sportCheshire has two league football teams, namely Crewe Alexandra and Macclesfield Town who both play in League Two. Chester City was also a League Two team until they were relegated to the National in April 2009 and later dissolved. A new club, F.C. was formed in 2010 and currently plays in the Premier League Premier Division.Cheshire also is represented in the highest level basketball league in the UK, the BBL, by the Jets, formerly Chester Jets.Wolves are the premier League team in Cheshire and play in the League. Vikings are currently in League One. There are also numerous junior clubs in the county, including Chester Gladiators.County Cricket Club is one of the clubs that make up the counties of English and Welsh cricket.The county has also been home to many notable sportsmen and athletes, including footballers Ashton, Ciss, Crouch, Johnson, Owen and Rooney. Other local athletes have included cricketer Botham, marathon runner Radcliffe, Great Britain Olympic oarsman Langridge, Strong, and mountaineer Mallory, who died in 1924 on Everest.Each May, Europes largest motorcycle event, the Thundersprint, is held in Northwich.()Cheshire has also produced a military hero in Cyril Jones, a World War I ace who won the Distinguished Flying Cross.(Shores, et al, p. 217.)The county has produced several notable musicians, including popular artists Mayall (Mayall & the Bluesbreakers),(John Mayall biographical details. www.johnmayall.com website. Retrieval Date: 21 February 2008.) Astbury (Cult), Tim Burgess (Charlatans) and Curtis (Division). Concert pianist Hough, singer Gilmore and her producer husband Stonier also reside in Cheshire. The county has also been home to several writers, including Caine (18531931), popular romantic novelist and playwright; Garner; Victorian novelist Gaskell, whose novel Cranford features her home town of Knutsford; and most famously Lewis Carroll, born and raised in Daresbury, hence the cat. Artists from the county include ceramic artist Bossons and sculptor and photographer Goldsworthy. Actors from Cheshire include Craig, the 6th Bond; Wendy Hiller; and McGibbon, best known for his role in Millions.Local radio stations in the county include 106.3, Heart and Gold for Chester and West Cheshire, FM for the east of the county, 1 for the south, FM for Warrington, FM, which covers Widnes, and community station FM, which covers central Cheshire. The BBC covers the west with Radio Merseyside, the north and east with Radio Manchester and the south with Radio Stoke. There were plans to launch BBC Radio Cheshire, but those were shelved in 2007 after a lower than expected BBC licence fee settlement.Settlements and communicationsSettlementsThe county is home to some of the most affluent areas of Northern England, including Edge, Wilmslow, Prestbury, Tarporley and Knutsford, named in 2006 as the most expensive place to buy a house in the north of England. The former Cheshire town of Altrincham was in second place. The area is sometimes referred to as The Golden Triangle on account of the area in and around the above mentioned towns and villages.()The cities and towns in Cheshire are:Some settlements which were historically part of the county now fall under the counties of Derbyshire, Merseyside and Greater Manchester:(()()()TransportRail and roadThe main railway line through the county is the Coast Main Line. Many trains call at Crewe (in the south of the county) and Warrington Bank Quay (in the north of the county) en route to London and Scotland, as well as Runcorn on the Liverpool branch of the WCML.The major interchanges are:*Crewe (the biggest station in Cheshire) for trains to London Euston and Scotland (via the WCML), Wales, The Midlands (Birmingham, Stoke and Derby) as well as suburban services to Manchester, Chester and Liverpool.*Warrington stations (Central and Bank Quay) for suburban services to Manchester, Chester and Liverpool and regional express services to North Wales, London, Scotland, Yorkshire, the East Coast and the East Midlands*Chester for urban services (via Merseyrail) to Liverpool Central, suburban services to Manchester, Warrington and rural Cheshire and express services to Llandudno, Holyhead, Birmingham, the West Midlands, London and CardiffIn the east of Cheshire, Macclesfield station is served by Trains and CrossCountry, on the Manchester-London line. Services from Manchester to the south coast frequently stop at Macclesfield.Cheshire has  of roads, including  of the M6, M62, M53 and M56 motorways, with 23 interchanges and four service areas. The M6 motorway at the Viaduct carries 140,000 vehicles every 24 hours.()WaterwaysFile:Cheshire Ring Schematic.png|thumb|right|250px|Schematic of the Cheshire Ringcircle 501 199 67 Manchestercircle 281 256 118 Canalcircle 487 30 98 Canalcircle 672 79 90 Canalcircle 311 660 156 and Mersey Canalcircle 861 650 178 Canalcircle 733 303 110 Forest Canalcircle 930 390 90 Marplecircle 612 911 139 on Trentrect 718 158 955 188 Ashton-under-Lynerect 197 373 420 415 Brookdesc noneThe Cheshire canal system includes several canals originally used to transport the countys industrial products (mostly chemicals). Nowadays they are mainly used for tourist traffic. The Ring is formed from the Rochdale, Ashton, Peak Forest, Macclesfield, Trent and Mersey and Bridgewater canals. The Ship Canal is a wide,  stretch of water opened in 1894. It consists of the rivers Irwell and Mersey made navigable to Manchester for seagoing ships leaving the Mersey estuary. The canal passes through the north of the county via Runcorn and Warrington.See also*of England*Cheshire List of MPs*Sheriff of Cheshire*Lieutenant of CheshireNotes and referencesNotesBibliography*Crosby, A. (1996). A History of Cheshire. (The Darwen County History Series.) Chichester, UK: Phillimore & Co ISBN 0-85033-932-4.*Harris, B. E., and Thacker, A. T. (1987). The Victoria History of the County of Chester. (Volume 1: Physique, Prehistory, Roman, Anglo-Saxon, and Domesday). Oxford: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-722761-9.*Morgan, P. (Ed.) (1978). Domesday Book. Volume 26: Cheshire. Chichester, Sussex: Phillmore and Company Limited. ISBN 0-85033-140-4.*Phillips, A. D. M., and Phillips, C. B. (Eds.) (2002). A New Historical Atlas of Cheshire. Chester, UK: Cheshire County Council and Cheshire Community Council Publications Trust. ISBN 0-904532-46-1.* Shores, Christopher; Franks, Norman; Guest, Russell (1990). Above the Trenches: A Complete Record of the Fighter Aces and Units of the British Empire Air Forces 1915-1920. Grub Street. ISBN 0948817194, 9780948817199.*Sylvester, D. (1980). A History of Cheshire, (The Darwen County History Series.)  (Second Edition, original publication date, 1971). London and Chichester, UK: Phillimore & Co. Ltd. ISBN 0-85033-384-9.Further reading*Beck, J. (1969). Tudor Cheshire. (Volume 7 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire). Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council.*BuLock, J. D. (1972). Pre-Conquest Cheshire 3831066. (Volume 3 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire). Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council.*Dore, R.N. (1966). The Civil Wars in Cheshire. (Volume 8 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire). Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council.*Driver, J. T. (1971). Cheshire in the Later Middle Ages 13991540. (Volume 6 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire). Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council.*Harris, B. E. (1979). The Victoria History of the County of Chester. (Volume 2).  Oxford: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-722749-X.*Harris, B. E. (1980). The Victoria History of the County of Chester. (Volume 3).  Oxford: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-722754-6.*Hewitt, H. J. (1967). Cheshire Under the Three Edwards. (Volume 5 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire). Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council.*Higham, N. J. (1993). The Origins of Cheshire. Manchester, UK: Manchester University Press. ISBN 0-7190-3160-5.*Hodson, J. H. (1978). Cheshire, 16601780: Restoration to Industrial Revolution. (Volume 9 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire).  Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council. ISBN 0-903119-11-0.*Husain, B. M. C. (1973). Cheshire Under the Norman Earls 10661237. (Volume 4 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire). Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council.*Morgan, V., and Morgan, P. (2004). Prehistoric Cheshire. Ashbourne, Derbyshire:Landmark Publishing Company. ISBN 1-84306-140-6.*Scard, G. (1981). Squire and Tenant: Rural Life in Cheshire 17601900. (Volume 10 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire). Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council. ISBN 0-903119-13-7.*Scholes, R. (2000). The Towns and Villages of Britain: Cheshire. Wilmslow, Cheshire: Sigma Press. ISBN 1-85058-637-3.**Sylvester. D., and Nulty, G. (1958). The Historical Atlas of Cheshire. (Third Edition) Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council.*Thompson, F. H. (1965). Roman Cheshire. (Volume 2 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire). Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council.*Tigwell, R. E. (1985). Cheshire in the Twentieth Century. (Volume 11 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire). Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council.*Varley, W. J. (1964). Cheshire Before the Romans. (Volume 1 of Cheshire Community Council Series: A History of Cheshire). Series Editor: J. J. Bagley. Chester, UK: Cheshire Community Council.*Youngs, F. A. (1991). Guide to the Local Administrative Units of England. (Volume 1: Northern England). London: Royal Historical Society. ISBN 0-86193-127-0.External links*Cheshire Lieutenancy* Office of National Statistics  2001 Bicentenary  Cheshire* Cheshire Wildlife Trust* The Historic Society of Lancashire and Cheshire* rECOrd (Local Biological Records Centre for Cheshire)* Discovercheshire website - council maintained recreational routes and country parks* Cheshire Market Towns - council maintained guide to Cheshires Market Towns*af:Cheshireang:Ceasterscrar:ast:Cheshirezh-min-nan:Cheshirebr:Cheshireca:Cheshirecs:CheshireGaerda:Cheshirede:Cheshireet:Cheshirees:Cheshireeo:Cheshireeu:Cheshire(comt)gl:Cheshirehi:id:Cheshireia:Cheshireis:Cheshireit:Cheshirehe:kw:Cheshirelv:eralb:Cheshirelt:eyrasmr:(graafschap)ja:no:Cheshirenn:Cheshirepl:Cheshirept:Cheshirero:Cheshireru:simple:Cheshire(grfstvo)sr:fi:Cheshiresv:Cheshireth:uk:ug:Chshirvo:Cheshirezh:
7441
Carson_City,_Nevada
The Consolidated Municipality of Carson City is the capital of the state of Nevada. The population was 55,274 at the 2010 census.Historythumb|125px|left|Abraham Currythumb|260px|Illustration of Carson City in 1877.The first European Americans to arrive in what is known as Eagle Valley were C. Fremont and his exploration party in January 1843.()  Fremont named the river flowing through the valley River in honor of Christopher Kit Carson, the man and scout he had hired for his expedition.  Prior to the Fremont expedition, Indians inhabited the valley and surrounding areas.  Settlers named the area Washoe in reference to the tribe.() By 1851 the Station ranch located along the River served as a trading post and stopover for travelers on the Trails Branch which ran through Eagle Valley.  The valley and trading post received their name from a eagle that was hunted and killed by one of the early settlers and was featured on a wall inside the post.As the area was part of the Utah Territory, it was governed from Salt Lake City, where the territorial government was headquartered.  Early settlers bristled at the control exterted by Mormon-influenced officials and desired the creation of the Nevada territory.  A vigilante group of influential settlers, headed by Abraham Curry, sought a site for a capital city for the envisioned territory.()  In 1858, Curry bought Eagle Station and thereafter renamed the settlement Carson City.()  As Curry and several other partners had Eagle Valley surveyed for development.  Curry had decided for himself that Carson City would someday serve as the capital city and left a  plot open in the center of town for a future capitol building.Following the discovery of gold and silver in 1859 on the nearby Lode, Carson Citys population began to rise.  Curry built the Warm Springs Hotel a mile to the east of  the center of town.  As predicted, Carson City was selected as the territorial capital, besting Virginia City and American Flat.  Curry loaned the Warm Springs Hotel to the territorial Legislature as a meeting hall.  The Legislature named Carson City to be the seat of Ormsby County and selected the hotel as the territorial prison with Curry serving as its first warden.  Today the property still serves as part of the state prison.When Nevada became a state in 1864 during the Civil War, Carson City was confirmed as Nevadas permanent capital.  Carson Citys development was no longer dependent on the mining industry and instead became a thriving commercial center.  The & Truckee Railroad was built between Virginia City and Carson City.  A wooden flume was also built from the Sierra Nevadas into Carson City.  The current capitol building was constructed from 187071.  The States Mint operated a branch mint in Carson City between the years 1870 and 1893, which struck gold and silver coins.  People came from China during that time, many of them to work on the railroad.  Some of them owned businesses and taught school.  By 1880, almost a thousand Chinese people, one for every five Caucasians, lived in Carson City.()Carson Citys population and transportation traffic decreased when the Pacific Railroad built a line through Pass, too far to the north to benefit Carson City.  The city was slightly revitalized with the mining booms in Tonopah and Goldfield.  The US federal building (now renamed the Laxalt Building) was completed in 1890 as was the Indian School.  Carson City resigned itself to small city status, advertising itself as Americas smallest capital.20th-century revitalization and growthThe city slowly grew; by 1960 it had reached its 1880, boom-time population.  Portions of Ormsby County had been given over to neighboring counties and by this time the county was not much larger than the city itself.  In 1969, Ormsby County was officially dissolved and Carson City took over all municipal services with an city status.  With this consolidation, Carson City absorbed former town sites such as Empire City, which had grown up in the 1860s as a milling center along the Carson River and current US 50. Carson City could now advertise itself as one of Americas largest state capitals with its  of city limits.()In 1991, the city adopted a downtown master plan, specifying that no building within 500 feet (152 m) of the capitol would surpass it in height.  This plan prohibited future high-rise development in the center of downtown.()  The House is currently the tallest building in downtown Carson City, at a height of 117 feet.  The structure was completed in 1972.(Carson City High Rise Buildings)DemographicsCarson City is the smallest of the United States 363 Statistical Areas.As of the 2010 census there are 55,274 people, 20,171 households, and 13,252 families residing in the city. The population density is 366 people per square mile (141/km). There are 21,283 housing units at an average density of 148/sq mi (57/km). The racial makeup of the city is 81.1% White, 1.9% Black or African American, 2.4% Native American, 2.1% Asian, 0.2% Pacific Islander, 9.4% from other races, and 2.9% from two or more races. 21% of the population are Hispanic or Latino of any race. As of the 2000 census, there are 20,171 households, out of which 29.8% have children under the age of 18 living with them, 50.0% are married couples living together, 11.0% have a female householder with no husband present, and 34.3% are non-families. 27.8% of all households are made up of individuals and 11.00% have someone living alone who is 65 years of age or older. The average household size is 2.44 and the average family size is 2.97. The citys age distribution is: 23.4% under the age of 18, 7.9% from 18 to 24, 28.9% from 25 to 44, 24.9% from 45 to 64, and 14.9% who are 65 years of age or older. The median age is 39 years. For every 100 females there are 106.90 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there are 108.20 males.()Data from the 2000 census indicates that the median income for a household in the city is $41,809, and the median income for a family is $49,570. Males have a median income of $35,296 versus $27,418 for females. The capita income for the city is $20,943. 10.0% of the population and 6.9% of families are below the line. Out of the total population, 13.7% of those under the age of 18 and 5.8% of those 65 and older are living below the poverty line.EconomyThe following is a list of the top employers in Carson City:(Nevada Workforce)(Regional Data Center)*State of Nevada**Department of Transportation**Department of Corrections**Department of Motor Vehicles**Department of Defense*Carson City School District*Carson-Tahoe Hospital*Carson City*Nevada College*Chromalloy Nevada*Wal-Mart*Fandango*Legislative Counsel Bureau*Nugget*Click Bond, Inc.*Gold Dust WestGovernment and politicsCarson City is governed via the mayor-council system. The mayor is elected in a citywide vote to a four year term. The city council is called the Board of Supervisors and has four members. Members are elected from single member wards. Nevadas capital is generally considered a Republican stronghold, often voting for Republicans by wide margins. In 2004, George Bush defeated John Kerry 57-40%. In 2008 however Obama became the first Democrat since 1964 to win Carson City, defeating McCain 49% to 48%, by 204 votes, a margin of under 1%.()ClimateCarson City features a climate (Koppen Bsk)(Updated North American Map of the Koppen climate classification system.) with cool but not inordinately cold winters and hot summers. The city is situated in a high desert river valley approximately  above sea level. There are four fairly distinct seasons, all of which are relatively mild compared to many parts of the country and to what one may expect given its elevation. Winters see typically light to moderate snowfall, with a median of .( Most precipitation occurs in winter and spring, with summer and fall being fairly dry, drier than neighboring California. Mid-summer highs typically top out in the 90s, doing so 36 times per year,( but temperatures of  and above do occur on occasion.The Carson River flows from Douglas County through the southwestern edge of Carson City.dateAugust 2010EducationThe Carson City School District operates ten schools in Carson City. The six elementary schools are Bordewich-Bray Elementary School, Empire Elementary School, Fremont Elementary School, Fritsch Elementary School, Mark Twain Elementary School, and Al Seeliger Elementary School. The two middle schools are Carson Middle School and Eagle Valley Middle School.  Carson High School and the alternative Pioneer High School serve high school students. Carson High is on Saliman Road.()Nevada College (WNC) is a regionally accredited, two year and four year institution which is part of the System of Higher Education.   It has an education program. The school also offers associate of arts, associate of science.()Photos of Carson CityImage:StCharlesHotel Carson City.jpg|Historic St Charles Hotel in Carson CityImage:Laxalt Building, 2007.jpg| Former Carson City Post OfficeImage:Nevada Govenors Mansion.JPG| The Governors Mansion in Carson CitySports and recreationCarson City has never hosted any professional team sports. However, a variety of sports are offered a parks and recreation.() Many neighborhood parks offers a wide variety of features, including picnic tables, beaches, restrooms, fishing, softball, basketball, pond, tennis, and volleyball. The largest park is Mills Park, which has a total of  of land.()While there are no ski slopes within Carson City, the city is located close to Mountain Resort, Diamond Peak and Mount Rose skiing areas.()Points of interestMuseums*State Capitol  original capitol still housing the governors offices with museum exhibits*Nevada State Museum  former state mint featuring rock, mining and prehistoric exhibits, and a recreated West village*State Railroad Museum  featuring the Inyo locomotive and relocated Wabuska Railroad Station*Indian School  museum collection includes items from former faculty, students and school(http://www.nps.gov/nr/travel/nevada/ste.htm)*Foreman-Roberts House Museum(http://www.cchistorical.org/historicrobertshouse.htm)  Gothic Revival architecture, tours available.*House(http://nevadaculture.org/nsla/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id725&Itemid95) (not open to public) - home of George Ferris, inventor of the wheelthumb|right|200px|Secret Harbor Beach, Lake TahoeOpen land*Silver Saddle Ranch*Mexican Dam  1860s stone dam across the Carson River*Prison Hill  Trail historic markers, location of the Stewart S*Carson Aquatic Trail*National Forest (Ranger District)**Kings Canyon Falls**Valley Peak    highest point within Carson City*Rim Trail*Tahoe  Nevada State Park  three beaches lie within or near the city limits**Chimney Beach**Secret Harbor**Skunk Harbor*Lake State Park  borders city to the north*C Hill  hill featuring the Carson City C and giant American FlagPopular cultureFilmsThe following is a list of movies with scenes filmed in Carson City(www.imdb.com)(Carson City.com)*Shootist  John Waynes last film that was shot on location at the Krebbs-Peterson House*Bonanza*Man*Pink Cadillac*MiseryThe following is a list of films with scenes set in Carson City but filmed elsewhere*Carson City*Air*NoonEvents*Corbett-Fitzsimmons Fight*Nevada Day ParadeNotable Natives and residentsCarson City has served as one of the states centers for politics and business.  Every state governor since S. Dickerson has resided in the Governors Mansion located in Carson City.() See also: of Governors of Nevada. The following personalities took up a residence in Carson City at some point in their lives.(Historic Personalities)*Duane L. Bliss, timber businessman*Clemens, Secretary of Nevada Territory*Curry, founding father of Carson City and early politician*Dat-So-La-Lee, Native American basket weaver and artist*George Ferris, creator of the Wheel*Laxalt, former Govenor and U.S. Senator*Monk, stagecoach driver*Ormsby, soldier and namesake of County and House*Twain, author (lived with his brother Orion)(Mark Twain (Samuel Clemens) - Carson City)*Winnemucca, Native American author*Jones, (Minden, Nevada) Red Bull X-Fighters Moto X Rider, X-Games Gold Medal winner 2007, Winner of X-Fighters event in Giza, Egypt, 2010. 8th in World Championship rankings for 2011.Transportationsouth on US 395, just south of US 50 near Carson CityThere are two highways in the city Route 395 and US Route 50.()  Carson City is home to one under-construction freeway Interstate 580.  Phase 1 of the Carson City Freeway Project from US 395, just north of the city, to US 50 was completed in February 2006 and Phase 2A, extending from Rt. 50 to Fairview Drive, was officially opened on September 24, 2009. Phase 2B, Fairview Drive to Rt. 50, awaits funding.()Carson Citys first modern bus system, Jump Around Carson, or JAC, opened to the public. JAC uses a smaller urban bus that is ideal for Carson City.() However, there is virtually no ground public transportation to other destinations.  Passenger trains havent served Carson City since 1948, Lines stopped their bus services to the town in 2006 and Amtrak discontinued their connecting thruway bus to Sacramento in 2008.  There is now only a limited Monday  Friday RTC bus service to Reno which is still served by both Greyhound and Amtrak.Carson City is also served by the Airport, which is a regional airport in the northern part of the city. International Airport, which is  away, handles international and domestic commercial flights.()ReferencesExternal links* City of Carson City  official site.* Reno-Tahoe CVB  Carson City pages* Carson City Convention and Visitors Bureau* Virginia & Truckee Railroad: Information about the historical railroad. CityCityCity-City, NevadaCityCityCityCityCityCityCityCity (Nevado)Cityfa:CityCity, NevadaCity, Nevadako:City, City, NevadaCity, NevadaCityCityCity, NevadaCity, NevadaCity, NevadaCity()lv:KrsonsitijaSitisCityCity (), City (Nevada)()City (Nevada)CityCity CountyCityCityCity, Nevada()City, NevadaCityCityCityng Carson, Nebadauk:-ph Carson, NevadaCity (Nevada)City, NevadaSitis()
7446
Chalcolithic
The Chalcolithic ( khalkos copper +  lithos stone) period or Copper Age, also known as the Eneolithic/neolithic (from Latin aeneus of bronze), is a phase of the Age in which the addition of tin to copper to form bronze during smelting remained yet unknown by the metallurgists of the times. The Copper Age was originally defined as a transition between the Age and the Bronze Age. Because it is characterized by the use of metals, the Copper Age is considered a part of the Bronze Age rather than the Stone Age.An archaeological site in Europe (Serbia) contains the oldest securely dated evidence of copper making at high temperature, from 7,000 years ago. The find extends the known record of copper smelting by about 500 years, and suggests that copper smelting may have been invented in separate parts of Asia and Europe at that time rather than spreading from a single source. (http://www.archaeology.ws/2010-6-29.htm)The Name and the ConceptThe multiple names result from multiple recognitions of the period. Originally the term Bronze Age meant that either copper or bronze was being used as the chief hard substance for the manufacture of tools and weapons. In 1881 John Evans recognizing that the use of copper often preceded the use of bronze distinguished between a transitional Copper Age and the Bronze Age proper. He did not include this transitional period in the tripartite system of Early, Middle and Late Bronze Age but placed it at the beginning outside of it. He did not, however, present it as a fourth age, but chose to retain the traditional system.In 1884 Gaetano Chierici, perhaps following Evans lead, renamed it in Italian as the Eneo-litica (hyphen his) or Bronze-stone transition. This phrase never meant that the period is one in which both bronze and stone were used. The Copper Age features the use of copper, excluding bronze; moreover, stone continued to be used in a minor industry throughout both the Bronze Age and the Iron Age. Litica simply names the Stone Age as the point from which the transition began and is not another -lithic age. The Eneolithic was never part of the Stone Age, which ended conclusively the moment the first smelterer succeeded in obtaining copper from copper ore for the first time.Subsequently the British used either Evans Copper Age or the Eneo- or Aeneo-lithic, a translation of Chiericis eneo-litica. After several years a number of complainants appeared in the literature that Eneolithic seemed to the untrained eye to be produced from e-neolithic, outside the Neolithic, clearly not a definitive characterization of the Copper Age. About the year 1900 many began to substitute Chalcolithic for Eneolithic to avoid the false segmentation. It was at this time that the misunderstanding began among those who had not understood the Italian. The -lithic was seen as a new -lithic age, a part of the Stone Age in which copper was used, which is a fundamental contradiction. Today Copper Age, Eneolithic and Chalcolithic are used synonymously to mean Evans original definition of Copper Age.The period is a transitional one but not outside of the traditional system. It appears that copper was not widely exploited at first and that efforts in alloying it with tin and other metals began quite soon, making it difficult to distinguish the distinct Chalcolithic cultures from later periods. The boundary between the Copper and Bronze Ages is indistinct, since alloys sputtered in and out of use due to the erratic supply of tin.The emergence of metallurgy occurred first in the Crescent, where it gave rise to the Bronze Age in the millennium BC. There was an independent and limited invention of copper and bronze smelting by the Incas in America and the Mesoamerican civilization in West Mexico (see in pre-Columbian Mesoamerica).The literature of European archaeology, in general, avoids the use of chalcolithic (the term Copper Age is preferred), whereas Eastern archaeologists regularly use it. The Copper Age in the Middle East and the Caucasus began in the late millennium BC and lasted for about a millennium before it gave rise to the Bronze Age. Transition from the European Copper Age to Age Europe occurs about the same time, between the late 5th and the late 3rd millennia BC.According to Parpola,(A.Parpola, 2005) ceramic similarities between the Civilization, southern Turkmenistan, and northern Iran during 43003300 BC of the Chalcolithic period (Copper Age) suggest considerable mobility and trade.EuropeAn archaeological site in southeastern Europe (Serbia) contains the oldest securely dated evidence of copper making at high temperature, from 7,000 years ago. The find in June 2010 extends the known record of copper smelting by about 500 years, and suggests that copper smelting may have been invented in separate parts of Asia and Europe at that time rather than spreading from a single source. (http://www.archaeology.ws/2010-6-29.htm)In Serbia a copper axe was found at Prokuplje, which indicates that humans were using metals in Europe by 7,500 years ago (~5,500 BC), many years earlier than previously believed.(http://www.thaindian.com/newsportal/india-news/ancient-axe-find-suggests-copper-age-began-earlier-than-believed_100105122.html) Knowledge of the use of copper was far wider spread than the metal itself. The European Axe culture used stone axes modeled on copper axes, even with imitation mold marks carved in the stone.(J. Evans, 1897)File:TimnaChalcolithicMine.JPG|thumb|Chalcolithic copper mine in Timna Valley, Desert, Israelthe Iceman, who was found in the tztal Alps in 1991 and whose remains were dated to about 3300 BC, was found with a Mondsee copper axe, which indicates that copper mining existed in Europe at least 5,300 years ago (500 years earlier than previously had been believed).(Oetzi: The 5000 Year Old Murder Case --SOLVED! http://www.mondovista.com/oetzi.html)Examples of Chalcolithic cultures in Europe include Nova de So Pedro and Millares on the Peninsula.(C.M.Hogan, 2007) Pottery of the people has been found at both sites, dating to several centuries after copper-working began there. The Beaker culture appears to have spread copper and bronze technologies in Europe, along with Indo-European languages.(D.W.Anthony, The Horse, The Wheel and Language: How Bronze-Age riders from the Eurasian steppes shaped the modern world (2007).)South AsiaThe Asian inhabitants of Mehrgarh fashioned tools with local copper ore between 77003300 BC.(Possehl, Gregory L. (1996))East Asia5th millennia BC copper artifacts start to appear in East Asia, such as Jiangzhai and culture, but those metal artifacts were not widely used.AfricaThe Age and Bronze Age occurred simultaneously in much of Africa. Africa and the Nile Valley imported its iron technology from the East and followed Near Eastern course of Bronze Age and Age development. The earliest dating of iron in Sub-Saharan Africa is 2500 BC at Egaro, west of Termit, making it contemporary to the Middle East.(IRON IN AFRICA: REVISING THE HISTORY(2002). Unesco.) The Egaro date is debatable with archaeologists, due to method used to attain it.(Iron in Sub-Saharan Africa  by Stanley B. Alpern (2005). pp. 71) The Termit date of 1500 BCE is widely accepted. Iron use, in smelting and forging for tools, appears in West Africa by 1200 BC, making it one of the first places for the birth of the Iron Age.(Duncan E. Miller and N.J. Van Der Merwe, Early Metal Working in Sub Saharan Africa Journal of African History 35 (1994) 136; Minze Stuiver and N.J. Van Der Merwe, Radiocarbon Chronology of the Iron Age in Sub-Saharan Africa Current Anthropology 1968.)(How Old is the Iron Age in Sub-Saharan Africa?  by Roderick J. McIntosh, Archaeological Institute of America (1999))(Iron in Sub-Saharan Africa  by Stanley B. Alpern (2005)) Before the 19th century, African methods of extracting iron were employed in Brazil, until more advanced European methods were instituted.(Davidson, Basil(1994). The Search for Africa, History, Culture, Politics. New York: Random House, pp. 57(8), ISBN 0-8129-2278-6) In the region of the Mountains in Niger we have the development of independent copper smelting between 30002500 BC. The process was not in a developed state, indication smelting was not foreign. It became mature about the 1500 BC.(Ehret, Christopher (2002). The Civilizations of Africa. Charlottesville: University of Virginia, pp. 136, 137 ISBN 0-8139-2085-X.)AmericasThe term is also applied to American civilizations that already used copper and copper alloys thousands of years before European conquest. The Copper Complex, located in present-day Michigan and Wisconsin in the States, used copper for tools, weapons, and other implements. Artifacts from these sites have been dated from 4000 to 1000 BC, making them some of the oldest Chalcolithic sites in the entire world.(T.C.Pleger, 2000)See also* metallurgy in Africa* during the Copper Age in Europe* table of the principal old world prehistoric cultures* age systemNotesReferences* .* .* .* C.Michael Hogan (2007) Los Silillos, The Megalithic Portal, ed. A. Burnham http://www.megalithic.co.uk/article.php?sid17974* T.C. Pleger (2000) The Old Copper Complex of the Western Great Lakes http://www.uwfox.uwc.edu/academics/depts/tpleger/oldcopper.html* Possehl, Gregory L. (1996). Mehrgarh in Oxford Companion to Archaeology, edited by Brian Fagan. Oxford University Press.External links* Chalcolithic Era ; Elizabeth F. Henrickson . Encyclopdia Iranica 1991 .ba:ca:Eneolticcs:Eneolitcy:Chalcolithigda:Kobberalderde:Kupfersteinzeitdel Cobreeo:alkolitikoeu:Kalkolitofr:Chalcolithiquefy:Kopertiiddo Cobredobadel ramela:Chalcolithicumlt:Eneolitashu:Rzkornl:Kopertijdnds-nl:Koppertiedja:no:Kobberalderennn:Koparsteinalderendel Coiredlarampl:Chalkolitdo Cobrecupruluidobadobasr:dobakausisv:Kalkolitikumng Tansoauk:i  ng zh:
7463
Cold_fusion
Image:Cold-fusion-calorimeter-nhe-diagram.png|thumb|250px|Diagram of an open type calorimeter used at the New Hydrogen Energy Institute in JapanCold fusion refers to a proposed fusion process offered to explain a group of disputed experimental results first reported by electrochemists Fleischmann and Pons. The field originates with reports of an experiment by Fleischmann, then one of the worlds leading electrochemists,() and Pons in March 1989 where they reported anomalous heat production (excess heat) of a magnitude they asserted would defy explanation except in terms of nuclear processes. They further reported measuring small amounts of nuclear reaction byproducts, including neutrons and tritium.( (It is inconceivable that this of heat could be due to anything but nuclear processes... We realise that the results reported here raise more questions than they provide answers...)) The small tabletop experiment involved electrolysis of water on the surface of a palladium (Pd) electrode.()The media reported that nuclear fusion was happening inside the electrolysis cells,( and these reports raised hopes of a cheap and abundant source of energy.() Hopes fell with the big number of negative replications, the withdrawal of many positive replications, the discovery of flaws and sources of experimental error in the original experiment, and finally the discovery that Fleischmann and Pons had not actually detected nuclear reaction byproducts.(, , , ) By late 1989, most scientists considered cold fusion claims dead,((, , , ) and cold fusion subsequently gained a reputation as science.() In 1989, the majority of a review panel organized by the Department of Energy (DOE) found that the evidence for the discovery of a new nuclear process was not persuasive enough to start a special program, but was sympathetic toward modest support for experiments within the present funding system. A second DOE review, convened in 2004 to look at new research, reached conclusions similar to the first.(, , )A small community of researchers continues to investigate cold fusion,((, , , , , , , , , , , ) claiming to replicate Fleischmann and Pons results including nuclear reaction byproducts.()() Since cold fusion articles are rarely published in refereed scientific journals, the results do not receive as much scrutiny as more mainstream topics,(, ) and many scientists arent even aware that there is new research.( Mainstream scientists perceive the field as the remains of the controversy of the early 1990s.()History Before the Fleischmann&ndash;Pons experiment The ability of palladium to absorb hydrogen was recognized as early as the nineteenth century by Thomas Graham.() In the late 1920s, two Austrian born scientists, Paneth and Kurt Peters, originally reported the transformation of hydrogen into helium by spontaneous nuclear catalysis when hydrogen was absorbed by finely divided palladium at room temperature. However, the authors later retracted that report, acknowledging that the helium they measured was due to background from the air.(()In 1927, Swedish scientist J. Tandberg stated that he had fused hydrogen into helium in an cell with palladium electrodes.( On the basis of his work, he applied for a Swedish patent for a method to produce helium and useful reaction energy. After deuterium was discovered in 1932, Tandberg continued his experiments with water. Due to Paneth and Peters retraction, Tandbergs patent application was eventually denied.( His application for a patent in 1927 was denied as he could not explain the physical process.(Kall fusion redan p 1920-talet, Ny Teknik, Kaianders Sempler, 9 February 2011)The term cold fusion was used as early as 1956 in a New York Times article about Luis W. Alvarez work on muon-catalyzed fusion.()  Paul Palmer of Young University also used the term cold fusion in 1986 in an investigation of geo-fusion, the possible existence of fusion in a core.()Fleischmann&ndash;Pons experiment Events preceding announcement thumb|Electrolysis cell schematicFleischmann of the of Southampton and Pons of the of Utah hypothesized that the high compression ratio and mobility of deuterium that could be achieved within palladium metal using electrolysis might result in nuclear fusion.()  To investigate, they conducted electrolysis experiments using a palladium cathode and heavy water within a calorimeter, an insulated vessel designed to measure process heat. Current was applied continuously for many weeks, with the water being renewed at intervals.( Some deuterium was thought to be accumulating within the cathode, but most was allowed to bubble out of the cell, joining oxygen produced at the anode.() For most of the time, the power input to the cell was equal to the calculated power leaving the cell within measurement accuracy, and the cell temperature was stable at around 30 C. But then, at some point (in some of the experiments), the temperature rose suddenly to about 50 C without changes in the input power.  These high temperature phases would last for two days or more and would repeat several times in any given experiment once they had occurred. The calculated power leaving the cell was significantly higher than the input power during these high temperature phases. Eventually the high temperature phases would no longer occur within a particular cell.(In 1988, Fleischmann and Pons applied to the States Department of Energy for funding towards a larger series of experiments. Up to this point they had been funding their experiments using a small device built with $100,000 out-of-pocket.()  The grant proposal was turned over for review, and one of the reviewers was E. Jones of Young University.( Jones had worked for some time on fusion, a known method of inducing nuclear fusion without high temperatures, and had written an article on the topic entitled Cold nuclear fusion that had been published in American in July 1987. Fleischmann and Pons and co-workers met with Jones and co-workers on occasion in Utah to share research and techniques. During this time, Fleischmann and Pons described their experiments as generating considerable excess energy, in the sense that it could not be explained by reactions alone.( They felt that such a discovery could bear significant commercial value and would be entitled to patent protection. Jones, however, was measuring neutron flux, which was not of commercial interest.( In order to avoid problems in the future, the teams appeared to agree to simultaneously publish their results, although their accounts of their March 6 meeting differ.()AnnouncementIn mid-March 1989, both research teams were ready to publish their findings, and Fleischmann and Jones had agreed to meet at an airport on March 24 to send their papers to Nature via FedEx.( Fleischmann and Pons, however, pressured by the University of Utah which wanted to establish priority on the discovery,( broke their apparent agreement, submitting their paper to the Journal of Electroanalytical Chemistry on March 11, and disclosing their work via a press release () and press conference on March 23.(  Jones, upset, faxed in his paper to Nature after the press conference.(Fleischmann and Pons announcement drew wide media attention.(For example, in 1989, the Economist editorialized that the cold fusion affair was exactly what science should be about.  as cited in )  The 1986 discovery of superconductivity had caused the scientific community to be more open to revelations of unexpected scientific results that could have huge economic repercussions and that could be replicated reliably even if they had not been predicted by established conjecture.(, ) Cold fusion was proposing the counterintuitive idea that a nuclear reaction could be caused to occur inside a chemically bound crystal structure. Many scientists were reminded of the effect, a process involving nuclear transitions in a solid. Its discovery 30 years earlier had also been unexpected, though it was quickly replicated and explained within the existing physics framework.()The announcement of a new clean source of energy came at a crucial time: everyone still remembered the oil crisis and the problems caused by oil dependence, anthropogenic warming was starting to become notorious, the movement was labeling nuclear power plants as dangerous and getting them closed, people had in mind the consequences of mining, rain  and the effect, and, to top it all, the Exxon Valdez oil spill happened the day after the announcement.(, ) In the press conference, Peterson, Fleischmann and Pons, backed by the solidity of their scientific credentials, repeatedly assured the journalists that cold fusion would solve all of these problems, and would provide a limitless inexhaustible source of clean energy, using only seawater as fuel.(, ) They said the results had been confirmed dozens of times and they had no doubts about them.() In the accompanying press release Fleischmann was quoted saying: What we have done is to open the door of a new research area, our indications are that the discovery will be relatively easy to make into a usable technology for generating heat and power, but continued work is needed, first, to further understand the science and secondly, to determine its value to energy economics. (Response and falloutSeveral laboratories in several countries attempted to repeat the experiments. A few initially reported success, but most failed to validate the results; Lewis, professor of Chemistry at the Institute of Technology, led one of the most ambitious validation efforts, trying many variations on the experiment without success, while CERN physicist Douglas R. O. Morrison said that essentially all attempts in Western Europe had failed.(  Even those reporting success had difficulty reproducing Fleischmann and Pons results.() On April 10, a group at A&M University published results of excess heat and later that day a group at the Institute of Technology announced neutron productionthe strongest replication announced up to that point due to the detection of neutrons and the reputation of the lab.()  In 12 April Pons was acclaimed at a ACS meeting.( But the Georgia Tech retracted their announcement in 13 April, explaining that their neutron detectors gave false positives when exposed to heat.(, ) Another attempt at independent replication, headed by Huggins at University, which also reported early success with a light water control,(Broad, William J. 19 April 1989. Stanford Reports Success, New York Times.) saved cold fusion almost single-handedly and became the only scientific support for cold fusion in the 26 April US Congress hearings.(, , ) But, when he finally presented his results, he reported an excess heat of only one celsius degree, a result that could be explained by chemical differences between heavy and light water in the presence of lithium,( he had not tried to measure any radiation,(, ) and his research was derided by scientists who saw it later.(, ) For the next six weeks, competing claims, counterclaims, and suggested explanations kept what was referred to as cold fusion or fusion confusion in the news.((, )In April 1989, Fleischmann and Pons published a preliminary note in the of Electroanalytical Chemistry.( This paper notably showed a gamma peak without its corresponding edge, which indicated they had made a mistake in claiming evidence of fusion byproducts.(,  , , ) Fleischmann and Pons replied to this critique,() but the only thing left clear was that no gamma ray had been registered and that Fleischmann refused to recognize any mistakes in the data.(, , ) A much longer paper published a year later went into details of calorimetry but did not include any nuclear measurements.(Nevertheless, Fleischmann and Pons and a number of other researchers who found positive results remained convinced of their findings.(  The University of Utah asked Congress to provide $25 million to pursue the research, and Pons was scheduled to meet with representatives of President Bush in early May.(On April 30, 1989, cold fusion was declared dead by the New York Times. The Times called it a circus the same day, and the Boston Herald attacked cold fusion the following day.( (Boston Heralds is ).)On May 1, 1989, the Physical Society held a session on cold fusion in Baltimore, including many reports of experiments that failed to produce evidence of cold fusion. At the end of the session, eight of the nine leading speakers stated that they considered the initial Fleischmann and Pons claim dead with the ninth, Rafelski, abstaining.() E. Koonin of Caltech called the Utah report a result of the incompetence and delusion of Pons and Fleischmann which was met with a standing ovation.() R. O. Morrison, a physicist representing CERN, was the first to call the episode an example of science.((APS Special Session on Cold Fusion, May 12, 1989)On May 4, due to all this new criticism, the meetings with various representatives from Washington were cancelled.()From May 8 only the A&M tritium results kept cold fusion afloat.()In July and November 1989, Nature published papers critical of cold fusion claims.()()  Negative results were also published in several other journals including Science, Review Letters, and Physical Review C (nuclear physics).(In August 1989, in spite of this trend, the state of Utah invested $4.5 million to create the National Cold Fusion Institute.()The States Department of Energy organized a special panel to review cold fusion theory and research.()  The panel issued its report in November 1989, concluding that results as of that date did not present convincing evidence that useful sources of energy would result from the phenomena attributed to cold fusion.(  The panel noted the large number of failures to replicate excess heat and the greater inconsistency of reports of nuclear reaction byproducts expected by established conjecture.  Nuclear fusion of the type postulated would be inconsistent with current understanding and, if verified, would require established conjecture, perhaps even theory itself, to be extended in an unexpected way.  The panel was against special funding for cold fusion research, but supported modest funding of focused experiments within the general funding system.( Cold fusion supporters continued to argue that the evidence for excess heat was strong, and in September 1990 the National Cold Fusion Institute listed 92 groups of researchers from 10 different countries that had reported corroborating evidence of excess heat.  However no further DOE nor NSF funding resulted from the panels recommendation.() By this point, however, academic consensus had moved decidedly toward labeling cold fusion as a kind of pathological science.(()In early May 1990 one of the two A&M researchers, Wolf, acknowledged the possibility of spiking, but said that the most likely explanation was tritium contamination in the palladium electrodes or simply contamination due to sloppy work.(, , ) In June 1990 an article in Science by science writer Taubes destroyed the public credibility of the A&M tritium results when it accused its group leader Bockris and one of his graduate students of spiking the cells with tritium.(, the Science article was , .) In October 1990 Wolf finally said that the results were explained by tritium contamination in the rods.() A A&M cold fusion review panel found that the tritium evidence was not convincing and that, while they couldnt rule out spiking, contamination and measurements problems were more likely explanations.(, ) and Bockris never got support from his faculty to resume his research.In 30 June 1991 the National Cold Fusion Institute closed after it ran out of funds;() it found no excess heat, and its reports of tritium production were met with indifference.()In 1 January 1991, Pons left his tenure, and both he and Fleischmann quietly left the United States.(() In 1992 they resumed research with Motor Corporations IMRA lab in France.( Fleischmann left for England in 1995, and the contract with Pons was not renewed in 1998 after spending $40 million with no tangible results.() The IMRA laboratory was closed in 1998 after spending 12 million on cold fusion work.()Pons has made no public declarations since, and only Fleischmann continues giving talks and publishing papers.(Several books came out critical of cold fusion research methods and the conduct of cold fusion researchers(For example: , , , ) while only a few came in their defence.(For example: , ) The community continues to maintain a skeptical consensus regarding the subject due to the lack of experimental reproducibility() and theoretical implausibility.(,  - (Extraordinary claims . . . demand extraordinary proof)) New experimental claims are routinely dismissed or ignored by mainstream scientists and journals.( (You mean its not dead?  recounting a typical reaction to hearing a cold fusion conference was held recently))Ongoing scientific workImage:Spawar1stGenCFCell.JPG|thumb|Cold fusion apparatus at the and Naval Warfare Systems Center San Diego (2005)A small but committed group of cold fusion researchers has continued to conduct experiments using Fleischmann and Pons electrolysis set-ups in spite of the rejection by the mainstream community.(( Often they prefer to name their field Low Energy Nuclear Reaction (LENR) or Chemically Assisted Nuclear Reaction (CANR),() also Lattice Assisted Nuclear Reaction (LANR) and Condensed Matter Nuclear Science (CMNS), one of the reasons being to avoid the negative connotations associated with the original name.(( The new names avoid making bold implications, like implying that fusion is happening on them, which means that other scientists are less likely to reject the experiments straightaway.(, citing ) However some in the field dont regard it as just an alternative naming of the same field but as a more accurate description of a completely different phenomena, since they believe the reported effects cannot be explained by nuclear fusion but by other non-fusion nuclear reactions happening at lower energies, like for instance proton capture with subsequent beta decay ()Between 1992 and 1997, Japans of International Trade and Industry sponsored a New Hydrogen Energy Program of US$20 million to research cold fusion.(  Announcing the end of the program in 1997, the director and one-time proponent of cold fusion research Hideo Ikegami stated we couldnt achieve what was first claimed in terms of cold fusion. (...) we cant find any reason to propose more money for the coming year or for the future.(, )Also in the 1990s, India stopped its research in cold fusion at the Atomic Research Centre because of the lack of consensus among mainstream scientists and the US denunciation of the research.() Yet, in 2008, the Institute of Advanced Studies has recommended the Indian government to revive this research. Projects were commenced at the Chennais Institute of Technology, the Bhabha Atomic Research Centre and the Gandhi Centre for Atomic Research.( However, there is still skepticism among scientists and, for all practical purposes, research is still stopped.()In February 2002, the U.S. Navy revealed that researchers at their and Naval Warfare Systems Center in Diego, California had been quietly studying cold fusion since 1989. They released a two-volume report, Thermal and nuclear aspects of the Pd/D2O system, with a plea for funding.(Szpak, Masier-Boss: Thermal and nuclear aspects of the Pd/D2O system, Feb 2002. Reported by )In May 2008 Japanese researcher Arata (Osaka University) demonstrated an experiment with deuterium gas in a cell containing a mixture of palladium and zirconium oxide.() The demonstration revived some interest for cold fusion research in India.()   In April 2011 M. Bushnell, Chief scientist at Langley Research Center, stated that LENR is a very interesting and promising new technology that is likely to advance fairly rapidly. ()NASA Langley Research Center has implemented an experimental project consisting of researchers from inside and outside NASA preparing for feasibility tests to begin by summer 2011.()Claims of commercializationSeveral entrepreneurs have claimed in the past that a working cold fusion energy generator is near to commercialization, yet so far no working machine is available on the market.In January 2011 researchers from the of Bologna, Andrea Rossi and Sergio Focardi, claimed to have successfully demonstrated commercially viable cold fusion in a device called an Catalyzer. In March 2011, two Swedish physicists evaluated the device, under the control of Rossi.()( Participants in the test: Giuseppe Levi, David Bianchini, Carlo Leonardi, Hanno Essn, Sven Kullander, Andrea Rossi, Sergio Focardi.) As the target is immediate commercialization, the inventors say that details of the invention will not be published yet. The international patent application has been partially rejected because it seemed to offend against the generally accepted laws of physics and established theories and to overcome this problem the application should have contained either experimental evidence or a firm theoretical basis in current scientific theories.() Due to this secrecy, the Swedish evaluators were not allowed to examine the inside of the reactor, and there is still uncertainty about the viability of the invention.() Peer-reviewed journals have not published papers on this invention, leading Rossi to create his own online nuclear experiments blog, called the Journal of Nuclear Physics.(Journal of Nuclear Physics.)PublicationsThe ISI identified cold fusion as the scientific topic with the largest number of published papers in 1989, of all scientific disciplines. The number of papers sharply declined after 1990 as scientists abandoned the controversy and journal editors declined to review new papers, and cold fusion fell off the ISI charts.(() The publication in mainstream journals has continued to decline but has not entirely stopped; this has been interpreted variously as the work of aging proponents who refuse to abandon a dying field, or as the normal publication rate in a small field that has found its natural niche.((Britzs survey of publications shows a decay after 1989/90 down to a minimum in 2004-5, and a subsequent rise since then. Cold fusion papers publications statistics, Dieter Britz, retrieved June 14, 2011.) Researchers who got negative results abandoned the field, and mostly only believers kept publishing in the field.() A 1993 paper in Physics Letters A was the last paper published by Fleischmann, and one of the last reports to be formally challenged on technical grounds by a cold fusion skeptic.()The decline of publications in cold fusion has been described as a failed information epidemics.( (p. 11) Both the Polywater and Cold Nuclear Fusion journal literatures exhibit episodes of epidemic growth and decline.) The sudden surge of supporters until roughly 50% of scientists support the theory, followed by a decline until there is only a very small number of supporters, has been described as a characteristic of pathological science.( Morrison The usual cycle in such cases, he notes, is that interest suddenly erupts (...) The phenomen then separates the scientists in two camps, believers and skeptics. Interest dies as only a small band of believers is able to produce the phenomenon (...) even in the face of overwhelming evidence to the contrary, the original practitioners may continue to believe in it for the rest of the careers., , , )(Sixth criteria of Langmuir: During the course of the controversy the ratio of supporters to critics rises to near 50% and then falls gradually to oblivion. (Langmuir, 1989, pp. 43-44), quoted in Simon p. 104, paraphrased in Ball p. 308. It has also been applied to the number of published results, in  The ratio of the worldwide positive results on cold fusion to negative results peaked at approximately 50% (...) qualitatively in agreement with Langmuirs sixth criteria.) The lack of a shared set of unifying concepts and techniques has prevented the creation of a dense network of collaboration in the field; researchers perform efforts in their own and in disparate directions, making more difficult the transition of cold fusion into normal science.()Cold fusion reports continued to be published in a small cluster of specialized journals like of Electroanalytical Chemistry and Nuovo Cimento. Some papers also appeared in of Physical Chemistry, Letters A, Journal of Hydrogen Energy, and a number of Japanese and Russian journals of physics, chemistry, and engineering.( Since 2005, Naturwissenschaften has published cold fusion papers; in 2009, the journal named a cold fusion researcher to its editorial board.The Laureate Schwinger declared himself a supporter of cold fusion in the fall of 1989, after much of the response to the initial reports had turned negative. He tried to publish theoretical papers supporting the possibility of cold fusion in Review Letters, but the peer reviewers rejected it so harshly that he felt deeply insulted, and he resigned from the Physical Society (publisher of PRL) in protest.(, Also )The Journal of Fusion Technology (FT) established a permanent feature in 1990 for cold fusion papers, publishing over a dozen papers per year and giving a mainstream outlet for cold fusion researchers. When editor-in-chief George Miley retired in 2001, the journal stopped accepting new cold fusion papers.() This has been cited as an example of the importance of sympathetic influential individuals to the publication of cold fusion papers in certain journals.(In the 1990s, the groups that continued to research cold fusion and their supporters established periodicals such as Fusion Facts, Cold Fusion Magazine, Energy Magazine and New Energy Times to cover developments in cold fusion and other radical claims in energy production that were being ignored in other venues. In 2007 they established their own peer-reviewed journal, the Journal of Condensed Matter Nuclear Science.(Journal of Condensed Matter Nuclear Science.) The internet has also become a major means of communication and self-publication for CF researchers, allowing for revival of the research.()ConferencesCold fusion researchers were for many years unable to get papers accepted at scientific meetings, prompting the creation of their own conferences. The first International Conference on Cold Fusion (ICCF) was held in 1990, and has met every 12 to 18 months since. By 1994, attendees offered no criticism to papers and presentations for fear of giving ammunition to external critics; according to physicist Goldstein, this allowed for the proliferation of crackpots and prevented the normal processes of serious science.( By 2002, critics and skeptics had stopped attending the conferences.() With the founding in 2004 of the International Society for Condensed Matter Nuclear Science (ISCMNS), the conference was renamed the International Conference on Condensed Matter Nuclear Science&mdash;an example of the approach the cold fusion community has adopted in avoiding the term cold fusion and its negative connotations.()()(  anomalous effects in deuterated metals, which was the new, preferred, politically palatable nom de science for cold fusion in October 1989.) Cold fusion research is often referenced by proponents as low-energy nuclear reactions, or LENR,( but according to sociologist Simon the cold fusion label continues to serve a social function in creating a identity for the field.(Since 2006, the Physical Society (APS) has included cold fusion sessions at their semiannual meetings, clarifying that this does not imply a softening of skepticism.(,  (not. Anyone can deliver a paper. We defend the openness of science - Bob Park of APS, when asked if hosting the meeting showed a softening of scepticism))() Since 2007, the Chemical Society (ACS) meetings also include invited symposium(s) on cold fusion.() An ACS program chair said that without a proper forum the matter would never be discussed and, with the world facing an energy crisis, it is worth exploring all possibilities.(On 2225 March 2009, the American Chemical Society meeting included a four-day symposium in conjunction with the 20th anniversary of the announcement of cold fusion. Researchers working at the U.S. Navys and Naval Warfare Systems Center (SPAWAR) reported detection of energetic neutrons using a heavy water electrolysis set-up and a CR-39 detector,(( a result previously published in Naturwissenschaften.( The authors claim that these neutrons are indicative of nuclear reactions;() without quantitative analysis of the number, energy, and timing of the neutrons and exclusion of other potential sources, this interpretation is unlikely to be accepted by the wider scientific community.((Further reviews and funding issuesAround 1998 the University of Utah had already dropped its research after spending over $1 million, and in the summer of 1997 Japan cut off research and closed its own lab after spending $20 million.( Cold fusion researchers have complained there has been virtually no possibility of obtaining funding for cold fusion research in the United States, and no possibility of getting published.() University researchers are unwilling to investigate cold fusion because they would be ridiculed by their colleagues and their professional careers would be at risk.(, ,  (comment attributed to George Miley of the University of Illinois)) In 1994, Goodstein described cold fusion as:Particle physicist Close has gone even further, stating that the problems that plagued the original cold fusion announcement are still happening (as of 2009): results from studies are still not being independently verified and inexplicable phenomena encountered are being labelled as cold fusion even if they are not, in order to attract the attention of journalists.(Cold fusion researchers themselves acknowledge that the flaws in the original announcement still cause their field to be marginalized and to suffer a chronic lack of funding,() but a small number of old and new researchers have remained interested in investigating cold fusion.((In August 2003, responding to a April 2003 letter from MITs L. Hagelstein,( the energy secretary Spencer Abraham ordered the DOE to organize a second review of the field.() Cold fusion researchers were asked to present a review document of all the evidence since the 1989 review. The report was released in 2004. The reviewers were split approximately evenly on whether the experiments had produced energy in the form of heat, but they all complained about the lack of proof and the poor documentation of the experiments.( In summary, the reviewers were not convinced and they didnt recommend a federal research program, but they did recommend individual well-thought studies.( They summarized its conclusions thus:The mainstream and popular scientific press presented this as a setback for cold fusion researchers, with headlines such as cold fusion gets chilly encore, but cold fusion researchers placed a rosier spin() on the report, noting that it also recommended specific areas where research could resolve the controversies in the field.() In 2005, Physics Today reported that new reports of excess heat and other cold fusion effects were still no more convincing than 15 years previous.(Experiments and reported resultsA cold fusion experiment usually includes:* a metal, such as palladium or nickel, in bulk, thin films or powder;* deuterium and/or hydrogen, in the form of water, gas or plasma; and* an excitation in the form of electricity, magnetism, temperature, pressure, laser beam(s), or of acoustic waves.()Electrolysis cells can be either open cell or closed cell.  In open cell systems, the electrolysis products, which are gaseous, are allowed to leave the cell.  In closed cell experiments, the products are captured, for example by catalytically recombining the products in a separate part of the experimental system.  These experiments generally strive for a steady state condition, with the electrolyte being replaced periodically. There are also heat after death experiments, where the evolution of heat is monitored after the electric current is turned off.The most basic setup of a cold fusion cell consists of two electrodes submerged in a solution of palladium sic and heavy water. The electrodes are then connected to a power source to transmit electricity from one electrode to the other through the solution.()  Even when anomalous heat is reported, it can take weeks for it to begin to appear - this is known as the loading time, the time required to saturate the palladium electrode with hydrogen.The Fleischmann and Pons early findings regarding helium, neutron radiation and tritium were later discredited.()() However, neutron radiation has been reported in cold fusion experiments at very low levels using different kinds of detectors, but levels were too low, close to background, and found too infrequently to provide useful information about possible nuclear processes.()()Excess heat and energy productionAn excess heat observation is based on an energy balance. Various sources of energy input and output are continuously measured. Under normal condition, the energy input can be matched to the energy output to within experimental error. In experiments such as those run by Fleischmann and Pons, a cell operating steadily at one temperature transitions to operating at a higher temperature with no increase in applied current.( In other experiments, however, no excess heat was discovered, and, in fact, even the heat from successful experiments was unreliable and could not be replicated independently.( If higher temperatures were real, and not experimental artifact, the energy balance would show an unaccounted term. In the Fleischmann and Pons experiments, the rate of inferred excess heat generation was in the range of 10-20% of total input. The high temperature condition would last for an extended period, making the total excess heat appear to be disproportionate to what might be obtained by ordinary chemical reaction of the material contained within the cell at any one time, though this could not be reliably replicated.(() Subsequent researchers who advocate for cold fusion report similar results.( cited by ,  cited by , , e.g. , e.g. ,  cited by , ) Nevertheless, as early as 1997, at least one research group was reporting that, with the proper procedure, ...5 samples out of 6 that had undergone the whole procedure showed very clear excess heat production.()One of the main criticisms of cold fusion was that the predictions from deuteron-deuteron fusion into helium should have resulted in the production of rays which were not observed and have never been observed in any subsequent cold fusion experiments.(() Cold fusion researchers have since claimed to find X-rays, helium, neutrons and even transmutations.() Some of them even claim to have found them using only light water and nickel cathodes.(In 1993, after the initial discrediting, Fleischmann reported heat-after-death experiments: where excess heat was measured after the electric current supplied to the electrolytic cell was turned off.() This type of report also became part of subsequent cold fusion claims.(, )Helium, heavy elements, and neutronsImage:Triple tracks in CR-39.jpg|right|thumb|150 px|Triple tracks in a CR-39 plastic radiation detector claimed as evidence for neutron emission from palladium deuteride.Known instances of nuclear reactions, aside from producing energy, also produce nucleons and particles on ballistic trajectories which are readily observable. In support of their claim that nuclear reactions took place in their electrolytic cells, Fleischmann and Pons reported a neutron flux of 4,000 neutrons per second, as well as detections of tritium. The classical branching ratio for previously known fusion reactions that produce tritium would predict, with 1 watt of power, the production of 1012 neutrons per second, levels that would have been fatal to the researchers.(, , , ) In 2009, Mosier-Boss et al. reported what they called the first scientific report of highly energetic neutrons, using CR-39 plastic radiation detectors,(, ) but the claims cannot be validated without a quantitative analysis of neutrons.()()Several medium and heavy elements like calcium, titanium, chromium, manganese, iron, cobalt, copper and zinc have been reported as detected by several researchers, like Tadahiko Mizuno or George Miley; these elemental transmutations are totally unexpected products of nuclear fusion processes and wont be believed by the scientific community until iron-clad reproducible proof has been presented.( The report presented to the DOE in 2004 indicated that deuterium loaded foils could be used to detect fusion reaction products and, although the reviewers found the evidence presented to them as inconclusive, they indicated that those experiments didnt use of the art techniques.(In response to skepticism about the lack of nuclear products, cold fusion researchers have tried to capture and measure nuclear products correlated with excess heat.()() Considerable attention has been given to measuring 4He production.( However, the reported levels are very near to the background, so contamination by trace amounts of helium which are normally present in the air cannot be ruled out. The lack of detection of gamma radiation seen in the fusion of hydrogen or deuterium to 4He was seen as an explanation that the helium detections are due to experimental error.( In the report presented to the DOE in 2004, the reviewers opinion was divided on the evidence for 4He; with the most negative reviews concluding that although the amounts detected were above background levels, they were very close to them and therefore could be caused by contamination from air. The panel also expressed concerns about the poor-quality of the theoretical framework cold fusion proponents presented to account for the lack of gamma rays.(In other experiments where laser beams or deuteron beams were used as excitation the reaction rates of D-D fusion were shown to increase.(, one of these experiments is .) In a paper from similar experiments the researchers conclude that their findings also provide a first independent support for the claim in cold fusion ... () Incompatibilities with conventional fusion There are many reasons conventional fusion is an unlikely explanation for the experimental results described above.( Repulsion forces Because nuclei are all positively charged, they strongly repel one another.(  Normally, in the absence of a catalyst such as a muon, very high kinetic energies are required to overcome this repulsion.() Extrapolating from known fusion rates, the rate for uncatalyzed fusion at room-temperature energy would be 50 orders of magnitude lower than needed to account for the reported excess heat.(, ,  page viii Enhancing the probability of a nuclear reaction by 50 orders of magnitude (...) via the chemical environment of a metallic lattice, contradicted the very foundation of nuclear science.)In muon-catalyzed fusion there are more fusions because the presence of the muon causes deuterium nuclei to be 207 times closer than in ordinary deuterium gas.(, ) But deuterium nuclei inside a palladium lattice are further apart than in deuterium gas, and there should be less fusion reactions, not more.(, )Paneth and Peters in the 1920s already knew that palladium can absorb up to 900 times its own volume of hydrogen gas, storing it at several thousands of times the atmospheric pressure.( This led them to believe that they could increase the nuclear fusion rate by simply loading palladium rods with hydrogen gas.( Tandberg then tried the same experiment but used electrolysis to make palladium absorb more deuterium and force the deuterium further together inside the rods, thus anticipating the main elements of Fleischmann and Pons experiment.() They all hoped that pairs of hydrogen nuclei would fuse together to form hellium nuclei, which at the time were very needed in Germany to fill zeppelins, but no evidence of hellium or of increased fusion rate was ever found.( This was also the belief of geologist Palmer, who convinced Steve Jones that the hellium-3 occurring naturally in Earth came from the fusion of deuterium inside catalysts like palladium.() This lead Jones to independently make the same experimental setup as Fleischmann and Pons (a palladium cathode submerged in heavy water, absorbing deuterium via electrolysis).() Fleischmann and Pons had the same incorrect belief,() but they  calculated the pressure to be of 1027 atmospheres, when CF experiments only achieve a ratio of one to one, which only has between 10.000 and 20.000 atmospheres.() Lack of expected reaction products Conventional deuteron fusion is a two-step process,( in which an unstable high energy intermediary is formed::D + D  4He* + 24 MeVExperiments have observed only three decay pathways for this excited-state nucleus, with the branching ratio showing the probability that any given intermediate will follow a particular pathway.(, , , ,  (explaining Pons and Fleischmann would both be dead if they had produced neutrons in proportion to their measurements of excess heat) (It has been said . . . three miracles are necessary D + D fusion to behave in a way consistent with the reported results of cold fusion experiments)) The products formed via these decay pathways are::4He*   n + 3He + 3.3 MeV (ratio50%):4He*  p + 3H + 4.0 MeV (ratio50%):4He*  4He +  + 24 MeV (ratio10&minus;6)Only about one in one million of the intermediaries decay along the third pathway, making its products comparatively rare when compared to the other paths.( This result is consistent with the predictions of the model.() If one watt of nuclear power were produced from deuteron fusion consistent with known branching ratios, the resulting neutron and tritium (3H) production would be easily measured.(()  Some researchers reported detecting 4He but without the expected neutron or tritium production; such a result would require branching ratios strongly favouring the third pathway, with the actual rates of the first two pathways lower by at least five orders of magnitude than observations from other experiments, directly contradicting both theoretically predicted and observed branching probabilities.( Those reports of 4He production did not include detection of rays, which would require the third pathway to have been changed somehow so that gamma rays are no longer emitted.(Proponents have proposed that the 24 MeV excess energy is transferred in the form of heat into the host metal lattice prior to the intermediarys decay.( However, the known rate of the decay process together with the inter-atomic spacing in a crystal makes such a transfer inexplicable in terms of conventional understandings of momentum and energy transfer,(, , ) and even then we would see measurable levels of radiations.( Some radiation would emerge, either electrons ejected from atoms or X-rays as the atoms are disturbed, but none were seen.) Also, experiments indicate that the ratios of deuterium fusion remain constant at different energies.(, ) In general, pressure and chemical environment only cause small changes to fusion ratios.( An early explanation invoked the process at low energies, but its magnitude was too small to explain the altered ratios.() Explanations There is no accepted explanation for the alleged cold fusion experimental findings. Even amongst cold fusion supporters there is no consensus on the claims or what the underlying mechanism could be. Explanations given by cold fusion opponents There are many different objections to cold fusion:* The results of the experiments can not be reproduced.* The results are based on misinterpretation of the collected data.* Calorimetry errors* There are only small quantities of reaction products.* The generated heat is not the result of nuclear reactions, but chemical reactions.* No control experiments were performed The experiments can not be reproduced Many research groups tried to reproduce the Fleischmann-Pons experiment, without success. Reproducibility is one of the main principles of the scientific method, and its lack led most physicists to believe that the few positive reports could be attributed to experimental error.() Misinterpretation of the collected data Some research groups initially reported that they had replicated the Fleischmann and Pons results but later retracted their reports and offered an alternative explanation for their original positive results. A group at Tech found problems with their neutron detector, and A&M discovered bad wiring in their thermometers.() These retractions, combined with negative results from some famous laboratories,( led most scientists to conclude that no positive result should be attributed to cold fusion.(() Calorimetry errors The calculation of excess heat in electrochemical cells involves certain assumptions.( - (Input power is calculated by multiplying current and voltage, and output power is deduced from the measurement of the temperature of the cell and that of the bath))  Errors in these assumptions have been offered as non-nuclear explanations for excess heat.One assumption made by Fleischmann and Pons is that the efficiency of electrolysis is nearly 100%, meaning nearly all the electricity applied to the cell resulted in electrolysis of water, with negligible resistive heating and substantially all the electrolysis product leaving the cell unchanged.( This assumption gives the amount of energy expended converting liquid D2O into gaseous D2 and O2.() The efficiency of electrolysis will be less than one if hydrogen and oxygen recombine to a significant extent within the calorimeter.  Several researchers have described potential mechanisms by which this process could occur and thereby account for excess heat in electrolysis experiments.()()()Another assumption is that heat loss from the calorimeter maintains the same relationship with measured temperature as found when calibrating the calorimeter.( This assumption ceases to be accurate if the temperature distribution within the cell becomes significantly altered from the condition under which calibration measurements were made.( - (Almost all the heat is dissipated by radiation and follows the temperature fourth power law. The cell is calibrated . . .)) This can happen, for example, if fluid circulation within the cell becomes significantly altered.()() Recombination of hydrogen and oxygen within the calorimeter would also alter the heat distribution and invalidate the calibration.(()()John R. Huizenga who co-chaired the DOE 1989 panel stated simply a priori: Furthermore, if the claimed excess heat exceeds that possible by other conventional processes (chemical, mechanical, etc.), one must conclude that an error has been made in measuring the excess heat.() Small quantities of reaction products The detected reaction products are barely above background levels. The levels of 4He could have already been in the surrounding air instead of being created by any nuclear process. Detected neutrons and tritium were often barely above background level.( Chemical reaction not nuclear reaction Another objection offered the explanation that the heat was not the result of a nuclear reaction, but a chemical reaction, namely the recombination of hydrogen and oxygen.(See also calorimetry errors No control experiments were performed Control experiments are part of the scientific method to prove that the measured effects do not happen by chance, but are direct results of the experiment. One of the points of criticism of Fleischmann and Pons was the lack of control experiments.( Explanations given by cold fusion proponents  Reports of reproductions Some research groups reported successful reproductions. In July 1989 an Indian group of BARC (P. K. Iyengar and M. Srinivasan) and in October 1989 an team from USA (Bockris et al.) reported on creation of tritium. In December 1990 Professor Richard Oriani of Minnesota University reported excess heat()(In January 26, 1990, journal Nature rejected Orianis paper, citing the lack of nuclear ash and the general difficulty that others had in replication. It was later published in Fusion Technology. Oriani stopped after his calorimeter exploded and hurt a student, and he never resumed his research. and )But even groups that reported successes found that some of their cells were producing the effect where other cells that were built exactly the same and used the same materials were not producing the effect.(Around 1993 scientists found out that the effect had a very low probability of occurrence when the loading of deuterium into the palladium was below 90%. The experiments performed by the Caltech lab that debunked the Fleischmann and Ponss results only had had a maximum loading of 80%.( Proposed theories Researchers proposed alternative explanations for Fleischmann and Pons results even before various other labs reported results.()Skeptics call cold fusion explanations hoc and lacking rigor,()() and state that they are used simply to disregard the negative experimentssymptoms of pathological science.(, , ,  citing Langmuirs criteria of pathological science (5) Criticism are met by ad hoc excuses thought up in the spur of the moment. in page 203) Attempts at theoretical justification have either been explicitly rejected by mainstream physicists or lack independent review.(,  - (Extraordinary claims . . . demand extraordinary proof), , )The initial cold fusion explanation was motivated by the high excess heat reported and by the insistence of the initial reviewer, Stephen E. Jones, that nuclear fusion might rationalize the data. Hydrogen and its isotopes can be absorbed in certain solids, including hydride, at high densities. This creates a high partial pressure, reducing the average separation of hydrogen atoms. It was proposed that a higher density of hydrogen inside the palladium and a lower potential barrier could raise the possibility of fusion at lower temperatures than expected from a simple application of law, but theoretical calculations show that these effects are too small to increase the rate of fusion by any detectable amount.( Electron screening of the positive hydrogen nuclei by the negative electrons in the palladium lattice was also suggested to the 2004 DOE commission.() The panel found the theoretical explanations (Charge Element 2) to be the weakest part of cold fusion claims.(Cold fusion researchers do not agree on a single theoretical explanation or on a single experimental method that can produce replicable results ()and continue to offer and promote the claim that fusion is occurring as well as new proposals, but they have been unable to convince mainstream scientists.(PatentsAlthough the details have not surfaced, it appears that the University of Utah forced the 23 March 1989 Fleischmann and Pons announcement in order to establish priority over the discovery and its patents before the joint publication with Jones.( The Institute of Technology (MIT) announced on 12 April 1989 that it had applied for its own patents based on theoretical work of one of its researchers, L. Hagelstein, who had been sending papers to journals from the 5th to the 12th of April.( On 2 December 1993 the University of Utah licensed all its cold fusion patents to ENECO, a new company created to profit from cold fusion discoveries,( and on March 1998 it said that it would no longer defend its patents.()The Patent and Trademark Office (USPTO) now rejects patents claiming cold fusion.( Esther Kepplinger, the deputy commissioner of patents in 2004, said that this was done using the same argument as with motion machines: that they do not work.( Patent applications are required to show that the invention is useful, and this utility is dependent on the inventions ability to function.( In general USPTO rejections on the sole grounds of the inventions being inoperative are rare, since such rejections need to demonstrate proof of total incapacity,( and cases where those rejections are upheld in a Federal Court are even rarer: nevertheless, in 2000, a rejection of a cold fusion patent was appealed in a Federal Court and it was upheld, in part on the grounds that the inventor was unable to establish the utility of the invention.((U.S. patents might still be granted when they are given a different name in order to disassociate it from cold fusion,( although this strategy has had little success in the US: the very same claims that need to be patented can identify it with cold fusion, and most of these patents cannot avoid mentioning Fleischmann and Pons research due to legal constraints, thus alerting the patent reviewer that it is a cold-fusion-related patent.( David Voss said in 1999 that some patents that closely resemble cold fusion processes, and that use materials used in cold fusion, have been granted by the USPTO.( The inventor of three such patents had his applications initially rejected when they were reviewed by experts in nuclear science; but then he rewrote the patents to focus more in the electrochemical parts so they would be reviewed instead by experts in electrochemistry, who approved them.(() When asked about the resemblance to cold fusion, the patent holder said that it used nuclear processes involving new nuclear physics unrelated to cold fusion.( Melvin Miles was granted in 2004 a patent for a cold fusion device, and in 2007 he described his efforts to remove all instances of cold fusion from the patent description to avoid having it rejected outright.(At least one patent related to cold fusion has been granted by the Patent Office.(A patent only legally prevents others from using or benefiting from ones invention. However, the general public perceives a patent as a stamp of approval, and a holder of three cold fusion patents said the patents were very valuable and had helped in getting investments.(See also* fusion* Energy Catalyzer/Rossi Reactor* effect* of experimental errors and frauds in physics* of topics characterized as pseudoscience* fusion* transmutation* science* misconductNotesrefs(Swartz, 232 F.3d 862, 56 USPQ2d 1703, (Fed. Cir. 2000). decision. Sources:* Manual of Patent Examining Procedure, in reference to **)(E.g.:** * * *)()Referencesrefs(, )()(, in reference to US patents 5,616,219, 5,628,886 and 5,672,259)(, in reference to US patent 6,764,561)()( in reference to Canons )()( (page 2 in online version))( of Patent Examining Procedure)Bibliography* * * * * * * * * *  MIT Open Access Articles* * * * *** * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *  (manuscript)* * * from SMMIB 2005, 14th International Conference on Surface Modification of Materials by Ion Beams* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * ** * * * *  - (each author writing separately)* * * **** * * ** * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * ** * External links* *. Lists books, papers and conferences about cold fusion; has graphs of publication rate over time.*Two video press conferences on Cold Fusion Rebirth during the 237th National Meeting of the Chemical Society, March 23, 2009, Session 1, Session 2.* International Society for Condensed Matter Nuclear Science, organizes the ICCF conferences and publishes the Journal of Condensed Matter Nuclear Science. fredafzefusionFusionfrafroidefuzijadinginnucleare freddakernfusieja:fusjonfuzjaa frio fusionfziafuzijafi:Kylmfuusiofusionzh:
7472
Charles_Lyell
signature         Sir Charles Lyell, 1st Baronet, Kt FRS (14 November 1797  22 February 1875) was a British lawyer and the foremost geologist of his day. He is best known as the author of of Geology, which popularised Huttons concepts of uniformitarianism  the idea that the earth was shaped by slow-moving forces still in operation today. Lyell was a close and influential friend of Darwin.BiographyLyell was born in Scotland about 15 miles north of Dundee in Kinnordy, near Kirriemuir in Forfarshire (now in Angus). He was the eldest of ten children. Lyells father, also named Charles, was a lawyer and botanist of minor repute: it was he who first exposed his son to the study of nature. thumb|The main geographical divisions of ScotlandThe house/place of his birth is located in the north-west of the Lowlands in the valley of the Boundary Fault. Round the house, in the valley, is farmland, but within a short distance to the north-west, on the other side of the fault, are the Mountains in the Highlands.(maps, including terrain and satellite.) His familys second home was in a completely different geological and ecological area: he spent much of his childhood at Lodge in the Forest, England. Lyell entered College, Oxford in 1816, and attended Bucklands lectures. He graduated B.A. second class in classics, December 1819, and M.A. 1821.(() After graduation he took up law as a profession, entering Inn in 1820. He completed a circuit through rural England, where he could observe geological phenomena. In 1821 he attended Jamesons lectures in Edinburgh, and visited Mantell at Lewes, in Sussex. In 1823 he was elected joint secretary of the Society. As his eyesight began to deteriorate, he turned to geology as a full-time profession.( His first paper, On a recent formation of freshwater limestone in Forfarshire, was presented in 1822.( By 1827, he had abandoned law and embarked on a geological career that would result in fame and the general acceptance of uniformitarianism, a working out of the idea proposed by Hutton a few decades earlier.image:Lyell 1840.jpg|left|thumb|Charles Lyell at the Association meeting in Glasgow 1840. Painting by Alexander Craig.In 1832, Lyell married Horner of Bonn, daughter of Leonard Horner (17851864), also associated with the Society of London. The new couple spent their honeymoon in Switzerland and Italy on a geological tour of the area.()During the 1840s, Lyell traveled to the States and Canada, and wrote two popular travel-and-geology books: Travels in North America (1845) and A Second Visit to the United States (1849). After the Chicago Fire, Lyell was one of the first to donate books to help found the Public Library. In 1866, he was elected a foreign member of the Swedish Academy of Sciences.Lyells wife died in 1873, and two years later Lyell himself died as he was revising the twelfth edition of Principles. He is buried in Abbey.(() Lyell was knighted (Kt), and later made a baronet (Bt), which is an hereditary honour. He was awarded the Medal of the Society in 1858 and the Medal of the Society in 1866. The crater Lyell on the Moon and a crater on Mars were named in his honour. In addition, Lyell in western Tasmania, Australia, located in a profitable mining area, bears Lyells name. The ancient jawless fish Cephalaspis lyelli, which dwelt in the Scottish lakes, was named by Agassiz in honour of Lyell.Career and major writingsLyell had private means, and earned further income as an author. He came from a prosperous family, worked briefly as a lawyer in the 1820s, and held the post of Professor of Geology at College London in the 1830s. From 1830 onward his books provided both income and fame. Each of his three major books was a work continually in progress. All three went through multiple editions during his lifetime, although many of his friends (such as Darwin) thought the first edition of the Principles was the best written.(Darwin F. 1887. Life and letters of Charles Darwin, vol. II p. 90. London. Darwin F and Seward A.C. 1903. More letters of Charles Darwin, vol. II p. 232. London.) Lyell used each edition to incorporate additional material, rearrange existing material, and revisit old conclusions in light of new evidence.of Geology, Lyells first book, was also his most famous, most influential, and most important. First published in three volumes in 183033, it established Lyells credentials as an important geological theorist and propounded the doctrine of uniformitarianism.(	Uniformitarianism: Charles Lyell. Accessed 27 Nov. 2007.) It was a work of synthesis, backed by his own personal observations on his travels.The central argument in Principles was that the present is the key to the past - a concept of the Enlightenment which Hume had stated as all inferences from experience suppose ... that the future will resemble the past, and Hutton had described when he wrote in 1788 that from what has actually been, we have data for concluding with regard to that which is to happen thereafter.() Geological remains from the distant past can, and should, be explained by reference to geological processes now in operation and thus directly observable. Lyells interpretation of geologic change as the steady accumulation of minute changes over enormously long spans of time was a powerful influence on the young Darwin. Lyell asked FitzRoy, captain of HMS Beagle, to search for erratic boulders on the survey voyage of the Beagle, and just before it set out FitzRoy gave Darwin Volume 1 of the first edition of Lyells Principles. When the Beagle made its first stop ashore at St Jago, Darwin found rock formations which seen through Lyells eyes gave him a revolutionary insight into the geological history of the island, an insight he applied throughout his travels. While in America Darwin received Volume 2 which considered the ideas of Lamarck in some detail. Lyell rejected Lamarcks idea of organic evolution, proposing instead Centres of Creation to explain diversity and territory of species. However, as discussed below, many of his letters show he was fairly open to the idea of evolution.(Judd gives a number of examples: Judd J.W. 1910. The coming of evolution. Cambridge.) In geology Darwin was very much Lyells disciple, and brought back observations and his own original theorising, including ideas about the formation of atolls, which supported Lyells uniformitarianism. On the return of the Beagle (October 1836) Lyell invited Darwin to dinner and from then on they were close friends. Although Darwin discussed evolutionary ideas with him from 1842, Lyell continued to reject evolution in each of the first nine editions of the Principles. He encouraged Darwin to publish, and following the 1859 publication of the Origin of Species, Lyell finally offered a tepid endorsement of evolution in the tenth edition of Principles.of Geology began as the fourth volume of the third edition of Principles: Lyell intended the book to act as a suitable field guide for students of geology.(Bailey, Edward 1962. Charles Lyell. Nelson, London.) The systematic, factual description of geological formations of different ages contained in Principles grew so unwieldy, however, that Lyell split it off as the Elements in 1838. The book went through six editions, eventually growing to two volumes and ceasing to be the inexpensive, portable handbook that Lyell had originally envisioned. Late in his career, therefore, Lyell produced a condensed version titled Students Elements of Geology that fulfilled the original purpose.Evidences of the Antiquity of Man brought together Lyells views on three key themes from the geology of the Period of Earth history: glaciers, evolution, and the age of the human race. First published in 1863, it went through three editions that year, with a fourth and final edition appearing in 1873. The book was widely regarded as a disappointment because of Lyells equivocal treatment of evolution. Lyell, a devout Christian, had great difficulty reconciling his beliefs with selection.()Scientific contributionsLyells geological interests ranged from volcanoes and geological dynamics through stratigraphy, paleontology, and glaciology to topics that would now be classified as prehistoric archaeology and paleoanthropology. He is best known, however, for his role in popularising the doctrine of uniformitarianism.UniformitarianismFrom 1830 to 1833 his multi-volume of Geology was published. The works subtitle was An attempt to explain the former changes of the Earths surface by reference to causes now in operation, and this explains Lyells impact on science. He drew his explanations from field studies conducted directly before he went to work on the founding geology text.( He was, along with the earlier Playfair, the major advocate of Huttons idea of uniformitarianism, that the earth was shaped entirely by slow-moving forces still in operation today, acting over a very long period of time. This was in contrast to catastrophism, a geologic idea of abrupt changes, which had been adapted in England to support belief in Noahs flood. Lyell saw himself as the spiritual saviour of geology, freeing the science from the old dispensation of Moses.() The two terms, uniformitarianism and catastrophism, were both coined by Whewell;(Whewell, William 1837. History of the Inductive Sciences, vol. IV of the Historical and Philosophical Works of William Whewell. Chapter VIII The two antagonistic doctrines of geology. of 3rd edition of 1857, publ. Cass 1967.) in 1866 R. Grove suggested the simpler term continuity for Lyells view, but the old terms persisted. In various revised editions (12 in all, through 1872), Principles of Geology was the most influential geological work in the middle of the 19th century, and did much to put geology on a modern footing. For his efforts he was knighted in 1848, then made a baronet in 1864.Geological SurveysLyell noted the economic advantages that geological surveys could provide, citing their felicity in mineral-rich countries and provinces. Modern surveys, like the Geological Survey, map and exhibit the natural resources within the country. So, in endorsing surveys, as well as advancing the study of geology, Lyell helped to forward the business of modern extractive industries, such as the coal and oil industry.Volcanoes and geological dynamicsBefore the work of Lyell, phenomena such as earthquakes were understood by the destruction that they wrought. One of the contributions that Lyell made in Principles was to explain the cause of earthquakes.(Adams, Frank D. The Birth and Development of the Geological Sciences. Dover Publications, Inc., 1938.) Lyell, in contrast focused on recent earthquakes (150 yrs), evidenced by surface irregularities such as faults, fissures, stratigraphic displacements and depressions.(Lyells work on volcanoes focused largely on Vesuvius and Etna, both of which he had earlier studied. His conclusions supported gradual building of volcanoes, so-called backed up-building,( as opposed to the upheaval argument supported by other geologists.StratigraphyLyells most important specific work was in the field of stratigraphy. From May 1828, until February 1829, he traveled with Impey Murchison (17921871) to the south of France (Auvergne volcanic district) and to Italy.(((Stafford, Robert A. Scientist of Empire. Cambridge, UK. Cambridge University Press, 1989.) In these areas he concluded that the recent strata (rock layers) could be categorized according to the number and proportion of marine shells encased within. Based on this he proposed dividing the Tertiary period into three parts, which he named the Pliocene, Miocene, and Eocene.GlaciersIn Principles of Geology (first edition, vol. 3, Ch. 2, 1833)( Lyell proposed that icebergs could be the means of transport for erratics. During periods of global warming, ice breaks off the poles and floats across submerged continents, carrying debris with it, he conjectured. When the iceberg melts, it rains down sediments upon the land. Because this theory could account for the presence of diluvium, the word drift became the preferred term for the loose, unsorted material, today called till. Furthermore, Lyell believed that the accumulation of fine angular particles covering much of the world (today called loess) was a deposit settled from mountain flood water. Today some of Lyells mechanisms for geologic processes have been disproven, though many have stood the test of time.( His observational methods and general analytical framework remain in use today as foundational principles in geology.(EvolutionLyell first received a copy of one of Lamarcks books from Mantell in 1827, when he was on circuit. He thanked Mantell in a letter which includes this enthusiastic passage::I devoured Lamark... his theories delighted me... I am glad that he has been courageous enough and logical enough to admit that his argument, if pushed as far as it must go, if worth anything, would prove that men may have come from the Ourang-Outang. But after all, what changes species may really undergo!... That the Earth is quite as old as he supposes, has long been my creed... (Lyell K. 1881. The life and letters of Sir Charles Lyell. 2 vols, London. vol. 1 p. 168)In the second volume of the first edition of Principles Lyell explicitly rejected the mechanism of Lamark on the of species, and was doubtful whether species were mutable.(Lyell C. 1830-33. The principles of geology. Murray, London. vol. 2, Chapter 2.) However, privately, in letters, he was more open to the possibility of evolution::If I had stated... the possibility of the introduction or origination of fresh species being a natural, in contradistinction to a miraculous process, I should have raised a host of prejudices against me, which are unfortunately opposed at every step to any philosopher who attempts to address the public on these mysterious subjects.(Lyell to Whewell, March 7, 1837. In Lyell K. 1881. The life and letters of Sir Charles Lyell. 2 vols, London. vol. 2 p. 5)This letter makes it clear that his equivocation on evolution was, at least at first, a deliberate tactic. As a result of his letters and, no doubt, personal conversations, Huxley and Haeckel were convinced that, at the time he wrote Principles, he believed new species had arisen by natural methods. Both Whewell and Sedgwick wrote worried letters to him about this.(Judd J.W. 1910. The coming of evolution. Cambridge. Chapter 8, pp. 8386.)Later, Darwin became a close personal friend, and Lyell was one of the first scientists to support the Origin of Species, though he did not subscribe to all its contents. Lyell was also a friend of Darwins closest colleagues, Hooker and Huxley, but unlike them he struggled to square his religious beliefs with evolution. This inner struggle has been much commented on. He had particular difficulty in believing in selection as the main motive force in evolution.(Bowler P.J. 2003. Evolution: the history of an idea. 3rd ed, University of California Press. ISBN 0520236939 pp. 129134, 215)(Mayr E. 1982. The growth of biological thought. Harvard University Press. ISBN 0674364465 (esp pp. 375381, 404408).)()Lyell and Hooker were instrumental in arranging the peaceful co-publication of the theory of natural selection by Darwin and Russel Wallace in 1858: each had arrived at the theory independently. Lyells data on stratigraphy were important because Darwin thought that populations of an organism changed slowly, requiring geologic time. Although Lyell did not publicly accept evolution (descent with modification) at the time of writing the Principles,(Lyell C. 1830-33. The principles of geology. Murray, London. vol. 2, pp. 2021.) after the Darwin-Wallace papers and the Origin Lyell wrote in his notebook: :May 3, 1860: Mr. Darwin has written a work which will constitute an era in geology & natural history to show that... the descendants of common parents may become in the course of ages so unlike each other as to be entitled to rank as a distinct species, from each other or from some of their progenitors.(Wilson, Leonard G. (ed) 1970. Sir Charles Lyells scientific journals on the species question. Yale University Press. p. 407)Lyells acceptance of natural selection, Darwins proposed mechanism for evolution, was equivocal, and came in the tenth edition of Principles.((Desmond A. 1982. Archetypes and Ancestors: palaeontology in Victorian London Blond & Briggs, London. page 179: Even Charles Lyell agreed... that natural selection was a force quite subordinate to that variety-making or creative power to which all the wonders of the organic world must be referred. ) Antiquity of Man (published in early February 1863, just before Huxleys Mans place in nature) drew these comments from Darwin to Huxley::I am fearfully disappointed at Lyells excessive caution and The book is a mere digest .(Burkhardt F. and Smith S. 1982present. The correspondence of Charles Darwin. Cambridge, vol. 11, pp. 173, 181.)Quite strong remarks: no doubt Darwin resented Lyells repeated suggestion that he owed a lot to Lamarck, whom he (Darwin) had always specifically rejected. Darwins daughter Henrietta (Etty) wrote to her father: Is it fair that Lyell always calls your theory a modification of Lamarcks? (Burkhardt F. and Smith S. 1982present. The correspondence of Charles Darwin. Cambridge, vol. 11, p. 223.)(Cape, ISBN 1-84413-314-1 Browne, E. Janet 2002. Charles Darwin: the power of place. Volume 2 of a biography. Cape, London. page 219)In other respects Antiquity was a success. It sold well, and it shattered the tacit agreement that mankind should be the sole preserve of theologians and historians.(Browne, E. Janet 2002. Charles Darwin: the power of place. Volume 2 of a biography. Cape, London. p. 218) But when Lyell wrote that it remained a profound mystery how the huge gulf between man and beast could be bridged, Darwin wrote Oh! in the margin of his copy.(LegacyPlaces named after Lyell:* Lyell (California)* Lyell (Canada)* Land (Greenland)* Glacier* Glacier, South GeorgiaBibliographyPrinciples of Geology On-line first edition * * * Details of publication*Principles of Geology 1st edition, 1st vol. Jan. 1830 (John Murray, London).*Principles of Geology 1st edition, 2nd vol. Jan. 1832*Principles of Geology 1st edition, 3rd vol. May 1833*Principles of Geology 2nd edition, 1st vol. 1832*Principles of Geology 2nd edition, 2nd vol. Jan. 1833*Principles of Geology 3rd edition, 4 vols. May 1834*Principles of Geology 4th edition, 4 vols. June 1835*Principles of Geology 5th edition, 4 vols. March 1837*Principles of Geology 6th edition, 3 vols. June 1840*Principles of Geology 7th edition, 1 vol. Feb. 1847*Principles of Geology 8th edition, 1 vol. May 1850*Principles of Geology 9th edition, 1 vol. June 1853*Principles of Geology 10th edition, 186668*Principles of Geology 11th edition, 2 vols. 1872*Principles of Geology 12th edition, 2 vols. 1875 (published posthumously)Elements of Geology*Elements of Geology 1 vol. 1st edition, July 1838 (John Murray, London)*Elements of Geology 2 vols. 2nd edition, July 1841*Elements of Geology (Manual of Elementary Geology) 1 vol. 3rd edition, Jan. 1851*Elements of Geology (Manual of Elementary Geology) 1 vol. 4th edition, Jan. 1852*Elements of Geology 1 vol. 5th edition, 1862*Elements of Geology 6th edition, 1865*Elements of Geology, The Students Series, 1871Travels in North America* * * * Antiquity of Man*Geological Evidences of the Antiquity of Man 1 vol. 1st edition, Feb. 1863 (John Murray, London)*Geological Evidences of the Antiquity of Man 1 vol. 2nd edition, April 1863*Geological Evidences of the Antiquity of Man 1 vol. 3rd edition, Nov. 1863*Geological Evidences of the Antiquity of Man 1 vol. 4th edition, May 1873Life, Letters, and Journals** NotesReferences**Image source*Portraits of Honorary Members of the Museum (Portfolio of 60 lithographs by T.H. Maguire) (George Ransome, Ipswich 1846-1852)External links*Charles Lyell Notable Names Database.*Principles of Geology 1st edition at ESP: Electronic Scholarly Publishing.  Retrieved on August 8, 2007*LyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyell Lyellja:LyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellLyellzh:
7485
Corporation
A corporation is a legal entity that is created under the laws of a state designed to establish the entity as a legal entity having its own privileges and liabilities distinct from those of its members.(Definition of a corporation from Reference.com) There are many different forms of corporations, most of which are used to conduct business. Early corporations were established by charter (i.e. by an ad hoc act passed by a parliament or legislature). Most jurisdictions now allow the creation of new corporations through registration.An important (but not universal) contemporary feature of a corporation is liability. If a corporation fails, shareholders normally only stand to lose their investment and employees will lose their jobs, but neither will be further liable for debts that remain owing to the corporations creditors.Despite not being natural persons, corporations are recognized by the law to have rights and responsibilities like natural persons (people). Corporations can exercise rights against real individuals and the state,(e.g. African Constitution Art.8, especially Art.(4)) and they can themselves be responsible for human rights violations.(Phillip I. Blumberg, The Multinational Challenge to Corporation Law: The Search for a New Corporate Personality, (1993) discusses the controversial nature of additional rights being granted to corporations.) Corporations are conceptually immortal but they can die when they are dissolved either by statutory operation, order of court, or voluntary action on the part of shareholders. Insolvency may result in a form of corporate death, when creditors force the liquidation and dissolution of the corporation under court order,(See, for example, the Business Corporations Act (B.C.) 2002 CHAPTER 57, Part 10) but it most often results in a restructuring of corporate holdings. Corporations can even be convicted of criminal offenses, such as fraud and manslaughter.(e.g. Manslaughter and Corporate Homicide Act 2007) Although corporate law varies in different jurisdictions, there are four core characteristics of the business corporation:(RC Clark, Corporate Law (Aspen 1986) 2; See also, Hansmann et al., The Anatomy of Corporate Law (2004) Ch.1, p.2; C. A. Cooke, Corporation, Trust and Company: A Legal History, (1950).)* personality* liability* Transferable shares* Centralized management under a board structureHistoryFile:Stora Kopparberg 1288.jpg|thumb|1/8 share of the Kopparberg mine, dated June 16, 1288.The word corporation derives from corpus, the Latin word for body, or a body of people. Entities which carried on business and were the subjects of legal rights were found in ancient Rome, and the Empire in ancient India.(Vikramaditya S. Khanna (2005). The Economic History of the Corporate Form in Ancient India. of Michigan.) In medieval Europe, churches became incorporated, as did local governments, such as the Pope and the of London Corporation. The point was that the incorporation would survive longer than the lives of any particular member, existing in perpetuity. The alleged oldest commercial corporation in the world, the Kopparberg mining community in Falun, Sweden, obtained a charter from King Magnus Eriksson in 1347. Many European nations chartered corporations to lead colonial ventures, such as the East India Company or the Bay Company, and these corporations came to play a large part in the history of colonialism.During the time of colonial expansion in the 17th century, the true progenitors of the modern corporation emerged as the chartered company. Acting under a charter sanctioned by the Dutch government, the East India Company (VOC) defeated Portuguese forces and established itself in the Islands in order to profit from the European demand for spices. Investors in the VOC were issued paper certificates as proof of share ownership, and were able to trade their shares on the original Amsterdam stock exchange. Shareholders are also explicitly granted liability in the companys royal charter.(Om Prakash, European Commercial Enterprise in Pre-Colonial India (Cambridge University Press, Cambridge 1998).) In the late 18th century, Stewart Kyd, the author of the first treatise on law in English, defined a corporation as,MercantilismFile:Vereinigte Ostindische Compagnie bond.jpg|thumb|A bond issued by the East India Company, dating from 1623, for the amount of 2,400 florinsLabeled by both contemporaries and historians as the grandest society of merchants in the universe, the East India Company would come to symbolize the dazzlingly rich potential of the corporation, as well as new methods of business that could be both brutal and exploitive.(John Keay, The Honorable Company: A History of the English East India Company (MacMillan, New York 1991).) On 31 December 1600, the monarchy granted the company a 15-year monopoly on trade to and from the Indies and Africa. By 1611, shareholders in the East India Company were earning an almost 150% return on their investment. Subsequent stock offerings demonstrated just how lucrative the Company had become. Its first stock offering in 1613-1616 raised 418,000, and its first offering in 1617-1622 raised 1.6 million.(Ibid. at 113.)In the States, government chartering began to fall out of vogue in the mid-19th century. Corporate law at the time was focused on protection of the public interest, and not on the interests of corporate shareholders. Corporate charters were closely regulated by the states. Forming a corporation usually required an act of legislature. Investors generally had to be given an equal say in corporate governance, and corporations were required to comply with the purposes expressed in their charters. Many private firms in the 19th century avoided the corporate model for these reasons (Carnegie formed his steel operation as a partnership, and D. Rockefeller set up Oil as a trust). Eventually, state governments began to realize the greater corporate registration revenues available by providing more permissive corporate laws. Jersey was the first state to adopt an enabling corporate law, with the goal of attracting more business to the state.(The Law of Business Organizations) Delaware followed, and soon became known as the most corporation-friendly state in the country after New Jersey raised taxes on the corporations, driving them out. New Jersey reduced these taxes after this mistake was realized, but by then it was too late; even today, most major public corporations in the United States are set up under Delaware law.By the beginning of the 19th century, government policy on both sides of the Atlantic began to change, reflecting the growing popularity of the proposition that corporations were riding the economic wave of the future. In 1819, the U.S. Supreme Court granted corporations a plethora of rights they had not previously recognized or enjoyed.(of Dartmouth College v. Woodward, 17 U.S. 518 (1819).) Corporate charters were deemed inviolable, and not subject to arbitrary amendment or abolition by state governments.(Id. at 25.) The Corporation as a whole was labeled an artificial person, possessing both individuality and immortality.(Id. at 45.)At around the same time, British legislation was similarly freeing the corporation from historical restrictions. In 1844 the Parliament passed the Joint Stock Companies Act, which allowed companies to incorporate without a royal charter or an Act of Parliament.(Sean M. OConnor, Be Careful What You Wish For: How Accountants and Congress Created the Problem of Auditor Independence, 45 B.C.L. Rev. 741, 749 (2004).) Ten years later, liability, the key provision of modern corporate law, passed into English law: in response to increasing pressure from newly emerging capital interests, Parliament passed the Limited Liability Act of 1855, which established the principle that any corporation could enjoy limited legal liability on both contract and tort claims simply by registering as a limited company with the appropriate government agency.(Limited Liability Act, 18 & 19 Vict., ch. 133 (1855)(Eng.), cited in Paul G. Mahoney, Contract or Concession? An Essay on the History of Corporate Law, 34 Ga. L. Rev. 873, 892 (2000).)This prompted the English periodical Economist to write in 1855 that never, perhaps, was a change so vehemently and generally demanded, of which the importance was so much overrated.(Graeme G. Acheson & John D. Turner, The Impact of Limited Liability on Ownership and Control: Irish Banking, 1877-1914, School of Management and Economics, Queens University of Belfast, available at http://www.ehs.org/uk/ehs/conference2004/assets/AchesonTurnerPaper.pdf.) The glaring inaccuracy of the second part of this judgment was recognized by the same magazine more than 75 years later, when it claimed that, the economic historian of the future . . . may be inclined to assign to the nameless inventor of the principle of limited liability, as applied to trading corporations, a place of honour with Watt and Stephenson, and other pioneers of the Revolution.(Economist, December 18, 1926, at 1053, as quoted in Mahoney, supra, at 875.)Modern corporationsBy the end of the 19th century the Act, New Jersey allowing companies, and mergers resulted in larger corporations with dispersed shareholders. (See Modern Corporation and Private Property (For a comparison of the differences between the Classic Corporation (before 1860) and the Modern Corporation (after 1900), see Ted Nace, Gangs of America: The Rise of Corporate Power and the Disabling of Democracy 71 (Berrett-Koehler Publishers, Inc., San Francisco 2003).) The well-known Clara County v. Southern Pacific Railroad decision began to influence policymaking and the modern corporate era had begun.The 20th century saw a proliferation of enabling law across the world, which helped to drive economic booms in many countries before and after World War I. Starting in the 1980s, many countries with large state-owned corporations moved toward privatization, the selling of publicly owned services and enterprises to corporations. Deregulation (reducing the regulation of corporate activity) often accompanied privatization as part of a laissez-faire policy. Another major postwar shift was toward the development of conglomerates, in which large corporations purchased smaller corporations to expand their industrial base. Japanese firms developed a horizontal conglomeration model, the keiretsu, which was later duplicated in other countries as well.(Apple)Corporate lawThe existence of a corporation requires a special legal framework and body of law that specifically grants the corporation legal personality, and typically views a corporation as a fictional person, a legal person, or a moral person (as opposed to a natural person). Corporate statutes typically empower corporations to own property, sign binding contracts, and pay taxes in a capacity separate from that of its shareholders (who are sometimes referred to as members). According to Chancellor Haldane, The legal personality has two economic implications. First it grants creditors (as opposed to shareholders or employees) priority over the corporate assets upon liquidation. Second, corporate assets cannot be withdrawn by its shareholders, nor can the assets of the firm be taken by personal creditors of its shareholders. The second feature requires special legislation and a special legal framework, as it cannot be reproduced via standard contract law.(Hansmann et al., The Anatomy of Corporate Law, pg 7.) The regulations most favorable to incorporation include:Ownership and controlPersons and other legal entities composed of persons (such as trusts and other corporations) can have the right to vote or receive dividends once declared by the of directors. In the case of for-profit corporations, these voters hold shares of stock and are thus called shareholders or stockholders. When no stockholders exist, a corporation may exist as a corporation (in the United Kingdom, a company limited by guarantee) and instead of having stockholders, the corporation has members who have the right to vote on its operations. Voting members are not the only members of a Corporation. The members of a non-stock corporation are identified in the Articles of Incorporation (UK equivalent: Articles of Association) and the titles of the member classes may include Trustee, Active, Associate, and/or Honorary. However, each of these listed in the Articles of Incorporation are members of the Corporation. The Articles of Incorporation may define the Corporation by another name, such as The ABC Club, Inc. and, in which case, the Corporation and The ABC Club, Inc. or just The Club are considered synonymous and interchangeable as they may appear elsewhere in the Articles of Incorporation or the By-Laws. If the non-stock corporation is not operated for profit, it is called a corporation. In either category, the corporation comprises a collective of individuals with a distinct legal status and with special privileges not provided to ordinary unincorporated businesses, to associations, or to groups of individuals.There are two broad classes of corporate governance forms in the world. In most of the world, control of the corporation is determined by a of directors which is elected by the shareholders. In some jurisdictions, such as Germany, the control of the corporation is divided into two tiers with a board which elects a board. Germany is also unique in having a system known as co-determination in which half of the supervisory board consists of representatives of the employees. The CEO, president, treasurer, and other titled officers are usually chosen by the board to manage the affairs of the corporation.In addition to the limited influence of shareholders, corporations can be controlled (in part) by creditors such as banks. In return for lending money to the corporation, creditors can demand a controlling interest analogous to that of a member, including one or more seats on the board of directors. In some jurisdictions, such as Germany and Japan, it is standard for banks to own shares in corporations whereas in other jurisdictions such as the United States, under the Act of 1933, and the United Kingdom, under the of England, banks are prohibited from owning shares in external corporations. However, since 1999 in the U. S., commercial banks have been allowed to enter into investment banking through separate subsidiaries thanks to the Financial Services Modernization Act or Act. Since 1997, banks in the U. K. are supervised by the Financial Services Authority; its rules are non-restrictive allowing both foreign and domestic capital to operate all financial institutions, including insurance, commercial and financial banking.()Upon the Boards decision to dissolve a for-profit corporation, shareholders receive the leftovers, following creditors and others with interests in the corporation. However shareholders receive the benefit of limited liability, so they are liable only for the amount they contributed.FormationHistorically, corporations were created by a charter granted by government. Today, corporations are usually registered with the state, province, or national government and regulated by the laws enacted by that government. Registration is the main prerequisite to the corporations assumption of limited liability. The law sometimes requires the corporation to designate its principal address, as well as a agent (a person or company designated to receive legal service of process). It may also be required to designate an agent or other legal representative of the corporation.Generally, a corporation files of incorporation with the government, laying out the general nature of the corporation, the amount of stock it is authorized to issue, and the names and addresses of directors. Once the articles are approved, the corporations directors meet to create bylaws that govern the internal functions of the corporation, such as meeting procedures and officer positions.The law of the jurisdiction in which a corporation operates will regulate most of its internal activities, as well as its finances. If a corporation operates outside its home state, it is often required to register with other governments as a corporation, and is almost always subject to laws of its host state pertaining to employment, crimes, contracts, actions, and the like.NamingCorporations generally have a distinct name. Historically, some corporations were named after their membership: for instance, The President and Fellows of Harvard College. Nowadays, corporations in most jurisdictions have a distinct name that does not need to make reference to their membership. In Canada, this possibility is taken to its logical extreme: many smaller Canadian corporations have no names at all, merely numbers based on a registration number (for example,, 12345678 Ontario Limited), which is assigned by the provincial or territorial government where the corporation incorporates.In most countries, corporate names include a term or an abbreviation that denotes the corporate status of the entity (for example, Incorporated or Inc. in the United States) or the limited liability of its members (for example, Limited or Ltd.). These terms vary by jurisdiction and language. In some jurisdictions they are mandatory, and in others they are not.(The state of California is an example of a jurisdiction that does not require corporations to indicate corporate status in their names, except for close corporations.  The drafters of the 1977 revision of the California General Corporation Law considered the possibility of forcing all California corporations to have a name indicating corporate status, but decided against it because of the huge number of corporations that would have had to change their names, and the lack of any evidence that anyone had been harmed in California by entities whose corporate status was not immediately apparent from their names.  However, the 1977 drafters were able to impose the current disclosure requirement for close corporations.  See Harold Marsh, Jr., R. Roy Finkle, Larry W. Sonsini, and Ann Yvonne Walker, Marshs California Corporation Law, 4th ed., vol. 1 (New York: Aspen Publishers, 2004), 5-15  5-16.) Their use puts everybody on notice that they are dealing with an entity whose liability is limited, and does not reach back to the persons who own the entity: one can only collect from whatever assets the entity still controls when one obtains a judgment against it. Some jurisdictions do not allow the use of the word company alone to denote corporate status, since the word company may refer to a partnership or some other form of collective ownership (in the United States it can be used by a proprietorship but this is not generally the case elsewhere).Financial disclosureIn many jurisdictions, corporations whose shareholders benefit from limited liability are required to publish annual statements and other data, so that creditors who do business with the corporation are able to assess the creditworthiness of the corporation and cannot enforce claims against shareholders.(Hicks, A. and Goo, S.H. (2008) Cases and Materials on Company Law Oxford University Press Chapter 4) Shareholders therefore sacrifice some loss of privacy in return for limited liability. This requirement generally applies in Europe, but not in Anglo-American jurisdictions, except for publicly traded corporations, where financial disclosure is required for investor protection.Unresolved issuesThe nature of the corporation continues to evolve in response to new situations as existing corporations promote new ideas and structures, the courts respond, and governments issue new regulations. A question of long standing is that of diffused responsibility. For example, if a corporation is found liable for a death, how should culpability and punishment for it be allocated among shareholders, directors, management and staff, and the corporation itself? See liability, and specifically, manslaughter.The law differs among jurisdictions, and is in a state of flux. Some argue that shareholders should be ultimately responsible in such circumstances, forcing them to consider issues other than profit when investing, but a corporation may have millions of small shareholders who know nothing about its business activities. Moreover, traders &mdash; especially funds &mdash; may turn over shares in corporations many times a day.(See, for example, the Ontarios Environmental Protection Act.) The issue of corporate repeat offenders (see H. Glasbeek, Wealth by Stealth: Corporate Crime, Corporate Law, and the Perversion of Democracy, ISBN 978-1896357416, Between the Lines Press: Toronto 2002) raises the question of the so-called death penalty for corporations.(CorpWatch : The Death Penalty for Corporations Comes of Age)Types:For a list of types of corporation and other business types by country, see of business entity.Most corporations are registered with the local jurisdiction as either a stock corporation or a non-stock corporation. Stock corporations sell stock to generate capital. A stock corporation is generally a for-profit corporation. A corporation does not have stockholders, but may have members who have voting rights in the corporation.Some jurisdictions (D.C., for example) separate corporations into for-profit and non-profit, as opposed to dividing into stock and non-stock.Several states also allow a variation of the corporation for use by professionals (i.e., those individuals typically considered as professionals who require a license from the state to conduct business). In some states, such as Georgia, these corporations are known as professional corporations.For-profit and non-profitIn modern economic systems, conventions of governance commonly appear in a wide variety of business and non-profit activities. Though the laws governing these creatures of statute often differ, the courts often interpret provisions of the law that apply to profit-making enterprises in the same manner (or in a similar manner) when applying principles to non-profit organizations &mdash; as the underlying structures of these two types of entity often resemble each other.Closely held corporations and publicly traded corporationsThe institution most often referenced by the word corporation is a publicly traded corporation, the shares of which are traded on a public stock exchange (for example, the York Stock Exchange or Nasdaq in the United States) where shares of stock of corporations are bought and sold by and to the general public. Most of the largest businesses in the world are publicly traded corporations. However, the majority of corporations are said to be closely held, privately held or close corporations, meaning that no ready market exists for the trading of shares. Many such corporations are owned and managed by a small group of businesspeople or companies, although the size of such a corporation can be as vast as the largest public corporations.Closely held corporations do have some advantages over publicly traded corporations. A small, closely held company can often make company-changing decisions much more rapidly than a publicly traded company. A publicly traded company is also at the mercy of the market, having capital flow in and out based not only on what the company is doing but the market and even what the competitors are doing. Publicly traded companies also have advantages over their closely held counterparts. Publicly traded companies often have more capital and can delegate debt throughout all shareholders. This means that people invested in a publicly traded company will each take a much smaller hit to their own capital as opposed to those involved with a closely held corporation. Publicly traded companies though suffer from this exact advantage. A closely held corporation can often voluntarily take a hit to profit with little to no repercussions (as long as it is not a sustained loss). A publicly traded company though often comes under extreme scrutiny if profit and growth are not evident to stock holders, thus stock holders may sell, further damaging the company. Often this blow is enough to make a small public company fail.Often communities benefit from a closely held company more so than from a public company. A closely held company is far more likely to stay in a single place that has treated them well, even if going through hard times. The shareholders can incur some of the damage the company may receive from a bad year or slow period in the company profits. Closely held companies often have a better relationship with workers. In larger, publicly traded companies, often when a year has gone badly the first area to feel the effects are the work force with lay offs or worker hours, wages or benefits being cut. Again, in a closely held business the shareholders can incur this profit damage rather than passing it to the workers. The affairs of publicly traded and held corporations are similar in many respects. The main difference in most countries is that publicly traded corporations have the burden of complying with additional securities laws, which (especially in the U.S.) may require additional periodic disclosure (with more stringent requirements), stricter corporate governance standards, and additional procedural obligations in connection with major corporate transactions (for example, mergers) or events (for example, elections of directors).A closely held corporation may be a subsidiary of another corporation (its company), which may itself be either a closely held or a public corporation. In some jurisdictions, the subsidiary of a listed public corporation is also defined as a public corporation (for example,, Australia).Mutual benefit corporationsA mutual benefit nonprofit corporation is a corporation formed in the United States solely for the benefit of its members. An example of a mutual benefit nonprofit corporation is a golf club. Individuals pay to join the club, memberships may be bought and sold, and any property owned by the club is distributed to its members if the club dissolves. The club can decide, in its corporate bylaws, how many members to have, and who can be a member. Generally, while it is a nonprofit corporation, a mutual benefit corporation is not a charity. Because it is not a charity, a mutual benefit nonprofit corporation cannot obtain 501(c)(3) status. If there is a dispute as to how a mutual benefit nonprofit corporation is being operated, it is up to the members to resolve the dispute since the corporation exists to solely serve the needs of its membership and not the general public.(Official website of the Secretary of State, for the (United States) state of Vermont)Corporations globallyFollowing on the success of the corporate model at a national level, many corporations have become transnational or corporations: growing beyond national boundaries to attain sometimes remarkable positions of power and influence in the process of globalizing.The typical transnational or multinational may fit into a web of overlapping shareholders and directorships, with multiple branches and lines in different regions, many such sub-groupings comprising corporations in their own right. Growth by expansion may favor national or regional branches; growth by acquisition or merger can result in a plethora of groupings scattered around and/or spanning the globe, with structures and names which do not always make clear the structures of shareholder ownership and interaction.In the spread of corporations across multiple continents, the importance of corporate culture has grown as a unifying factor and a counterweight to local national sensibilities and cultural awareness.AustraliaIn Australia corporations are registered and regulated by the Commonwealth Government through the Securities and Investments Commission. Corporations law has been largely codified in the Act 2001.BrazilIn Brazil there are many different types of legal entities (sociedades), but the two most common ones commercially speaking are: (i) sociedade limitada, identified by Ltda. or Limitada after the companys name, equivalent to the British limited liability company, and (ii) sociedade annima or companhia, identified by S.A. or Companhia in the companys name, equivalent to the British public limited company. The Ltda. is mainly governed by the new Civil Code, enacted in 2002, and the S.A. by the Law 6.404 dated December 15, 1976, as amended.CanadaIn Canada both the federal government and the provinces have corporate statutes, and thus a corporation may have a provincial or a federal charter. Many older corporations in Canada stem from Acts of Parliament passed before the introduction of general corporation law. The oldest corporation in Canada is the Bay Company; though its business has always been based in Canada, its Charter was issued in England by King Charles II in 1670, and became a Canadian charter by amendment in 1970 when it moved its corporate headquarters from London to Canada. Federally recognized corporations are regulated by the Business Corporations Act.German-speaking countriesGermany, Austria, Switzerland and Liechtenstein recognize two forms of corporation: the Aktiengesellschaft (AG), analogous to public corporations in the English-speaking world, and the mit beschrnkter Haftung (GmbH), similar to (and an inspiration for) the modern liability company.ItalyThe Republic recognizes three types of company with limited liability: S.r.l, or Societ a responsabilit limitata (a private company), S.p.A or Societ per Azioni (a joint-stock company, similar to a Limited Company in the United Kingdom), and S.a.p.a (Societ in Accomandita per Azioni). The latter is a hybrid form that involves two categories of shareholders, some with and some without limited liability, and is rarely used in practice.JapanIn Japan, both the state and local public entities under the Autonomy Law (prefectures and municipalities) are considered to be . Non-profit corporations may be established under the Code.The term  is used to refer to business corporations. The predominant form is the kaisha (), used by public corporations as well as smaller enterprises. kaisha (), a form for smaller enterprises, are becoming increasingly common. Between 2002 and 2008, the  existed to bridge the gap between for-profit companies and non-governmental and non-profit organizations.SpainIn Spain there are two types of companies: with limited liability called S.L, or Sociedad Limitada (a private company) and S.A. or Sociedad Annima (similar to a Limited Company).United KingdomIn the Kingdom, corporation most commonly refers to a corporate formed by Charter or by statute, of which few now remain. The BBC is the oldest and best known corporation within the UK that is still in existence. Others, such as the Steel Corporation, were privatized in the 1980s. In the private sector, corporations are referred to as companies, and are regulated by the Act 2006 (or the Ireland equivalent). The most common type of company is the private company (Limited or Ltd.). Private limited companies can either be limited by shares or by guarantee. Other corporate forms include the limited company (PLC) and the private company, and companies limited by guarantee.A special type of corporation is a sole, which is an office held by an individual natural person (the incumbent), but which has a continuing legal entity separate from that person: an example is a of England bishopricUnited StatesSeveral types of conventional corporations exist in the States. Generically, any business entity that is recognized as distinct from the people who own it (i.e., is not a sole proprietorship or a partnership) is a corporation. This generic label includes entities that are known by such legal labels as association, organization and limited liability company, as well as corporations proper. Only a company that has been formally incorporated according to the laws of a particular state is called corporation. A corporation was defined in the Dartmouth College case of 1819, in which Chief Justice Marshall of the United States Supreme Court stated that  A corporation is an artificial being, invisible, intangible, and existing only in contemplation of the law. A corporation is a legal entity, distinct and separate from the individuals who create and operate it. As legal entity the corporation can acquire, own, and dispose of property in its own name like buildings, land and equipment. It can also incur liabilities and enter into contracts like franchising and leasing. American corporations can be either profit-making companies or non-profit entities. Tax-exempt non-profit corporations are often called 501(c)3 corporation, after the section of the Revenue Code that addresses the tax exemption for many of them.The federal government can only create corporate entities pursuant to relevant powers in the U.S. Constitution. For example, Congress has constitutional power to provide postal services, so it has power to operate the States Postal Service.  Although the federal government could theoretically preempt all state corporate law under the courts current expansive interpretation of the Clause, it has chosen not to do so.  As a result, much of American corporate law continues to be a matter of state law under the Amendment to the United States Constitution.  Thus, virtually all corporations in the U.S. are incorporated under the laws of a particular state.All states have some kind of general corporation law (California, Delaware, Kansas, Nevada and Ohio actually use that exact name) which authorizes the formation of private corporations without having to obtain a charter for each one from the state legislature (as was formerly the case in the 19th century).   Many states have separate, self-contained laws authorizing the formation and operation of certain specific types of corporations that are wholly independent of the state general corporation law.  For example, in California, nonprofit corporations are incorporated under the Nonprofit Corporation Law, and in Illinois, insurers are incorporated under the Illinois Insurance Code.Corporations are created by filing the requisite documents with a particular state government. The process is called incorporation, referring to the abstract concept of clothing the entity with a veil of artificial personhood (embodying, or corporating it, corpus being the Latin word for body). Only certain corporations, including banks, are chartered. Others simply file their articles of incorporation with the state government as part of a registration process.Once incorporated, a corporation has artificial personhood everywhere it may operate, until such time as the corporation may be dissolved. A corporation that operates in one state while being incorporated in another is a foreign corporation. This label also applies to corporations incorporated outside of the United States. Foreign corporations must usually register with the secretary of states office in each state to lawfully conduct business in that state.A corporation is legally a citizen of the state (or other jurisdiction) in which it is incorporated (except when circumstances direct the corporation be classified as a citizen of the state in which it has its head office, or the state in which it does the majority of its business). Corporate business law differs dramatically from state to state. Many prospective corporations choose to incorporate in a state whose laws are most favorable to its business interests. Many large corporations are incorporated in Delaware, for example, without being physically located there because that state has very favorable corporate tax and disclosure laws.Companies set up for privacy or asset protection often incorporate in Nevada, which does not require disclosure of share ownership. Many states, particularly smaller ones, have modeled their corporate statutes after the Business Corporation Act, one of many model sets of law prepared and published by the Bar Association.As persons, corporations have certain rights that attach to natural persons. The vast majority of them attach to corporations under state law, especially the law of the state in which the company is incorporated  since the corporations very existence is predicated on the laws of that state. A few rights also attach by federal constitutional and statutory law, but they are few and far between compared to the rights of natural persons. For example, a corporation has the personal right to bring a lawsuit (as well as the capacity to be sued) and, like a natural person, a corporation can be libeled. But a corporation has no constitutional right to freely exercise its religion because religious exercise is something that only natural persons can do. That is, only human beings, not business entities, have the necessary faculties of belief and spirituality that enable them to possess and exercise religious beliefs.College (a component of University), formally the and Fellows of Harvard College (also known as the Harvard Corporation), is the oldest corporation in the western hemisphere. Founded in 1636, the second of Harvards two governing boards was incorporated by the Great and General Court of Massachusetts in 1650. Significantly, Massachusetts itself was a corporate colony at that time  owned and operated by the Massachusetts Bay Company (until it lost its charter in 1684) - so Harvard College is a corporation created by a corporation.Many nations have modeled their own corporate laws on American business law. Corporate law in Arabia, for example, follows the model of New York State corporate law. In addition to typical corporations in the United States, the federal government, in 1971 passed the Native Claims Settlement Act (ANCSA), which authorized the creation of 12 regional native corporations for Natives and over 200 village corporations that were entitled to a settlement of land and cash. In addition to the 12 regional corporations, the legislation permitted a 13th regional corporation without a land settlement for those Alaska Natives living out of the of Alaska at the time of passage of ANCSA.Corporate taxationIn many countries corporate profits are taxed at a corporate tax rate, and dividends paid to shareholders are taxed at a separate rate. Such a system is sometimes referred to as taxation, because any profits distributed to shareholders will eventually be taxed twice. One solution to this (as in the case of the Australian and UK tax systems) is for the recipient of the dividend to be entitled to a tax credit which addresses the fact that the profits represented by the dividend have already been taxed. The company profit being passed on is therefore effectively only taxed at the rate of tax paid by the eventual recipient of the dividend. In other systems, dividends are taxed at a lower rate than other income (for example, in the US) or shareholders are taxed directly on the corporations profits and dividends are not taxed (for example, corporations in the US).CriticismsAs Smith pointed out in the of Nations, when ownership is separated from management (i.e. the actual production process required to obtain the capital), the latter will inevitably begin to neglect the interests of the former, creating dysfunction within the company.(Adam Smith,An Inquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations 741 (Clarendon, Oxford 1776).) Some maintain that recent events in America may serve to reinforce Smiths warnings about the dangers of legally protected collectivist hierarchies.(The fall of the Enron corporation stemmed largely from the companys attempt to create new energy trading markets, and its strategy of trading wealth in order to maintain the appearance of profitability.  For a thorough analysis of Enrons missteps and ultimate destruction, see Kurt Eichenwald, Conspiracy of Fools (Broadway Books, New York 20050.)Other business entitiesAlmost every recognized type of organization carries out some economic activities (for example, the family). Other organizations that may carry out activities that are generally considered to be business exist under the laws of various countries. These include:*cooperative*company*company (Ltd.)*liability company (LLC)*liability limited partnership (LLLP)*liability partnership (LLP)*partnership (LP)*Low-profit limited liability company (L3C)*corporation*Partnership*proprietorship*company, lawSee also;Law*law*Kingdom company law*States corporate law*company law*company law*law;Other*Alaska Native Corporation*activism*corporation*interest company*(law)*(company)*Cooperative*crime*governance*haven*scandals*welfare*Corporatism*corporation*capitalism*standing*Guild*(business)*of strikes*Megacorporation*corporation*culture*stock*corporation (PC or P.C.)*limited company (PLC)*Agent*Corporation*certificates*State-owned Corporation*company*liability corporationNotesReferences*A.B. DuBois, The English Business Company after the Bubble Act, , (1938)*A Comparative Bibliography: Regulatory Competition on Corporate Law*Bishop Hunt, The Development of the Business Corporation in England  (1936)*Blumberg, Phillip I., The Multinational Challenge to Corporation Law: The Search for a New Corporate Personality, (1993)*Bromberg, Alan R. Crane and Bromberg on Partnership. 1968.*Bruce Brown, The History of the Corporation (2003)*C. A. Cooke, Corporation, Trust and Company: A Legal History, (1950)*Charles Freedman, Joint-stock Enterprise in France, : From Privileged Company to Modern Corporation (1979)*Conard, Alfred F. Corporations in Perspective. 1976.*Dignam, A and Lowry, J (2006) Company Law, University Press ISBN 978-0-19-928936-3*Freund, MCMaster.ca, The Legal Nature of the Corporation (1897)*Edwin Merrick Dodd, American Business Corporations until 1860, With Special Reference to Massachusetts, (1954)*John Micklethwait and Adrian Wooldridge. The Company: a Short History of a Revolutionary Idea. New York: Modern Library. 2003.*Frederick Hallis, Corporate Personality: A Study in Jurisprudence (1930)*Hessen, Robert. In Defense of the Corporation. Hoover Institute. 1979. ISBN -X*John P. Davis, Corporations (1904)*John William Cadman, The Corporation in New Jersey: Business and Politics, , (1949)*Joseph S. Davis, Essays in the Earlier History of American Corporations (1917)*Klein and Coffee. Business Organization and Finance: Legal and Economic Principles. Foundation. 2002. ISBN -X*Radhe Shyam Rungta, The Rise of the Business Corporation in India, 18511900, (1970)*Ramesh Chandra Majumdar, Corporate Life in Ancient India, (1920)*Robert Charles Means, Underdevelopment and the Development of Law: Corporations and Corporation Law in Nineteenth-century Colombia, (1980)*Sobel, Robert. The Age of Giant Corporations: a Microeconomic History of American Business. (1984)*Thomas Owen, The Corporation under Russian Law, : A Study in Tsarist Economic Policy (1991)*W. R. Scott, Constitution and Finance of English, Scottish and Irish Joint-Stock Companies to 1720 (1912)Further reading**Low, Albert, 2008. Conflict and Creativity at Work: Human Roots of Corporate Life, Sussex Academic Press. ISBN 978-1-84519-272-3External links*US Corporate Law at Wikibooks*US Corporate Law*an Audio from a talk about the history of corporations and the English Law by Barrister Daniel Bennettaf:Ondernemingbm:Baaradabs:Korporacijabr:Embregerezhbg:ca:Corporaciceb:Korporasyonspolenostde:Krperschaftet:Ettevtees:Corporacineo:Entreprenofr:Corporationgl:Corporacinko:hr:Korporacija(diritto italiano)he:ht:Antreprizlv:Uzmumslb:Entrepriselt:Korporacijahu:Vllalatms:Korporatnl:Bedrijfja:no:Entreprisepl:Korporacjapt:Corporaoro:Corporaieru:sq:Korporatasimple:Corporationsl:Podjetjesr:sh:Korporacijasv:Korporationuk:ur:war:Corporasyonyi:zh:
7548
Contras
battles  Major operations at La Trinidad, Rama highway, and Siuna and La Bonanza. Numerous government bases overrun throughout Jinotega, Matagalpa, Zelaya Norte, Zelaya Sur, Chontales, and Rio San Juan provinces.The contras (some references use the capitalized form, Contras) is a label given to the various rebel groups opposing Nicaraguas FSLN (National Liberation Front) Sandinista of National Reconstruction government following the July 1979 overthrow of Somoza Debayles dictatorship. Among the separate contra groups, the Democratic Force (FDN) emerged as by far the largest. In 1987, virtually all contra organizations were united, at least nominally, into the Resistance.From an early stage, the rebels received decisive financial and military support from the States government, initially supplemented by the Argentine dictatorship of the time. After U.S. support was banned by congress, the administration tried to covertly continue contra aid.The term contra comes from the Spanish contra, which means against but in this case is short for , in English the counter-revolution.  Some rebels disliked being called contras, feeling that it defined their cause only in negative terms, or implied a desire to restore the old order. Rebel fighters usually referred to themselves as  (commandos); peasant sympathizers also called the rebels  (the cousins). From the mid-1980s, as the Reagan administration and the rebels sought to portray the movement as the democratic resistance, members started describing themselves as .During the war against the Sandinista government, the contras carried out many violations of rights. Their supporters in Miami and the House often tried to downplay these, or countered that the Sandinista government carried out more such violations. In particular, the Reagan administration engaged in a campaign to alter public opinion on the contra which has been denoted as white propaganda.HistoryOriginsThe Contras were not a monolithic group, but a combination of three distinct elements of Nicaraguan society:(The Contras were not a monolithic group, but a combination of three distinct elements of Nicaraguan society:... As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 29)*Ex-guardsmen of the National Guard and other right wing figures who had fought for Nicaraguas ex-dictator Somoza(Lee et al. 1987, p. 29) - these later were especially found in the military wing of the FDN.(The contras are made up of a combination of: ex-National Guardsmen (especially the military wing of the FDN),... As seen at: Gill 1984, p. 204) After the Guards disbandment, they formed groups such as the of September Legion, the Anti-Sandinista Guerrilla Special Forces, and the National Army of Liberation. Initially, these groups were small and conducted little active raiding into Nicaragua.(Dickey, Christopher. With the Contras, A Reporter in the Wilds of Nicaragua. Simon & Schuster, 1985.)*Anti-Somozistas who had supported the revolution but felt betrayed by the Sandinista government( - e.g. Chamorro, prominent member of the political directorate of the FDN,(The contras are made up of a combination of: ... anti-Sandinista opponents of ex-dictator Somoza (some of the members of the FDN political directorate eg Messrs. Chamorro and Cruz)... As seen at: Gill 1984, p. 204) or Francisco Cardenal, who had briefly served in the Council of State before leaving Nicaragua out of disagreement with the Sandinista governments policies and founding the Nicaraguan Democratic Union (UDN), an opposition group of Nicaraguan exiles in Miami.(International Court of Justice (IV) (1986), p. 446) Another example are the MILPAS (Milicias Populares Anti-Sandinistas), peasant militias led by disillusioned Sandinista veterans from the northern mountains. Founded by Pedro Joaqun Gonzlez (known as Dimas), the Milpistas were also known as  (green corn). Even after his death, other MILPAS bands sprouted during 19801981. The Milpistas were composed largely of the  (peasant) highlanders and rural workers who would later form the rank and file of the rebellion.()()(Padro-Maurer, R. The Contras 19801989, a Special Kind of Politics. NY: Praeger Publishers, 1990.)(Brown, Timothy C. The Real Contra War, Highlander Peasant Resistance in Nicaragua. University of Oklahoma Press, 2001.)*Nicaraguans who had avoided direct involvement in the revolution but opposed the Sandinistas increasingly anti-democratic regime.(Main groupsImage:Contra commandas 1987.jpg|thumb|Contra Commandos from FDN and Frente Sur, Guinea area, 1987Image:Smoke break el serrano 1987.jpg|thumb|Members of ARDE Frente Sur taking a smoke break after routing the FSLN garrison at Serrano, southeast Nicaragua, 1987.The CIA and intelligence, seeking to unify the anti-Sandinista cause before initiating large-scale aid, persuaded the 15 September Legion, the UDN and several former smaller groups to merge in August 1981 as the Democratic Force (Fuerza Democrtica Nicaragense, FDN). Although the FDN had its roots in two groups made up of former National Guardsmen (of the Somoza regime), its joint political directorate was led by businessman and former anti-Somoza activist Adolfo Calero Portocarrero.(Although Calero had opposed Somoza, the FDN had its roots in two insurgent groups made up of former National Guardsmen... As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 29) Chamorro later stated that there was strong opposition within the UDN against working with the Guardsmen and that the merging only took place because of insistence by the CIA.(The UDN, including Cardenal, initially opposed any linkage with the Guardsmen. The CIA, and high-ranking United States Government officiais, insisted that we merge with the Guardsmen. Lt. General Vernon Walters, then a special assistant to the United States Secretary of State (and formerly Deputy Director of the CIA) met with Cardenal to encourage him to accept the CIAs proposal. We were well aware of the crimes the Guardsmen had committed against the Nicaraguan people while in the service of President Somoza and we wanted nothing to do with them. However, we recognized that without help from the United States Government we had no chance of removing the Sandinistas from power, so we eventually acceded to the CIAs, and General Walters, insistence that we join forces with the Guardsmen. Some UDN memhers resigned hecause they would not associate themselves with the National Guard under any circumstances, but Cardenal and I and others believed the CIAs assurances that we, the civilians, would control the Guardsmen in the new organization that was to he created. As seen at: International Court of Justice (IV) 1986, p. 446) Based in Honduras, Nicaraguas northern neighbor, under the command of former National Guard Colonel Bermdez, the new FDN commenced to draw in other smaller insurgent forces in the north. Largely financed, trained, equipped, armed and organized by the U.S.,(On the basis of the available information, the Court is not able to satisfy itself that the Respondent State created the contra force in Nicaragua, but holds it established that it largely financed, trained, equipped, armed and organized the FDN, one element of the force. As seen at: International Court of Justice 1986, VII (4)) it emerged as the largest and most active contra group.(The largest and most active of these groups, which later came to be known as ... (FDN), ... As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 29)In April 1982, Pastora (Comandante Cero), one of the heroes in the fight against Somoza, organized the Sandinista Revolutionary Front (FRS) - embedded in the Revolutionary Alliance (ARDE)() - and declared war on the Sandinista government.(Lee et al. 1987, p. 32) Himself a former Sandinista who had held several high posts in the government, he had resigned apruptly in 1981 and defected,( believing that the newly found power had corrupted the Sandinistas original ideas.( A popular and charismatic leader, Pastora initially saw his group develop quickly.( He confined himself to operate in the southern part of Nicaragua;(He insisted on operating in the southern part of Nicaragua. As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 32) after a press conference he was holding on 30 May 1984 was bombed, he voluntarily withdrew from the contra struggle.(A third force, Misurasata, appeared among the Miskito, Sumo and Rama Amerindian peoples of Nicaraguas Atlantic coast, who in December 1981 found themselves in conflict with the authorities following the governments efforts to nationalize Indian land. In the course of this conflict, forced removal of at least 10,000 Indians to relocation centers in the interior of the country and subsequent burning of some villages took place.(The Americas Watch Committee. Human Rights in Nicaragua 1986 (print), Americas Watch, February 1987.) The Misurasata movement split in 1983, with the breakaway Misura group of Fagoth Muller allying itself more closely with the FDN, and the rest accommodating themselves with the Sandinista government. A subsequent autonomy statute in September 1987 largely defused Miskito resistance.Unity effortsU.S. officials were active in attempting to unite the Contra groups. In June 1985 most of the groups reorganized as the Nicaraguan Opposition (UNO), under the leadership of Calero, Cruz and Robelo, all originally supporters of the anti-Somoza revolution. After UNOs dissolution early in 1987, the Resistance (RN) was organized along similar lines in May.U.S. military and financial assistanceIn front of the Court of Justice, Nicaragua claimed that the contras altogether were a creation of the U.S.(The Court rejected Nicaraguas claim that the contras were conceived, created and organized by the United States... As seen at: Gill 1989, p. 328) This claim was rejected.(Gill 1989, p. 328) The evidence of a very close relationship between the contras and the U.S. was overwhelming and incontrovertible, though.(The evidence of this close relationship is overwhelming and incontrovertible. As seen at: Gill 1989, p. 329) The U.S. played a very large role in financing, training, arming, and advising the contras over a long period, and the contras only became capable of carrying out significant military operations as a result of this support.(The United States has played a very large role in financing, training, arming, and advising the contras over a long period. The contras only became capable of carrying out significant (para)military operations as a result of this support. As seen at: Gill 1989, p. 329)Political backgroundReagan, who had assumed the American presidency in January 1981, accused the Sandinistas of importing Cuban-style socialism and aiding leftist guerrillas in Salvador. On 4 January 1982, Reagan signed the secret National Security Decision Directive 17 (NSDD-17),() giving the CIA the authority to recruit and support the contras with $19 million in military aid. The effort to support the contras was one component of the Doctrine, which called for providing military support to movements opposing Soviet-supported, communist governments.By December 1981, however, the U.S. had already begun to support armed opponents of the Sandinista regime.(By December 1981, the United  States had begun supporting the Nicaraguan Contras, armed opponents of the Sandinista regime As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 3) From the beginning, the CIA was in charge.(Lee et al. 1987, p.3) To arm, cloth, feed, and supervise the contras(...the CIA armed, clothed, fed and supervised the Contras. As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 3) would become the most ambitious paramilitary and political action operation mounted by the agency in nearly a decade.(In December 1982, the New York Times reported intelligence officials as saying that Washingtons covert activities have... become the most ambitious paramilitary and political action operation mounted by the C.I.A. in nearly a decade... As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 33)In the fiscal year 1984, the U.S. congress approved $24 million in contra aid.(Lee et al. 1987, p. 3) However, since the contras failed to win widespread popular support or military victories within Nicaragua,(...the contras failed to win widespread popular support or military victories within Nicaragua... As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 3) since opinion polls indicated that a majority of the U.S. public was not supportive of the contras,(...opinion polls indicated that a majority of the public was not supportive. As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 3) and since the Reagan administration lost much of its support regarding its contra policy within congress after disclosure of CIA mining of Nicaraguan ports,(Following disclosure...that the CIA had a role in connection with the mining of the Nicaraguan harbors..., public critisism mounted and the Administrations Contra policy lost much of its support within Congress.  As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 3) congress cut off all funds for the contras in 1985 by the third Amendment.( The Boland Amendment had first been passed by congress in December 1982. At this time, it only outlawed U.S. assistance to the contras for the purpose of overthrowing the Nicaraguan government, while allowing assistance for other purposes.() In October 1984, it was amended to forbid action by not only the Defense Department and the Central Intelligence Agency but all U.S. government agencies.Illegal covert operationsWith congress blocking further contra aid, the Reagan administration sought to arrange funding and military supplies by means of third countries and private sources.(Lee et al. 1987, p. 4) Between 1984 and 1986, $34 million from third countries and $2.7 million from private sources were raised this way.( The secret contra assistance was run by the National Security Council, with officer Lt. Col. North in charge.(Lee et al 1987, p. 4) With the third-party funds, North created an organization called The Enterprise which served as the secret arm of the NSC staff and had its own airplanes, pilots, airfield, ship, operatives and secret Swiss bank accounts.( It also received assistance from personnel from other government agencies, especially from CIA personnel in Central America.( This operation functioned, however, without any of the accountability required of U.S. government activities.( The Enterprises efforts culminated in the Iran-Contra Affair of 19861987, which facilitated contra funding through the proceeds of arms sales to Iran.According to the Security Archive, North had been in contact with Noriega, the military leader of Panama later convicted on drug charges, whom he personally met. The issue of drug money and its importance in funding the Nicaraguan conflict was the subject of various reports and publications. The contras were funded by drug trafficking, of which the USA was aware.() Senator Kerrys 1988 Committee on Foreign Relations report on Contra drug links concluded that senior U.S. policy makers were not immune to the idea that drug money was a perfect solution to the Contras funding problems. ()The Reagan administrations support for the Contras continued to stir controversy well into the 1990s. In August 1996, Jose Mercury News reporter Webb published a series titled Dark Alliance, alleging that the contras contributed to the rise of cocaine in California. http://www.narconews.com/darkalliance/drugs/start.htm http://www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv/NSAEBB/NSAEBB2/nsaebb2.htmPropagandaDuring the time congress blocked funding for the contras, the Reagan government engaged in a campaign to alter public opinion and change the vote in congress on contra aid.(...engaged in a campaign to alter public opinion and change the vote in Congress on Contra aid. As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 5) For this purpose, the NSC established an interagency working group which in turn coordinated the for Public Diplomacy for Latin America and the Caribbean (S/LPD), which conducted the campaign.(Lee et al. 1987, p. 5)The S/LPD produced and widely disseminated a variety of pro-contra publications, arranged speeches and press conferences.(The S/LPD produced and widely disseminated a variety of pro-Contra publications and arranged speeches and press conferences. As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 5) It also disseminated white propaganda - pro-contra newspaper articles by paid consultants who did not disclose their connection to the Reagan administration.(It also disseminated what one offical termed white propaganda: pro-Contra newspaper articles by paid consultants who did not disclose their connection to the Administration. As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 5)On top of that, North helped Carl Channells tax-exempt organization, the National Endowment for the Preservation of Liberty, to raise $10 million, by arranging numerous briefings for groups of potential contributors at the premises of the White House and by facilitating private visits and photo sessions with president Reagan for major contributors.(Lee et al. 1987, p. 6) Channell, in turn, used part of that money to run a series of television advertisements directed at home districts of congressmen considered to be swing votes on contra aid.( Out of the $10 million raised, more than $1 million was spent on pro-contra publicity.(Of the $10 million raised by North, Channell and Miller, more than $1 million was used for pro-Contra publicity. As seen at: Lee et al. 1987, p. 6)International Court of Justice rulingIn 1984, the Sandinista government filed a suit in the Court of Justice (ICJ) against the United States (Nicaragua v. United States), which resulted in a 1986 judgment against the United States. The ICJ held that the U.S. had violated law by supporting the contras in their rebellion against the Nicaraguan government and by mining Nicaraguas harbors. Regarding the alleged human rights violations by the contras, however, the ICJ took the view that the U.S. could only be held accountable for them if it would have been proven that the U.S. had effective control of the contra operations resulting in these alleged violations.(Having reached the above conclusion, the Court takes the view that the contras remain responsible for their acts, in particular the alleged violations by them of humanitarian law. For the United States to be legally responsible, it would have to be proved that that State had effective control of the operations in the course of which the alleged violations were committed. As seen at: International Court of Justice 1986, VII (5)) Nevertheless, the ICJ found that the U.S. encouraged acts contrary to general principles of humanitarian law by producing the manual Operations in Guerrilla Warfare (Operaciones sicolgicas en guerra de guerrillas) and disseminating it to the contras.(...Finds that the United States of America, by producing in 1983 a manual entitled Operaciones sicolgicas en guerra de guerrillas, and disseminating it to contra forces, has encouraged the commission by them of acts contrary to general principles of humanitarian law. As seen at: International Court of Justice 1986, (9)) The manual, amongst other things, advised on how to rationalize killings of civilians(In the case of shooting a citizen who was trying to leave the town or city in which the guerrillas are carrying out armed propaganda or political proselytism, the manual suggests that the contras explain that if that citizen had managed to escape, he would have alerted the enemy... As seen at: Sklar 1988, p. 179) and recommended to hire professional killers for specific selective tasks.(If possible, states the manual, professional criminals will be hired to carry out specific, selective jobs. As seen at: Sklar 1988, p. 181)The United States, which did not participate in the merits phase of the proceedings, maintained that the ICJs power did not supersede the of the United States and argued that the court did not seriously consider the Nicaraguan role in El Salvador, while it accused Nicaragua of actively supporting armed groups there, specifically in the form of supply of arms.(The United States has contended that Nicaragua was actively supporting armed groups operating in certain of the neighbouring countries, particularly in El Salvador, and specifically in the form of the supply of arms, an accusation which Nicaragua has repudiated. As seen at: International Court of Justice 1986, VIII (1)) The ICJ had found that evidence of a responsibility of the Nicaraguan government in this matter was insufficient.(In any event the evidence is insufficient to satisfy the Court that the Government of Nicaragua was responsible for any flow of arms at either period. As seen at: International Court of Justice 1986, VIII (1)) The U.S. argument was affirmed, however, by the dissenting opinion of ICJ member U.S. Judge Schwebel,(But the Court, remarkably enough, while finding the United States responsible for intervention in Nicaragua, failed to recognize Nicaraguas prior and continuing intervention in El Salvador. As seen at: International Court of Justice 1986, Dissenting Opinion of Judge Schwebel) who concluded that in supporting the contras, the U.S. acted lawfully in collective self-defence in El Salvadors support.(...concluded that the United States essentially acted lawfully in exerting armed pressures against Nicaragua, both directly and through its support of the contras, because Nicaraguas prior and sustained support of armed insurgency in El Salvador was tantamount to an armed attack upon El Salvador against which the United States could react in collective self-defence in El Salvadors support. As seen at: International Court of Justice 1986, Dissenting Opinion of Judge Schwebel) The U.S. blocked enforcement of the ICJ judgment by the Nations Security Council and thereby prevented Nicaragua from obtaining any actual compensation.( Appraisals of the ICJs Decision. Nicaragua vs United State (Merits))  The Nicaraguan government finally withdrew the complaint from the court in September 1992 (under the later, post-FSLN, government of Chamorro), following a repeal of the law requiring the country to seek compensation.()Human rights violationsAmericas Watch - which subsequently became part of Rights Watch - stated that the Contras systematically engage in violent abuses... so prevalent that these may be said to be their principal means of waging war.() It() accused the Contras of:*targeting health care clinics and health care workers for assassination(Human Rights in Nicaragua 1986, p. 21)*kidnapping civilians(Human Rights in Nicaragua 1986, p. 19)*torturing civilians(Human Rights in Nicaragua 1986, p. 19, 21)*executing civilians, including children, who were captured in combat(Human Rights in Nicaragua 1986, p. 24)*raping women(*indiscriminately attacking civilians and civilian houses(*seizing civilian property(*burning civilian houses in captured towns.(Human Rights Watch released a report on the situation in 1989, which stated: The contras were major and systematic violators of the most basic standards of the laws of armed conflict, including by launching indiscriminate attacks on civilians, selectively murdering non-combatants, and mistreating prisoners.The Catholic Institute for International Relations (CIIR, now known as Progressio), a rights organization which identifies itself with theology, summarized Contra operating procedures in their 1987 human rights report: The record of the contras in the field, as opposed to their official professions of democratic faith, is one of consistent and bloody abuse of human rights, of murder, torture, mutilation, rape, arson, destruction and kidnapping.()A fact finding mission of 1985 - sponsored by the Human Rights Law Group and the Office on Latin America, and carried out independently of any Nicaraguan government interference or direction(Gill 1989, p. 194) - found that the contras with some frequency deliberately targeted Nicaraguan citizens in acts of terroristic violence.(We found that there is substantial credible evidence that the contras engaged with some frequency in acts of terroristic violence directed at Nicaraguan civilians... These are individuals who are not caught in the cross-fire between Government and contra forces, but... deliberately targeted by the contras for acts of terror. As seen at: Gill 1989, p. 194) Specifically, the report speaks of a distinct pattern of attacks on purely civilian targets resulting in the killing of unarmed men, women, children, and the elderly; premeditated acts of brutality including rape, beatings, mutilation and torture; and individual and mass kidnappings of civilians for the purpose of forced recruitment into the contra forces.(Those incidents that have been investigated, however, reveal a distinct pattern, indicating that contra activities often include: attacks on purely civilian targets resulting in the killing of unarmed men, women, children, and the elderly; premeditated acts of brutality including rape, beatings, mutilation and torture; individual and mass kidnappings of civilians ... for the purpose of forced recruitment into the contra forces and the creation of a hostage refugee population in Honduras; assaults on economic and social targets ... As seen at: International Court of Justice (IV) (1986), p. 300)Chamorro, a former Contra and member of the FDNs political directorate who later became a critic of the Contras, stated that during his time with the Contras, he frequently received reports about atrocities committed by Contra troops against civilians and against Sandinista prisoners.(As time went on, I became more and more troubled by the frequent reports I received of atrocities committed by our troops against civilians and against Sandinista prisoners. As seen at: Sklar 1988, p. 182) Furthermore, he went straight to our unit commanders as they returned from combat mission inside Nicaragua and asked them about their activities. I was saddened by what I was told. The atrocities I had heard about were not isolated incidents, but reflected a consistent pattern of behaviour by our troops.(Sklar 1988, p. 182)An influential report on Contra atrocities was issued by lawyer Brody shortly before the 1985 U.S. Congressional vote on Contra aid. The report was soon published as a book.(Brody, Reed. Contra Terror in Nicaragua.  End Press (Boston, MA). ISBN 0896083136.) It charged that the Contras attacked purely civilian targets and that their tactics included murder, rape, beatings, kidnapping and disruption of harvests. Brodys report had been requested by the Sandinista governments Washington law firm & Applebaum and the Sandinista government had provided facilities in Nicaragua for him.(New Republic, 20 January 1986, with letters in New Republic, 17 February 1986.) In a letter to New York Times,() Brody asserted that this in no way affected his report, and added that the newspaper had confirmed the veracity of four randomly chosen incidents.A Sandinista militiaman interviewed by Guardian stated that Contra rebels committed these atrocities against Sandinista prisoners after a battle at a Sandinista rural outpost: Rosa had her breasts cut off. Then they cut into her chest and took out her heart. The men had their arms broken, their testicles cut off. They were killed by slitting their throats and pulling the tongue out through the slit.()ControversyThe Sandinista government, its supporters, and outside groups such as Americas Watch frequently accused the Contras of indiscriminate attacks on civilians. The Contras and their backers, especially those in the Reagan administration, dismissed these accusations as a propaganda campaign and accused the Sandinistas of the same against humanity.US news media published several articles accusing Americas Watch and other bodies of ideological bias and unreliable reporting. It alleged that Americas Watch gave too much credence to alleged Contra abuses and systematically tried to discredit Nicaraguan human rights groups such as the Commission on Human Rights, which blamed the major human rights abuses on the Sandinistas.(New Republic, 20 January 1986; New Republic, 22 August 1988; National Interest, Spring 1990.)In 1985, the Street Journal reported::Three weeks ago, Americas Watch issued a report on human rights abuses in Nicaragua. One member of the Permanent Commission for Human Rights commented on the Americas Watch report and its chief investigator Juan Mendez: The Sandinistas are laying the groundwork for a totalitarian society here and yet all Mendez wanted to hear about were abuses by the contras. How can we get people in the U.S. to see whats happening here when so many of the groups who come down are pro-Sandinista?(David Asman, Despair and fear in Managua, Street Journal, 25 March 1985.)This was part of a strategy of the Reagan Administration that largely involved stonewalling the press on matters of human rights violations: in addition to skepticism of Contra abuses, the White House insisted that the notorious Mozote Massacre (carried out by government death squads trained at the of the Americas) didnt happen. However, with regard to Nicaragua, their tactic was refuted by many activists on the ground, including Rights Watch, who said the following of the White Houses attempts at denial:This hostility yielded, among other things, an inordinate amount of publicity about human rights issues. Almost invariably, U.S. pronouncements on human rights exaggerated and distorted the real human rights violations of the Sandinista regime, and exculpated those of the U.S.-supported insurgents, known as the contras.... the contras were major and systematic violators of the most basic standards of the laws of armed conflict, including by launching indiscriminate attacks on civilians, selectively murdering non-combatants, and mistreating prisoners. In 1989 the number of contra abuses has been greatly reduced in comparison to the beginning of the peace process, largely because, at least through September, they were entering Nicaragua less frequently. To the extent that the contras have continued to operate, however, they have continued to commit these violations, and toward the end of 1989, abuses by the contras appeared to be on the increase. The Bush administration is responsible for these abuses, not only because the contras are, for all practical purposes, a U.S. force, but also because the Bush administration has continued to minimize and deny these violations, and has refused to investigate them seriously. As in the Reagan years, the Bush State Department has continued to make too much of monitoring mechanisms within the contra movement that have been wholly unsuccessful in prosecuting those responsible for abuses.Military successes and election of Violeta ChamorroBy 1986, the contras were besieged by charges of corruption, human-rights abuses and military ineptitude.(Before the arms scam erupted, the contras were already besieged by charges of corruption, human-rights abuses and military ineptitude. As seen at: ) A much-vaunted early 1986 offensive never materialized, and Contra forces were largely reduced to isolated acts of terrorism.() In October 1987, however, the contras staged an successful attack in southern Nicaragua.(The last major attack, in October along the Rama Road in southern Nicaragua, was considered a success for the guerrillas. As seen at: ) Then on 21 December 1987, the FDN launched attacks at La Bonanza, La Siuna, and La Rosita in Zelaya province, resulting in heavy fighting.() ARDE Frente Sur attacked at El Almendro and along the Rama road.(()(Meara, William R. Contra Cross: Insurgency And Tyranny in Central America, 19791989. US Naval Institute Press, 2006.) These large scale raids mainly became possible as the contras were able to use US-provided Redeye missiles against Sandinista Mi-24 helicopter gunships, which had been supplied by the Soviets.(Such large-scale raids have become possible only in recent months as the rebels have used American-provided missiles against Sandinista helicopters. As seen at: )() Nevertheless, the Contras remained tenuously encamped within the Honduras and werent able to hold Nicaraguan territory.()()There were isolated protests among the population against the draft implemented by the Sandinista government, which even resulted in full-blown street clashes in Masaya in 1988.(Sometimes they used force as they rounded up young men for military service, and there were occasional confrontations. But only in the town of Masaya, 19 miles southeast of the capital of Managua, did the conscription spark a full-blown street clash...For several weeks before the latest outburst in Masaya, the opposition newspaper, La Prensa, had been reporting isolated protests against the draft. As seen at: ) However, polls showed the Sandinista government still enjoyed strong support from Nicaraguans.() Political opposition groups were splintered and the Contras began to experience defections, although United States aid maintained them as a viable military force.()()After a cutoff in US military support and with both sides facing international pressure to bring an end to the conflict, the Contras agreed to negotiations with the FSLN. Despite opposition from then-US President Bush five Central American Presidents, including Ortega, agreed to cooperate to disband the Contras beginning in December 1989 with the assumption of free and fair elections in Nicaragua in February 1990. This peace allowed the Nicaraguan elections of February 1990 in which Chamorro and her party the UNO won an upset victory 55% to 41% over Daniel Ortega with Chamorro winning nearly 68% of the rural vote. This in spite of the fact that the estimated 500,000 refugees created by the war living outside Nicaragua were not allowed to cast absentee ballots.()Although polls leading up to the election indicated an FSLN victory the UNO scored an upset due to popular discontent with the draft and the perception that voting in the UNO would lead to a permanent peace.() Shortly thereafter the contras were allowed the re-enter the country into security zones and were assimilated back into Nicaraguan society.See also*Anti-communism*Song*and Contras cocaine trafficking in the US*Charly*Doctrine*of women in Nicaraguan RevolutionNotesReferences*Asleson, Vern. (2004) Nicaragua: Those Passed By. Galde Press ISBN 1-931942-16-1*Belli, Humberto. (1985). Breaking Faith: The Sandinista Revolution and Its Impact on Freedom and Christian Faith in Nicaragua. Crossway Books/The Puebla Institute.*Bermudez, Enrique, The Contras Valley Forge: How I View the Nicaraguan Crisis, Review magazine, The Foundation, Summer 1988.*Brody, Reed. (1985). Contra Terror in Nicaragua: Report of a Fact-Finding Mission: September 1984-January 1985. Boston: End Press. ISBN 0-89608-313-6.*Brown, Timothy. (2001). The Real Contra War: Highlander Peasant Resistance in Nicaragua. University of Oklahoma Press. ISBN 0-8061-3252-3.*Chamorro, Edgar. (1987). Packaging the Contras: A Case of CIA Disinformation. New York: Institute for Media Analysis. ISBN 0-941781-08-9; ISBN 0-941781-07-0.*Christian, Shirley. (1986) Nicaragua, Revolution In the Family. New York: Vintage Books.*Cox, Jack. (1987) Requiem in the Tropics: Inside Central America. UCA Books.*Cruz S., Arturo J. (1989). Memoirs of a Counterrevolutionary. (1989). New York: Doubleday.*Dickey, Christopher. (1985, 1987). With the Contras: A Reporter in the Wilds of Nicaragua. New York: Simon & Schuster.*Garvin, Glenn. (1992). Everybody Had His Own Gringo: The CIA and the Contras. Washington: Brasseys.**Gugliota Guy. (1989). Kings of Cocaine Inside the Medellin Cartel. Simon and Shuster.*Horton, Lynn. Peasants in Arms: War and Peace in the Mountains of Nicaragua, 19791994. (1998). Athens: Ohio University Center for International Studies.*Court of Justice (1986) *Court of Justice (IV) (1986) *Kirkpatrick, Jeane J.. (1982) Dictatorships and Double Standards. Touchstone. ISBN 0-671-43836-0*Miranda, Roger, and William Ratliff. (1993, 1994) The Civil War in Nicaragua: Inside the Sandinistas. New Brunswick, NY: Transaction Publishers.*Lee, H.H. et al. (1987) Report of the Congressional Committees Investigating the Iran/Contra Affair*Moore, John Norton (1987). The Secret War in Central America: Sandinista Assault on World Order. University Publications of America.*Pardo-Maurer, Rogelio. (1990) The Contras, 19801989: A Special Kind of Politics. New York: Praeger.*Persons, David E. (1987) A Study of the History and Origins of the Nicaraguan Contras. Nacogdoches, Texas: Total Vision Press. Stephen Austin University Special Collections.*Sklar, H. (1988) Washingtons war on Nicaragua End Press. ISBN 0-89608-295-4*Webb, Gary (1998). Dark Alliance: The CIA, the Contras, and the Crack Cocaine Explosion, Seven Stories Press. ISBN 1-888363-68-1 (hardcover, 1998), ISBN 1-888363-93-2 (paperback, 1999).External links*Confessions of a Contra: How the CIA Masterminds the Nicaraguan Insurgency by New Republic, 5 August 1985*Peasants Tell of Rights Abuses by Sandinistas, by James LeMoyne, New York Times, 28 June 1987.*Sandinistas Uproot Villagers to Limit Support for Contras, by James LeMoyne, New York Times, 17 June 1987.*Turnover in Nicaragua;Nicaraguan Opposition Routs Sandinistas, by Mark A. Uhlig, New York Times, 27 February 1990.*Nicaragua Goes For Reagan, National Review, 19 March 1990.*Nicaragua 19811990: Destabilization in slow motion, by Blum.*Dark Alliance, by Webb, San Jose Mercury News, August 1996.*The World Stopped Watching, a documentary film directed by Peter Raymont. White Pine Pictures, 2003.*The Contras, Cocaine, and Covert Operations - National Security Archive.*US administration disregarding the UN verdict Video provided by BBC.*When the AK-47s Fall Silent, by Timothy Brown*CIA Psychological Operations in Guerrilla Warfare. Tactical Manual for the Revolutionary.cs:Contras(Organisation)es:Contrasfr:Contrasos:it:Contrashe:(Nicaragua)ja:no:Contraspl:Contraspt:Contrasru:fi:Contratsv:Contrasuk:
7712
Continuation_War
United Kingdom declared war on Finland but conducted only minor operations.The Continuation War (, , 25 June 1941  19 September 1944) was the second of two wars fought between Finland and the Soviet Union during World War II.At the time of the war, the Finnish side used the name to make clear its perceived relationship to the preceding War.() The Soviet Union saw the war as a part of its struggle against Germany and its allies, the Eastern Front of World War II or, as it was known in the Soviet Union, the Great Patriotic War.(Soviet Encyclopedia, Finland, Moscow, 1974. ISBN 0-02-880010-9) Germany regarded its operations in the region as a part of its overall war efforts of World War II. It provided critical material support and military cooperation to Finland.Acts of war between the two countries started on 22 June 1941, the day Germany launched its invasion of the Soviet Union. Open warfare started with a Soviet air offensive on 25 June.  Subsequent Finnish operations undid its post-War cessations on the Karelian Isthmus and Ladoga Karelia, and captured East Karelia by September 1941. Furthermore Finland passively participated in the of Leningrad by holding their lines for two and a half years on Isthmus.()()() Accordingly the Soviet air forces bombed Helsinki and other major cities. Eventually the Soviet strategic offensive in the summer of 1944 drove the Finns from most of the territories they had gained during the war but the Finnish Army later fought it to a standstill in July 1944. Cease-fire ended the hostilities on 5 September and Armistice officially ending the hostilities was signed in 19 September. The Paris peace treaty concluded the war formally in 1947. Finland ceded Petsamo and rented Porkkala to the Soviet Union, and paid reparations of $300,000,000 equaling half of its annual gross domestic product in 1939, while Finland retained its independence.BackgroundWinter Warthumb|Finnish ski troops in Northern Finland on 12 January 1940On 23 August 1939, the Soviet Union and Germany signed the Pact where parties divided the independent countries of Finland, Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland and Romania into of interest, with Finland falling to the Soviet sphere of interest.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 30) Shortly afterward, Germany invaded Poland so the Kingdom and France declared war against Germany. The Soviet Union invaded eastern Poland on 17 September.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 31) Next, Moscow demanded that the states allow the establishment of Soviet military bases and the stationing of troops on their soil. The Baltic governments accepted ultimatums, signing the corresponding agreements in September and in October.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 33)In October 1939, the Soviet Union attempted to negotiate for Finnish territories on the Isthmus, the islands of the of Finland and a military base near the Finnish capital Helsinki.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 39) The Finnish government refused, and the Army attacked on 30 November 1939.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 44) Condemnation by the of Nations and by countries all over the world had no effect on Soviet policy.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 49) International help to Finland was planned, but very little actual help materialized, except from Sweden.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 65) The Moscow Peace Treaty, which was signed on 12 March 1940, ended the Winter War.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 69) The Treaty was severe for Finland as the country lost one eleventh of its national territory and about 13 percent of its economic capacity.(Kirby 2006, p. 215) However, Finland had avoided having the Soviet Union annex the whole country.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 70)Interim peaceFile:Finnish flag at half-mast interim pece helsinki 1940.jpg|thumb|Finnish flags are at half-mast after the publication of the peace terms.The outcome of the Winter War was bitter for Finland and left a deep trauma. The countrys foreign policy had been based on multilateral guarantees for support from the of Nations and countries and was considered a failure.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 74) Public opinion favored the re-conquest of Karelia. The defence of the country was declared first priority and military expenditures rose to nearly half of government spending. Finland received war material purchased and donated during and immediately after the Winter War. On the southern frontier, the Soviet Union had acquired a military base in Hanko near the Finnish capital of Helsinki, employing over 30,000 military personnel.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 75)Finland also had to resettle some 420,000 evacuees from the lost territories. To ensure the supply of food, it was necessary to clear new land for them to cultivate.( This issue was facilitated with the Settlement Act. The Finnish leadership wanted to preserve the spirit of unanimity that was commonly felt throughout the country during the Winter War. The divisive White Guard tradition of the Civil War 16 May victory day celebration was therefore discontinued.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 76) Relations between Finland and the Soviet Union remained strained despite the signing of the one-sided peace treaty and there were disputes regarding the implementation of the conditions of the treaty. Finland sought security against further territorial depredations by the Soviet Union and proposed mutual defence agreements with Norway and Sweden, but these initiatives were quashed by Moscow.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 77)(Kirby 2006, p. 216)German and Soviet expansion in EuropeFile:Europe before Operation Barbarossa, 1941 (in German).png|thumb|Situation in Europe by May/June 1941, immediately before the Barbarossa.After the Winter War, Germany was not popular in Finland as it was considered an ally of the Soviet Union. However, the Finnish government began to restore diplomatic relations with Germany. Finland continued its Western orientation policy and negotiated a war trade agreement with the Kingdom( but the agreement was renounced after the German invasion of Denmark and Norway on 9 April, when Britain cut all trade and traffic communications with Scandinavia. With the fall of France, a policy of Western orientation was no longer considered an option in Finnish foreign policy.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 78) On 1516 June, the Soviet Union occupied the Baltic states without resistance. Puppet regimes were installed and within two months Estonia, Latvia and Lithuania were incorporated as Soviet Republics within the Soviet Union.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 79) By mid-1940, both the northern democracies of Finland and Sweden were encircled by the totalitarian states of Germany and the Soviet Union.On 23 June, a short time after the Soviet occupation in the Baltic states, the Soviet foreign minister Molotov contacted the Finns and demanded a mining licence in the nickel mines in Petsamo for the Soviet Union or to a joint Soviet-Finnish company. The licence to mine the deposit had earlier been granted to a British-Canadian company and the proposition was rejected. Next month, the Soviets demanded Finland destroy the fortifications built in the land islands and give the right to use Finnish railways for transporting troops to the newly acquired Soviet base at Hanko. The Finns very reluctantly agreed to these demands.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 80) On 24 July, Molotov accused the Finnish government of persecuting the so-called Society for Peace and Friendship between Finland and USSR, a pro-communist group, and soon after he publicly supported it. The society organized demonstrations, some of which turned into riots.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 81)(Kirby 2006, p. 218)Finnish relations with Germany and the USSRFile:Bundesarchiv Bild 183-1984-1206-523, Berlin, Verabschiedung Molotows.jpg|thumb|German von Ribbentrop welcoming Soviet Molotov in Berlin on 14 November 1940.On 31 July 1940, the German leader Hitler gave the order to start planning an assault on the Soviet Union. This meant that Germany had to re-assess the positions of both Finland and Romania. Until then, Germany had rejected Finnish appeals to purchase arms but in August the Germans allowed the secret sale of weapons. Military authorities made an agreement on 12 September and an official exchange of diplomatic notes were sent on 22 September. At the same time, German troops were allowed to transit their troop through Sweden and Finland.(Kirby 2006, p. 220) In practice, this meant redrawing of the border between German and Soviet spheres of influence.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 83)Due to the changed situation, Molotov made a visit to Berlin on 1213 November.(Kirby 2006, p. 219) He wanted Germany to withdraw its troops from Finland and stop enabling Finnish anti-Soviet sentiments. He also reminded the Germans of the 1939 SovietGerman non-aggression pact. Hitler asked how the Soviet Union planned to settle the Finnish question. Molotov answered that it would happen in the same manner as in Bessarabia and the Baltic states. Hitler rejected this.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 84) Next December, the Soviet Union, Germany and the United Kingdom all voiced opinions concerning suitable Finnish presidential candidates. Ryti was the only one of the candidates to whom none of three superpowers objected. He was elected on 19 December.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 85)In January 1941, the Soviet Union demanded to take control of the Petsamo mining area. Finland rejected this, as it had by then a re-built defense force and the encouragement of Germany.( On 18 December 1940, Hitler had officially approved Barbarossa, the German invasion of the Soviet Union.(Kirby 2006, p. 221) Both Finland and Romania were expected to join in the campaign.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 86) Two days earlier, Finnish Major General Talvela had met German Colonel General Halder and, a couple days later, Gring, in Berlin. This was the first time the Germans advised them, in carefully couched diplomatic terms, that they were preparing for a war with the Soviet Union. Outlines of the actual plan were revealed in January 1941 and regular contacts between Finnish and German military leaders started from February.(In late Spring 1941, the Soviet Union made a number of goodwill gestures in order to prevent Finland from completely falling under German influence. Soviet ambassador Zotov was replaced with the more flexible Pavel Orlov. Furthermore, the Soviet government announced that it no longer opposed an approchement between Finland and Sweden. However, these conciliatory measures did not have effect on Finnish policy.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 87)Path to warFinnish-German agreementOn 20 May, Germany invited Finnish officers to Germany to discuss the coordination of Operation Barbarossa. The participants met on 2528 May in Salzburg and Berlin, and continued in Helsinki on 36 June. They agreed upon the arrival of German troops, Finnish mobilization and general division of operations.( It was also agreed that the Finnish Army would start mobilization on 15 June, but the Germans did not reveal the final date for the assault. The Finnish decisions were made by a small group of political and military leaders and the rest of the government was largely kept in the dark. They were not told until the 9th of June that the country would start mobilization of reservists due to tensions between Germany and the Soviet Union.(Deployments and pre-assaultsFile:Continuation War July 1941 English.jpg|thumb|Finnish, German and Soviet troops at the start of the Continuation War in June/July 1941. The Germans assaulted on 29 June from Petsamo area and the Finns assaulted on 1 July from Suomussalmi and Kuusamo area.The Germans took responsibility for a  stretch of the front in the northern Finland, the Finnish Lapland. The Finnish army was now much stronger than it had been during the Winter War. Its total strength was 475,000 men and the artillery was relatively strong. However, there was only one tank battalion and a lack of motorized transportation.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 90)At the beginning of the war, the Soviet Union had only eighteen divisions in the region, against fifteen Finnish and four German divisions. The Finns also enjoyed supremacy. Furthermore, the Soviet Union needed its best units and most up-to-date materiel on its western front.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 91)The German troops assaulted the Soviet Union on 22 June elsewhere but not in Finland. However, German minelayers hiding in the Sea laid two large minefields across the of Finland in the late hours of 21 June.( Nordberg, Erkki, Arvio ja ennuste Venjn sotilaspolitiikasta Suomen suunnalla, 2003, ISBN 951-884-362-7)(Encyclopdia Britannica Premium, 2006, Finland) Later the same night, German bombers flew along the Gulf of Finland to Leningrad and mined the harbour and the river Neva. On the return trip, these bombers landed for refueling on an airfield in Utti. In the early hours of 22 June Finnish forces launched Kilpapurjehdus that occupied the demilitarized Islands. An international treaty on the status of the islands called for Finland to occupy them in case of a threat of an attack.() However the operation was coordinated with the Nazi invasion and the Soviet consulate there was arrested; Finland knew it had violated international norms.(Jokipii 1999, p. 282)On 21 June, Finnish units began to concentrate at the Finnish-Soviet border, where they were arranged into defensive formations. Finland mobilised 16 infantry divisions, one cavalry brigade, and two jger brigades, which were standard infantry brigades, except for an armoured battalion in the 1st Jger Brigade. There were separate battalions mostly formed from border guard units and used mainly for reconnaissance. Soviet military plans estimated that Finland would be able to mobilise only 10 infantry divisions, as it had done in the Winter War, but they failed to take into account the materiel Finland had purchased between the wars and its training of all available men. Two German mountain divisions were stationed at Petsamo and two infantry divisions at Salla. On the morning of 22 June, the German Mountain Corps Norway began its advance from northern Norway to Petsamo. Finland did not allow direct German attacks from its soil into the Soviet Union. On the same day, another German infantry division was moved in from Oslo to face Karelia.The Soviet mobilisation had been underway since 18 June. The Karelian Isthmus was covered by the 23rd Army. Ladoga Karelia was defended by the 7th Army. In the MurmanskSalla region, there was the 14th Army with  the 42nd Corps. The Red Army also had around 40 battalions of separate regiments and fortification units present. Leningrad was garrisoned by three infantry divisions and one mechanized corps. As the initial devastating German strike against the Soviet Air Force had not affected air units located near Finland, the Soviets deployed 700 planes as well as some aircraft from the Navy against 300 Finnish planes.(Jokipii 1999, p. 301)Campaign of 1941In the morning of 25 June, the Soviet Union launched an air offensive of 460 fighter and bombers targeted against 19 airfields in Finland however inaccurate intelligence and bad bombing accuracy caused several raids to actually hit Finnish cities or municipalities.() There was considerable destruction in the cities and 23 planes were shot down. This offered the Finnish government a ground for claiming that the country had become the target of a new assault and the parliament approved the defend war as a accompli.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 88) The message was more for public opinion in Finland than abroad, where it was seen that the country was in the German camp.(Kirby 2006, p. 222) In 1941, most Finns thought it was only to regain back what had been wrongly taken in the Winter War.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 89)The Soviet Union claimed the air attack was directed against German targets, especially airfields, in Finland.() At the same time, Soviet artillery stationed at the Hanko base began to shell Finnish targets and a minor Soviet infantry attack was launched over the Finnish side of the border in Parikkala.The Soviet Union was struggling to contain the German invasion and soon the Soviet High Command had to call all available units to the rapidly deteriorating front line.() Because of this, the initial air offensive against Finland could not be followed by a supporting land offensive in the scale originally planned.(Manninen (2008), Miten Suomi valloitetaan: Puna-armeijan operaatiosuunnitelmat 19391944, Helsinki: Edita, 2008. ISBN 978-951-37-5278-1) Moreover, the 10th Mechanized Corps and the 237th Infantry Division were withdrawn from Ladoga Karelia, thus stripping reserves from the remaining defending units.()Reconquest of Ladoga KareliaThe Finnish offensive in Ladoga Karelia started on 10 July, and by 16 July it had already reached the shore of Ladoga and cut the defending Soviet army in two, hindering the Soviet defense of the area. Finnish HQ stopped the offensive in Ladoga Karelia on 25 July after reconquering the area of Ladoga Karelia lost to Soviet Union in 1940 and advancing as far as Vitele, and then moved onto the offensive at other sections of the front.Reconquest of the Karelian Isthmusrecaptured.jpg|thumb|right|Finnish military parade in Viipuri on 31 August 1941, after its recapture.Finnish troops started their offensive in the region of the Karelian Isthmus on 31 July. Finnish troops reached the shores of lake Ladoga on 9 August, surrounding most of three defending Soviet divisions on the north-western coast of the lake from where they were evacuated across the lake. By 23 August, the Finns had reached the Vuoksi waterway from the east and continued to surround the Soviet forces defending Viipuri. The Soviet withdrawal order came too late, and divisions lost much of their equipment, although a sizable portion of their manpower was later evacuated via the Koivisto islands. The badly mauled defending Soviet army was unable to halt the Finnish offensive, and by 2 September they had reached the 1939 border along its whole length. On 31 August, Finnish HQ ordered the offensive to halt at a straightened line just past the former border.( However, according to Soviet sources the Finns advanced and took the settlement of Novyi Beloostrov on 4 September, but a Soviet counter-attack threw them out the next day,(Werth 1999, p. 294)(Luknitsky 1988, p. 58) although the war diary of the Finnish 12th Division facing the settlement( does not mention the fighting and notes that it was quiet at the time() and neither does Finnish chronology of the Continuation War.() Staryi Beloostrov (Valkeasaari) was taken by the Finns on September 4 and the Soviet counterattacks failed to retake the settlement.() The Finns took Novyi Beloostrov on 11 September. This created a dangerous bulge in the Soviet defensive line.( Fighting for the settlement continued until 20 September when the Soviets managed to force the Finns out.(Luknitsky 1988, p. 72) After that the front stabilized.(Salisbury 2003, p. 246)(Werth 1999, p. 360-1)Conquest of East KareliaFinnish offensive in East Karelia started in early July in the northern section of the front. In early September, the attack in the northern section reached the Rukajrvi (, Rugozero) village and HQ halted the offensive there. In the southern area on August 27, Finnish HQ ordered the offensive to reach Svir river. Finnish troops cut the Kirov railroad on 7 September and crossed the Svir on 15 September and then halted the offensive. Advance troops reached shores of Onega on 24 September and the town of Petrozavodsk was captured on 1 October after the Soviets withdraw from the town to avoid encirclement. On 6 November, the Finnish HQ ordered their forces to capture Karhumki and then move to defense. The Finnish forces captured the area of Karhumki and Povenets and halted the offensive in early December.Related to Finnish advance to Svir the German Army Group North advanced from the south towards Svir river and managed to capture Tikhvin before Soviet counterattacks forced the Germans to withdraw to River. Soviet forces also made several attempts to force Finns out from their bridgehead south of Svir during October and December 1941 however the Soviet efforts to reduce the bridgehead were blocked by the Finns. Soviet forces also attacked against the German 163rd Division  which was operating under Finnish command  across the Svir in October 1941 but the Soviet forces which had crossed the river were pushed back soon after.()Operation Silver Fox on the NorthThe German objective in northern Finland was to take Murmansk and seize control of the Railway. Murmansk was the only port year round in the north and a threat to the nickel mine of Petsamo. The Silver Fox was run by the German AOK Norwegen and had two Finnish divisions under its command. The German soldiers were from central Europe and they had difficulties moving over a roadless terrain of swamp and forest. Troops managed to advance some distance with heavy casualties, but the terrain offered good defensive positions for the Soviet resistance.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 95)The order for GermanFinnish troops to move to defensive operations was given on 17 November and attempts to reach the Murman Railway had failed.Naval campaignThough the Red Banner Baltic fleet started the war in a strong position, the naval mine warfare, aerial supremacy and rapid changes to the land forces forced Soviet Navy to evacuate its bases to Kronstadt and Leningrad. Evacuations from Tallinn and Hanko proved to be very costly operations. As the Soviet Navy withdrew to the eastern end of the of Finland it left the nearly the whole of the Sea as well as many of the islands to the Germans and the Finns. Though submarines caused some threat to German traffic on the Baltic, the withdrawal of the Soviet Navy made the Baltic Sea a German lake until the second half of 1944. Though the Soviet navy left in a hurry, the naval mines it had managed to lay before and during the evacuations caused casualties both to the Germans and to the Finns, including the loss of one of the two Finnish coastal defence ships, the .Political developmentThe main forces of Germany advanced rapidly deep into the Soviet territory during the first weeks of campaign. The Finns believed the Germans would defeat the Soviet Union soon. President Ryti visionized Finland, where the country and other people would live inside natural defence borderline by incorporating the Peninsula, Karelia and perhaps even northern Ingria. In public the proposed frontier was introduced by the slogan A short border  a long peace.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 92) Some members of parliament opposed the idea, such social democrats and Swedish-speaking party people, and argument that 1939 frontier would be enough.( The Commander-in-Chief C.G.E. Mannerheim gave an order of the day on 10 July, the scabbard declaration, in which he pledged to liberate Karelia. The Finnish government assured to Americans that it was unaware of the order.(Kirby 2006, p. 224)Finland had prepared for a short war, but in late autumn it was clear that there was no decisive outcome in the short term. The Finnish troops suffered losses during its advance, and overall German victory became unsure as their troops were halted near Moscow. The Finnish economy suffered from a lack of labour, food shortages and increased prices. The Finnish government had to demobilize part of the army so that industrial and agricultural production would not collapse.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 96) In October, the Finns informed Germany that it would need  of grains to manage till next years harvest. German authorities would have rejected the request, but Hitler himself agreed. The annual grain deliveries  amounted to almost  of the Finnish domestic crop. In November Finland decided to join the Pact.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 101) The advance in East Karelia was halted on 6 December. The Finns had suffered 75,000 casualties of whom 25,000 died during the advance.(Finland and Western AlliesFinland worked to maintain good relations with the Western powers. The government stressed that Finland was fighting as a co-belligerent of Germany only against the Soviet Union to protect itself.( Furthermore, Finland stressed that it was still the same democratic country as it had been in the Winter War. However, the United Kingdom had signed with the Soviet Union an agreement of joint action on 12 July. Furthermore, Finland had to close, under German pressure, the British legation in Helsinki. As a result, diplomatic relations between Finland and the United Kingdom were broken on 1 August.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 97) On 28 November, Britain presented Finland an ultimatum, in which it demanded that Finland cease military operations by 3 December.( Unofficially Finland informed the Western powers that troops would halt their advance in the next few days. The reply did not satisfy the United Kingdom. It declared war on Finland on 6 December, following Commonwealth countries of Canada, Australia, India and Zealand.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 100)Relations between Finland and the States were more complex. The American public was sympathetic to the brave little democracy and there were still anti-communist feelings. At first, the U.S. empathised with the Finnish cause; however, the situation became problematic after Finnish troops crossed the 1939 border. Finnish and German troops were a threat to the Railway and northern communication supply line between the Western Allies and the Soviet Union.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 98) On 25 October, the U.S. demanded that Finland cease all hostilities against the Soviet Union and withdraw behind the 1939 border. In public President Ryti rejected the demands, but in private he wrote Mannerheim on 5 November asking him to halt the offensive. Mannerheim agreed and secretly instructed General Siilasvuo to break off the assault against the Murmansk Railway.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 99)19421943: Trench warfareMilitary operationsThough military operations during 19421943 were limited, the front did see some action. In early 1942, Soviet Karelian Front forces attempted to retake the Medvezhyegorsk which had been lost to the Finns in late 1941. As the spring came, the Soviet forces also went onto the offensive in the Svir front as well as in Kiestinki region. All Soviet offensives started promisingly but either due to overextending their lines or by stubborn resistance, the Soviet offensives were stopped and repulsed. After Finnish and German (in Kiestinki) counterattacks, the eventual front lines had moved very little. On September 1942, the Soviets tried again at Kriv near Medvezhyegorsk, but despite of five days of fighting, the Soviets managed to push back the Finnish lines only  on a roughly -long stretch of the front.()Unconventional warfare was fought in both the Finnish and Soviet wilderness. Finnish LRRPs organized both by Finnish HQ4th Separate Battalion (Er.P 4)and by local units patrolled beyond Soviet lines. In the summer of 1942, the Soviet Union had formed the 1st Partisan Brigade. The unit was only partisan in the name as it was essentially more than 600 men and women on long range patrol. The 1st Partisan Brigade was able to infiltrate beyond Finnish patrol lines but was found out and largely destroyed.()On the naval front, the Soviet Fleet still operated from the besieged city of Leningrad. In early 1942, Soviet forces recaptured the island of Gogland but lost both Gogland and Tyuters to the Finns later in the spring of 1942. During the winter of 1941/1942, the Soviet Baltic Fleet made the decision to use the large Soviet submarine fleet to carry the fight to the enemy. Though initial submarine operations in the summer of 1942 were successful, the German Kriegsmarine and Navy soon stepped up their anti-submarine efforts, making the Soviet submarine operations later in 1942 very costly. The underwater offensive carried out by the Soviets convinced the Germans to lay nets as well as supporting minefields between Porkkala and Naissaar which proved to be an insurmountable obstacle for the Soviet submarines.()Diplomatic manoeuversImage:Hitler Mannerheim Ryti.jpg|thumb|Hitler, Marshal Mannerheim (Finnish Army chief) and Finnish President Ryti meet, Imatra  June 1942Operation Barbarossa was planned as a blitzkrieg intended to last a few weeks. British and U.S. observers believed that the invasion would be concluded before August. In the autumn of 1941, this turned out to be wrong, and leading Finnish military officers started to doubt Germanys capability to finish the war quickly. German troops in Northern Finland faced circumstances they were not properly prepared for, and failed to reach their targets, most importantly Murmansk. As the lines stabilized, Finland sent out peace feelers to the Soviet Union several times.(Jutikkala 1988, p.248) Germany was alarmed by this, and reacted by drawing down shipments of desperately needed materials each time. The idea that Finland had to continue the war while putting its own forces in the least possible danger gained increasing support, perhaps in the hope that the Wehrmacht and the Red Army would wear each other down enough for negotiations to begin, or to at least get them out of the way of Finlands independent decisions. Nationalist elements, including the IKL, may also have continued to hope for an eventual victory by Germany.Finlands participation in the war brought major benefits to Germany. The Soviet fleet was blockaded in the of Finland, so that the Baltic was freed for the training of German submarine crews as well as for German shipping, especially for the transport of vital iron ore from northern Sweden and nickel and rare metals (needed in steel processing) from the Petsamo area. The Finnish front secured the northern flank of the German Group North in the Baltic states. The sixteen Finnish divisions tied down numerous Soviet troops, put pressure on Leningrad (although Mannerheim refused to attack it directly), and threatened the Murmansk railway. Additionally, Sweden was further isolated and was increasingly pressured to comply with German and Finnish wishes, though with limited success.Despite Finlands contributions to the German cause, the Western Allies had ambivalent feelings, torn between residual goodwill for Finland and the need to accommodate their vital ally, the Soviet Union. As a result, Britain declared war against Finland, but the U.S. did not. With few exceptions, there was no combat between these countries and Finland, but Finnish sailors were interned overseas. In the U.S., Finland was denounced for naval attacks made on American Lend-Lease shipments, but received approval for continuing to make payments on its World War I debt throughout the inter-war period.Because Finland joined the Pact and signed other agreements with Germany, Italy, and Japan, the Allies characterized Finland as one of the Powers, although the term used in Finland is co-belligerence with Germany, emphasizing the lack of a formal military alliance treaty.International volunteers and supportLike in the War, Swedish volunteers were recruited. Until December they were tasked with guarding the Soviet naval base at Hanko. When it was evacuated by sea in December 1941, the Swedish unit was officially disbanded. During the Continuation War, the volunteers signed for three to six months of service. In all, over 1,600 fought for Finland, though only about 60 remained by the summer of 1944. About  of the volunteers had previously participated in the Winter War. Another significant groupabout  of the menwere Swedish officers on leave.From 1942 to 1944 there was also a Schutzstaffel (SS) battalion of volunteers on the northern Finnish front that was recruited from Norway, then under German occupation, and similarly, a some Danes. About 3,400 Estonian volunteers took part. On other occasions, the Finns received around 2,100 Soviet prisoners of war in return for those POWs they turned over to the Germans. These POWs were mainly Estonians and Karelians who were willing to join the Finnish army. These, as well as some volunteers from occupied Eastern Karelia, formed the Kinship Battalion (Finnish: Heimopataljoona). At the end of the war the USSR requested members of the Kinship Battalion to be handed over. Some managed to escape before or during transport, but most of them were either sent to the labor camps or executed.Finnish occupation policyOn 19 July 1941, the Finns set up the military administration in the occupied Karelia. The goal of the administration was to prepare the region for eventual incorporation into Finland. In the early stage, the Finns aimed at cleansing where the Russian population would be moved out of the area once the war was over. They would be replaced with peoples such as Karelians, Finns, Estonians, Ingrians, and Vepsians. The Russian population was deemed non-national.( Most of the East Karelian population had been evacuated before the Finnish forces arrived. About 85,000 people  mostly the elderly, women and children  were left behind, and less than  of them were Karelians. A significant number of civilians almost 30% of the remaining Russians  were interned in concentration camps.(Kirby 2006, p. 225)The winter of 19411942 was hard for the Finnish urban population due to poor harvests and a shortage of agricultural laborers.( However, for the interned it was disastrous and over 3,500 of them died, mostly from famine. The figure was equivalent to 13.8% of the inmates, where the corresponding figure for the free population of the occupied territories was 2.6% and for Finland proper 1.4%.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 107) Conditions were gradually improved, and the following year ethnic discrimination in wage levels and food rations was terminated, and schools were established also for the Russian section of the population.(Kirby 2006, p. 226) By the end of the occupation the death rate dropped to the same level as in Finland proper.(Soviet partisansSoviet partisans conducted a number of operations in Finland and in Karelia from 1941 to 1944. The major one failed when the 1st Partisan Brigade was destroyed in the beginning of August 1942 at lake Seesjrvi. Partisans distributed propaganda newspapers, Pravda in Finnish and Lenins Banner in Russian. One of the leaders of the partisan movement in Finland and Karelia was Andropov.(Andropov Yuri Vladimirovich. Biography.)Finnish sources state that partisan activity in East Karelia focused mainly on Finnish military supply and communication targets, but almost two thirds of the attacks on the Finnish side of the border targeted civilians,( Eino Viherivaara, Partisaanien jljet 19411944. Oulun Kirjateollisuus Oy, 1982. ISBN 951-99396-6-0) killing 200 and injuring 50, including children and the elderly.(Erkkil, Veikko, Vaiettu sota (The Silenced War). Arator Oy. ISBN 952-9619-18-9)(Lauri Hannikainen, (1992). Implementing Humanitarian Law Applicable in Armed Conflicts: The Case of Finland, Martinuss Nijoff Publishers, Dordrecht. ISBN 0-7923-1611-8.)( Tyyne Martikainen, (2002). Partisaanisodan siviiliuhrit, PS-Paino Vrisuora Oy. ISBN 952-91-4327-3.)Jews in FinlandFinland had a small (approx. 2,300) jewish population. They had full civil rights and fought shoulder to shoulder with other Finns in the ranks of the Finnish Army. The Germans had mentioned the Finnish Jews at the Conference in January 1942, wishing to transport them to Majdanek in Gouvernment. SS leader Himmler mentioned the Finnish Jews during his visit in Finland in the summer of 1942. Finnish Prime Minister Rangell replied that Finland had no question.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 102) However, there were differences for Jewish refugees in Finland. In November 1942, the Finns handed eight Jewish refugees over to the Gestapo. This raised protests among the Finnish Social Democrat ministers, and after this no more refugees were handed over.(Vehvilinen 2002, p. 103) Over 500 Jewish refugees were granted asylum.()The field synagogue in Karelia was one of the very few functioning synagogues on the Axis side during the war. There were even several cases of Jewish officers of Finlands army awarded the German Cross, which they declined. German soldiers were treated by Jewish medical officers who succeeded in saving their lives.( Rautkallio, Hannu, Suomen juutalaisten aseveljeys (Finnish Jews as German Brothers in Arms), Tammi, 1989)(Tuulikki Vuonokari (2003), Jews in Finland During the Second World War, Finnish Institutions Student Paper: FAST Area Studies Program Department of Translation Studies, University of Tampere, Autumn 2003 http://www.uta.fi/FAST/FIN/HIST/tv-jews.html. Retrieved 2009-02-06.)(Poljakoff in Torvinen, Kadimah: Suomen juutalaisten historia 35 Smolar 15557)(Torvinen, Taimi, Kadimah: Suomen juutalaisten historia Helsinki: Otava, 1989 pages 117167. Retrieved 2009-02-06.)Finland and the Western AlliesThe Continuation War represents the only case of a genuinely democratic state participating in World War II on the side of the Axis powers, albeit without being a signatory of the Pact. The United Kingdom declared war on Finland on 6 December 1941 (Finnish Independence Day), with Canada and New Zealand declaring war on Finland on 7 December and Australia and South Africa declaring war the next day. The U.S. Secretary of State Hull congratulated the Finnish envoy on 3 October 1941 for the liberation of Karelia but warned Finland not to enter Soviet territory; furthermore, the U.S. did not declare war on Finland when they went to war with the Axis countries and, together with UK, approached Stalin in the Conference about acknowledging Finnish independence. However, the U.S. government seized Finnish merchant ships in American ports, and in the summer of 1944 shut down Finnish diplomatic and commercial offices in the U.S. as a result of President Rytis treaty with Germany. The U.S. government later warned Finland about the consequences of continued adherence to the Axis.(World War II: Finland)The best-known British action on Finnish soil was an aircraft carrier strike on German and Finnish ships in the Finnish harbour of Petsamo on 31 July 1941.(FAA archive: Raid on Petsamo) This attack achieved little except the loss of three British aircraft, but it was intended as a demonstration of British support for its Soviet ally. Later in 1941, Hurricanes of 151 Wing RAF, based at Murmansk, provided local air cover for Soviet troops and fighter escorts for Soviet bombers.(The Air Force in Russia :Hurricanes at Murmansk) The British contribution to the war was occasional but significant.radio intelligence is said to have participated effectively in German actions against British convoys to Murmansk.(Ahtokari, Reijo and Pale, Erkki: Suomen Radiotiedustelu 19271944 (Finnish radio intelligence 19271944), Helsinki, Hakapaino Oy, pp. 191198, ISBN 952-90-9437-X) Throughout the war, German aircraft operating from airfields in northern Finland attacked British air and naval units based in Murmansk and Archangelsk.1944: Soviet offensiveOvertures for peaceFinland began to actively seek a way out of the war after the disastrous German defeat at the of Stalingrad in February 1943. Linkomies formed a new cabinet with peace as the top priority. Negotiations were conducted intermittently in 194344 between Finland and its representativeKusti Paasikivion one side and the Western Allies and the Soviet Union on the other, but no agreement was reached. Stalin decided to force Finland to surrender; a bombing campaign on Helsinki followed. The air campaign in February 1944 included three major air attacks involving a total of over 6,000 sorties. Finnish anti-aircraft defences managed to repel the raids as only 5% of the dropped bombs hit their planned targets. Major air attacks also hit Oulu and Kotka but, because of radio intelligence and effective anti-aircraft defences, the number of casualties was small.()Meanwhile, the lengthy and ferocious German defence in Narva aided by Estonians denied a Soviet-occupied Estonia as a favorable base for amphibious invasions and air attacks against Helsinki and other Finnish cities. The tactical success of the army detachment Narwa from mid-February to April diminished the hopes of the Stavka to assault Finland and force it into capitulation from Estonia.()()() Finland terminated the negotiations in mid-April 1944(Gebhardt 1989, p. 1) when it became apparent that Soviet terms were impossible to fulfill.(Moisala 1988)thumb|Finnish troops passing by the remains of a destroyed Soviet T-34 at the battle of Tali-IhantalaSoviet strategic offensiveOn 9 June 1944, the Soviet Union opened a major offensive against Finnish positions on the Isthmus and in the area of Ladoga (it was timed to accompany D-Day(Declaration of the Three Powers, December 1, 1943, Tehran Conference)). On the -wide breakthrough segment the Red Army had concentrated 3,000 guns and mortars. In some places, the concentration of artillery pieces exceeded 200 guns for every kilometer of the front (one every ). On that day, Soviet artillery fired over 80,000 rounds along the front on the Karelian Isthmus. On the second day of the offensive, the Soviet forces broke through the Finnish front lines. The Soviets penetrated the second line of defence by the sixth day. The Soviet pressure on the Karelian Isthmus forced the Finns to reinforce the area. This allowed the second Soviet offensive in Eastern Karelia to meet less resistance and to capture Petrozavodsk by 28 June 1944. The main objective of the offensives was to force Finland from the war.(Gebhardt 1989, p. 2)Finland especially lacked modern antitank weaponry which could stop Soviet heavy tanks, and German Foreign Minister von Ribbentrop offered these in exchange for a guarantee that Finland would not seek a separate peace again. On 26 June, President Ryti gave this guarantee as a personal undertaking, which he intended to last for the remainder of his presidency. In addition to delivering thousands of hand-held Panzerfaust and Panzerschreck antitank weapons (German equivalents of American bazookas), Hitler sent the 122nd Infantry Division, -strength 303rd Assault Gun Brigade, and a Luftwaffe Gefechtsverband Kuhlmey to provide temporary support in the most threatened defense sectors.With new supplies from Germany, the Finnish army halted the Soviet advance in early July 1944. At this point, the Finnish forces had retreated about one hundred kilometres, which brought them to approximately the same line of defence they had held at the end of the Winter War. This line was known as the VKT-line (short for ViipuriKuparsaariTaipale, running from Viipuri to Vuoksi to Lake Ladoga at Taipale), where the Finnish Army stopped the Soviet offensive in the of Tali-Ihantala in spite of the Soviet numerical and material superiority.(500 Days: The War in Eastern Europe ...  Google Books)(Finland at War 193945  Google Books)(Dictionary of Battles and Sieges: F-O  Google Books) The front stabilized once again.((( A few battles were fought in the latter stages of the war. The last of them was the of Ilomantsi, a Finnish victory, from 26 July to 13 August 1944.(Lunde 2011, p. 299)((Ilomantsin mottitaistelut 26.7.-13.8.1944 (The motti-battle in Ilomantsi). Ilomantsi sodassa (Ilomantsi at war). In Finnish: Nykyisen Ilomantsin itosissa kytiin kesll 1944 yli viikon mittainen kiivas torjuntataistelu, jossa kaksi viivyttmll kulutettua neuvostodivisioonaa pysytettiin, paloiteltiin motteihin ja lytiin lhes tydellisesti. Tm suurtaistelu varmisti armeijamme puolustuksen pitvyyden jatkosodan raskaina viimeisin pivin... A week-long vehement defensive battle was fought in the eastern parts of what is now Ilomantsi, where two Soviet divisions were stopped, disjoined to mottis, and almost completely destroyed. This operation secured our armys defence in the tough final days of the Continuation war...)(Juutilainen 1994) The struggle to contain the Soviet offensive was exhausting Finnish resources. The German support under the Agreement had prevented a disaster, but the country would not be able to hold another major attack.(Grier 2007, p. 31) The Soviet advances against German Army Groups Center and North further complicated matters for Finland.( With the front being stable so far, it was a good time for Finland to seek a way out of the war.((Erickson 1993, p. 329-30)(Glantz 1998, p. 229) By the beginning of August President Ryti resigned to allow Finland to sue for peace again, which the new government did in late August.(((Glantz 1998, p. 201-3) The Soviet peace terms were harsh but the $600,000,000 reparations demanded in the Spring were reduced to $300,000,000,( most likely due to pressure from the US and Britain.(Ziemke (2002), p. 390) However, after the ceasefire the Soviets insisted that the payments should be based on 1938 prices, which doubled the amount.(Prisoners of warSoviet prisoners of war in FinlandThe number of Soviet prisoners of war was estimated to be around 64,000 persons. Of these, 56,000 were captured in 1941.(Juutilainen & Leskinen (ed.); Kujansuu, Juha (2005), p. 1036) About 2,6002,800 Soviet prisoners of war were handed over to the Germans in exchange for roughly 2,200 Finnic prisoners of war.(Sanomat:  Wartime refugees made pawns in cruel diplomatic game. 8 November 2003) Food was especially scarce in 1942 in Finland due to a bad harvest, and this was the primary reason for the number of deaths. Out of 64,188 Soviet POWs, 18,318 died in Finnish of war camps.( Ylikangas, Heikki, Heikki Ylikankaan selvitys Valtioneuvoston kanslialle, Government of Finland)Finnish prisoners of war in the Soviet UnionThere are two views of the number of Finnish prisoners of war. The Soviet and Russian view is that of 2,377 Finnish prisoners of war who reached the prison camps 1,954 were returned after Armistice. The Finnish view is that of original ~3,500 prisoners of war only ~2,000 were returned (more than 40% perished). The difference can be at least partially explained by Soviet practice of counting only the prisoners who survived to reach a prison camp.Armistice and aftermathat Lappeenranta to the dead of the Winter and Continuation Wars. The wall in the background carries the names of Finnish dead buried inside Karelia. The figures are cleaners carrying out a daily cleaning and tidying of the memorial. May 2000Mannerheim had repeatedly reminded the Germans that in case their troops in Estonia retreated, Finland would be forced to make peace even on extremely unfavourable terms.(Howard D. Grier. Hitler, Dnitz, and the Baltic Sea, Naval Institute Press, 2007, ISBN 1-59114-345-4. p. 121) The territory of Estonia would have provided the Soviet army with a favourable base for amphibious invasions and air attacks against Finlands capital, Helsinki, and other strategic targets in Finland, and would have strangled Finnish access to the sea. The initial German reaction to Finlands announcement of ambitions for a separate peace was limited to only verbal opposition. However, the Germans arrested hundreds of sailors on Finnish merchant ships in Germany, Denmark and Norway.Previously, in return for critically needed food and defense materiel from the Germans, President Ryti had personally committed, in writing, that no separate peace with the Soviets would be attempted. Accordingly, it became clear that he must resign, paving the way for a separate peace. Finlands military leader and national hero, Gustaf Emil Mannerheim, was extraordinarily appointed president by the parliament, accepting responsibility for ending the war.On 4 September, the cease-fire ended military actions on the Finnish side. The Soviet Union ended hostilities exactly 24 hours after the Finns. An armistice between the Soviet Union and Finland was signed in Moscow on 19 September. Finland had to make many concessions: the Soviet Union regained the borders of 1940, with the addition of the Petsamo area (now District, Russia); the Porkkala peninsula (adjacent to Helsinki) was leased to the USSR as a naval base for fifty years and transit rights were granted; Finlands army was to be demobilized with haste, and Finland was required to expel all German troops from its territory within 14 days. As the Germans did not leave Finland in time for the given deadline, the Finns fought their former allies in the War. Finland was also to clear the minefields in Karelia (including East Karelia) and in the Gulf of Finland. Retreating German forces had also mined northern Finland heavily. The demining was a long operation, especially in the sea areas, lasting until 1952. 100 Finnish army personnel were killed and over 200 wounded during this process, most of them in Lapland.Nevertheless, in contrast to the rest of the Eastern front countries, where the war was fought to the end, a Soviet occupation of Finland did not occur and the country retained sovereignty. Neither did Communists rise to power as they had in the Bloc countries. A policy called the line formed the basis of Finnish foreign policy towards the Soviet Union until its dissolution in 1991.AnalysisSoviet personnel were awarded this medal for the defence of the Soviet Transarctic from 5 December 1944Image:Mannerheimkruis der Eerste en Tweede Klasse.jpg|thumb|upright|Cross is the most distinguished Finnish military decoration and awarded to soldiers for extraordinary bravery; the achievement of extraordinarily important objectives by combat, or for especially well conducted operations.Finland was forced into World War II by the Soviet Unions invasion of Finland, despite the Finnish intention of relying on the League of Nations and Nordic neutrality to avoid conflicts.(Lunde 2011, p. 9) During the Continuation War, Finland primarily aimed at reversing its territorial losses under the March 1940 Moscow Peace Treaty and, depending on the success of the German invasion, possible expansion, especially into Karelia.(Jokipii 1999, p. 145-6) Some small right-wing groups also supported a Finland ideology. Finland was able to come out of World War II without losing its independence,(Lunde 2011, p. 379) although the price for war was high in war casualties, reparation payments, territorial loss, a bruised international reputation, and subsequent careful consideration of Soviet international perspectives during the War. The FinnishGerman alliance was different from most of the other Axis relationships, an example of which is represented by the participation of Finnish Jews in the fight against the Soviet Union.() The Finns did not take any anti-Jewish measures in Finland, despite repeated requests from Nazi Germany.(Letter to the New York Times by Mark Cohen, Executive Director of Holocaust Publications in New York, 28 April, 1987) One remarkable aspect of the Finnish-German relationship was that Finland never signed the Pact, which was signed by all de jure Axis countries. However, for Hitler the matter was irrelevant and he saw Finland as an ally.(left|thumb|Finlands supreme commander Field Marshal Mannerheim at his headquarters.Finland adopted the concept of a parallel war whereby it sought to pursue its own objectives in concert with, but separate from, Nazi Germany.Major events of World War II, and the tides of war in general, had a significant impact on the course of the Continuation War:*Germanys invasion of the Soviet Union (Barbarossa) is closely connected to the Continuation Wars beginning.*The Allied invasion of France (Battle of Normandy) was coordinated with the Soviet major offensive against Finland (9 June-15 July 1944).(*The subsequent Soviet and Allied advances towards Germany drew away the interest in military operations from Europe hastening the end of the Continuation War.Soviet sources maintain that Soviet policies up to the Continuation War were best explained as defensive measures by offensive means: the division of occupied Poland with Germany, the occupation of Lithuania, Latvia and Estonia, and the invasion of Finland in the Winter War are described as elements in the construction of a security zone or buffer region between the perceived threat from the capitalist powers of Western Europe and the Communist Soviet Unionas some see the post-war establishment of Soviet states in the Pact countries and the Agreement of Friendship, Cooperation, and Mutual Assistance concluded with post-war Finland.(The problem of ensuring the security of Leningrad from the north in light of Soviet war planning of 19321941 by V. N.  Baryshnikov: The actual war with Finland began first of all due to unresolved issues in Leningrads security from the north and Moscows concerns for the perspective of Finlands politics. At the same time, a desire to claim better strategic positions in case of a war with Germany had surfaced within the Soviet leadership.)( .     (The Finnish war. A look from the other side) by A. I. Kozlov: After the rise of National Socialism to power in Germany, the geopolitical importance of the former buffer states had drastically changed. Both the Soviet Union and Germany vied for the inclusion of these states into their spheres of influence. Soviet politicians and military considered it likely, that in case of an aggression against the USSR, German armed forces will use the territory of the Baltic states and Finland as staging areas for invasion  by either conquering or coercing these countries. None of the states of the Baltic region, excluding Poland, had sufficient military power to resist a German invasion.)( Missed Chance, by Meltyukhov:The EnglishFrench influence in the Baltics, characteristic for the 20s  early 30s was increasingly limited by the growth of German influence. Due to the strategic importance of the region, the Soviet leadership also aimed to increase its influence there, using both diplomatic means as well as active social propaganda. By the end of the 30s, the main contenders for influence in the Baltics were Germany and the Soviet Union. Being a buffer zone between Germany and the USSR, the Baltic states were bound to them by a system of economic and non-aggression treaties of 1926, 1932 and 1939) Western historians such as Davies and Lukacs dispute this view and describe the prewar Soviet policy as attempting to stay out of the war and regaining land lost after the fall of the Empire.(Norman Davies, No simple victory, 2007, ISBN 978-0-670-01832-1)See also*of Finnish corps in the Continuation War*of Finnish divisions in the Continuation War*prisoners of war in the Soviet Union*Co-belligerence*Finnland*Finlandization*Finnish Waffen-SS volunteers*line*Salpalinja*151 Wing RAF*question in Finnish politicsNotesReferencesCitationsBibliography******************Further reading**Finnish*Finnish National Archive Luovutukset: Research on prisoner-of-war deaths, extraditions and deportations from Finland between 193955, Research project, See*****Russian** .     19411944    ISSN 0131-6222, 1995.External links* Stavka directive of 24 June 1941 on measures to foil a possible enemy strike from the territory of Finland against Leningrad, authorising the Soviet air offensive of 25 June 1941 (page 1, page 2) (1941-1944)de Continuacivlkada:Fortsttelseskrigende:Fortsetzungskrieget:Jtkusdade ContinuacinmilitoGerrade ContinuationKontinuasidi continuazionehbornl:Vervolgoorlogja:finske fortsettelseskrigenframhaldskrigenradziecko-fiska 1941-1944da Continuaode Continuare (19411944)warvojnavojnafi:JatkosotafortsttningskrigetSava (19411944)zh:
7896
List_of_Dune_games
A number of games have been published which are based on the Dune universe created by Herbert.Card games* Dune (1997): card game produced by Rings Publishing Group/Unicorn Games and later of the Coast.() Each player leads a planetary house, battling, conniving, and bribing its way to greatness ... players bid for powerful characters, search for the life-prolonging spice melange, avoid sandworms, engage in interstellar commerce, and, naturally, try to kill each other.(Board games* Dune (1979): Hill * Dune (1984): BrothersRole-playing games* Dune: Chronicles of the Imperium (2000): Last Unicorn Games; game set in the Dune universe.() Delayed by legal issues and then a corporate buy-out of Last Unicorn by Wizards of the Coast, a Limited Edition run of 3000 copies of a core rule-book was initially published, pending Wizard of the Coasts conversion of the game to its d20 game system and a subsequent wider release.( The company later announced that the game would be discontinued.()Video gamesTo date, there have been five licensed Dune-related video games released. There have also been many Dune-based MUDs (Multi-User Dimension) and browser-based online games, all created and run by fans.()Dune (1992)1992s Dune from Interactive/Interactive blends adventure with strategy.()() Loosely following the story of the 1965 novel Dune and using many visual elements from the 1984 film of the same name by Lynch, the game casts the player as Atreides, with the ultimate goal of driving the Harkonnens from the planet Dune and taking control of its valuable export, the spice.( Key to success is the management of spice mining, military forces, and ecology as the player amasses allies and skills.(Dune II (1992)Dune II: The Building of a Dynasty, later retitled Dune II: Battle for Arrakis for the Mega Drive/Genesis port, was released in December 1992 from Studios/Virgin Interactive.()() Often considered to be the first mainstream modern strategy game, Dune II established many conventions of the genre.( Only loosely connected to the plot of the novels or films, the game pits three interplanetary houses &mdash; the Atreides, the Harkonnens, and the Ordos &mdash; against each other for control of the planet Arrakis and its valuable spice, all while fending off the destructive natural forces of the harsh planet itself.(Dune 2000 (1998)Dune 2000, a 1998 remake of Dune II from Games/Westwood Studios/Virgin Interactive, added improved graphics and live-action cutscenes.() Though gameplay is similar to its predecessor, Dune 2000 features an enhanced storyline and functionality.(Frank Herberts Dune (2001)Released in 2001 by Interactive/Interactive, Frank Herberts Dune is a 3D video game based on the 2000 Sci Fi Channel miniseries of the same name.() As Paul MuadDib Atreides, the player must become leader of the Fremen, seize control of Dune, and defeat the evil Baron Harkonnen.( The game was not a commercial or critical success, and Cryo subsequently filed for bankruptcy in July 2002.()Emperor: Battle for Dune (2001)Emperor: Battle for Dune (Intelligent Games/Westwood Studios/Arts) was released on June 12, 2001.() A sequel to Dune 2000, the real-time strategy game features 3D graphics and live-action cutscenes and casts players as Atreides, Harkonnens, or Ordos.(()DUNE Generations (2001, cancelled)right|175px|DUNE Generations logoIn 2001, Cryonetworks disclosed information about Dune Generations, an online, 3D real-time strategy game set in the Dune universe.()() The official website for the upcoming game that featured some concept images, a brief background story and description of the persistent gameworld, and a list of frequently asked questions.() The game would be constructed using Cryos own online multimedia development framework SCOL.()Within the infrastructure of a permanent and massive multiplayer world that exists online, DUNE Generations would let players assume control of a dynasty in the Dune universe, with the goal of first mastering the natural resources of their own homeworlds and ultimately rising in power and influence through conflicts and alliances with other player dynasties.(() Each of the three available dynasty types &mdash; traders, soldiers, or mercenaries &mdash; would provide a different playing experience, all with the long-term goal of gaining control of Arrakis and its valuable spice.(( A preview video trailer was released in November 2001.() The game was still in the testing stage in February 2002,() and the project was ultimately halted after Cryo filed for bankruptcy in July 2002.(Online gamesDune MUDAround since 1992, Dune MUD is a text based virtual environment(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/MUD ). Play online at http://dune.servint.com/playdune, use name guestReferencesExternal links**games at Dune2k.com
